I have been twice to Joya, once to have drinks at the bar and once to have lunch with family. I think the bar at Joya has a great feeling, would definitely want to go there for just drinks and sit at the bar. They have some awesome Sangria! For lunch, we had Tapas style food. The CRAB CAKES are to die for!! Calamari was also good. Empanadas (mushroom) were okay. I think crab cakes was something I would go there again for. The ambience and feel of the place is really interesting and the lounge sitting is pretty cool for a small group. Nice place to unwind and chit chat!! I'm definitely going there more often!
When I go to Joya I usually eat at the bar with a friend or alone. I often suggest Joya when the occasion to eat in a group of six or eight arrives and I'm often greeted with the response, "Lee, you always eat there!" Sometimes they relent, sometimes we go to a lesser locale of which there are many nearby. The decor and overall look of the space is very subdued and sexy. Low lighting and down tempo music playing softly. Cool but not intimidating. A place where your inside voice is audible, the service is attentive and congenial and everybody's easy on the eyes. At Joya, I often have a meal that consists of Red Snapper Ceviche, Bay Scallops with Corn, Heirloom Tomato Caprese Salad, and Bacon-wrapped Pork Tenderloin topped off with artisanal Churros and deep-fried, faux "Oreos." I like to start with a White Sangria with a drop of Hangar Vodka or an Allagash White. I usually switch to a glass of Red with my entree and the list changes frequently. At the end of a meal like that, it is hard to be disappointed and if you are, I don't want to eat with you anyway. I wish Joya had a greater selection of craft beer and that I didn't have to go somewhere else whenever the Sharks, Giants, 49ers, Raiders, A's or any other major sporting event was on TV. All in all, Joya is one of my favorites and never a bad choice when in Palo Alto.
I've been here for drinks and stuff a few times and I dig the swanky but small cocktail area as well... Read more 
One of my fav tapas restaurants that I've been remissed in reviewing! Beautiful decor, a chic lounge area, al fresco dining and an interior dining area that opens up to the sidewalk patio...the perfect place for a light dinner/happy hour! While indulging in sangria (so delish and strong!), we ordered chicken skewers and paella croquettes as a mid-afternoon snack. The chicken was extremely tender, moist, and full of herbs and flavor. The croquettes were delicious paella rice and cheese deep-fried balls...can't go wrong with fried rice and cheese! I'm a bit surprised the place doesn't have a higher rating, because as many times as I've been here previously for drinks and/or tapas, it has always been great!
2 Old College Friends + 2 Bar Stools + 1 Sexy Airy Spacious Room + 1 Watery White Peach Sangria with Canned Mandarin Oranges (???) + 1 Case of Basil Grapefruit Martini Envy + Latin Tapas Sampler Hits (4 Juicy Mini Chorizo Sausages + 1 Mushroom Packed Empanada + 3 Mussels with Tomato Sauce + Cup of Olives + 3 Slices of Bread + 2 Pieces of Serrano Ham + 4 Pieces of Soria Pork Chorizo) + Latin Tapas Sampler Misses (1 Fishy Mussel + Flavorless Octopus Ceviche + 1 Bright Red Pepper Stuffed with Blue Cheese) + Restaurant Recommendations + Memories of Old Times + Musings on the Future = JOYa
Seen Ratatouille? And wondered if you'd ever see those fireworks over your head when you took a first bite?  If you're in a decent mood, head to Joya, have a drink, order the hanger steak and enjoy.  Look, food is like art.  Beauty is in the eye (or tongue) of the beholder.  And mood counts.  But if the stars align as they did for me this night at Joya, you will have a wonderful meal.  The plate looks ordinary  on presentation, but the textures and sauces are top notch.  You have never had a potato side like this. The staff is incredibly professional - they make it all happen without your noticing, unless you take a moment to appreciate it. The decor is chic yet inviting. I wish I knew the owners and managers so I could invest in their next venture. Maybe everything just happened to work out right this night. Or maybe it's as good as all that.
Modern, fancy, and classy. Loved this place. I never really go to Latin American restaurants let alone a high end one. I am so glad I got to come here. My cousin and I dined here for dinner last week and boy was this place crowded! The atmosphere is great! Not only does everything look pretty but there is an open air area where you can dine outside. However we sat inside and the setting was sort of intimate too with the dim lighting. Since we weren't too hungry we both got sangrias and shared two tapas, the Mexican Empanadas and the Braised Short Rib Tacos. Mexican Empanadas: Very filling, since it is fried. Reminded me of a samosa since it had a potato filling. There was also chorizo in it and the green aji sauce was delicious with it! Comes with 4! Braised Short Rib Tacos: A bit more on the spicy side for me. The tortilla used for the tacos come in different colors so it was really appealing. The meat was tender and soft. Real good! Comes with 3 but out waitress was nice enough and able to add a 4th taco so we wouldn't go hungry. I want to give this place 5 stars, but I definitely need to come back and try their actual dinner options instead of the Tapas. If you need to go to a business meeting, this would be a great place to have lunch/dinner here. If you need to go on a romantic date, this is a definite GO.
I love tapas, and Joya always hits the spot for me. On my latest visit I tasted the kobe beef mini-burgers, crab cakes, and warmed goat cheese. I loooove the crab cakes...love them. And I love the sauce they're served on top of. The mini-burgers are pretty tasty, too - they have chipotle mayo, cheese & generous slices of juicy tomato on them. The warmed goat cheese is good, but it's hard for me to find something negative to say about a dish that involves so much cheese. I had a sparkling rose from the wine list. I liked it, and I've never had a drink here I haven't. Our server, Antonio, was suuuuper nice. I've always liked the service here, but he was especially cool.
Had lunch with the CEO and Principle Engineer, who recommended this joint.  Taking their word, we walked in and got sat right away. First thing you will notice is the environment and atmosphere. I dig it. Location: Very short walk from whatever you need on University. Busy place. Atmosphere: Very modern, but the decore still reminds you that you are in a latin environment. Service: Good, nothing too special. Sanitation: My water glass, crystal clear. Good enough. Food: Tapas are a good way to go if you want to try many items on the menu, and not stuff yourself. The big bosses just ordered what they usually get. Here are the things we got... Braised Short Rib Tacos: Very Flavorful and bold taste. truffled deviled eggs with smoked trout caviar: It tasted like what it sounds like :) Ahi tuna Tartare: Refreshing. Ceviche (All three types): Very good! the chili snapper was probably my favorite. It was well pared with the mango. Along with those, I got the Cuban sandwich. It was decent, but i have had better. No wow factor, however the marinated pork was unique. Overall: I want to go back and try more items on the menu, pero no tengo dinero una el momento.
There is another paella place that I wanted to try but they only serve it for dinner and I was in the palo alto area for lunch so I decided to stop by this place instead. The paella was kinda salty but I thought they would give us more for the price. I also had a salad and empanadas which weren't too bad. The atmosphere at the restaurant was nice and I like it that they have an outdoor seating area.
After eating at Joya few times, I think I can finally write a worthy review for this lovely restaurant! It's always a treat coming here for dinner. The service is good, and the food is delicious. And I have to agree with Jacqueline C.... It's definitely a favorite restaurant in downtown Palo Alto. For a table of five people, you can easily drop $40 per person. And that includes some tapas, a paella, and a pitcher of sangria. The best tapas I have tasted here so far is the kobe beef mini-burgers, macaroni and cheese, and the poutine de comote. The mini burgers are so juicy and one of the best sliders I have ever tasted. The mac and cheese is easily everyone's favorites because it has a hint of smokiness from the ham. And the poutine de comote is simply sweet potato fries toped with cheese and braised short ribs. Ugh.. so good. Some other nice dishes to order are: the chorizo corn dog, the guacamole with new world chips, and the braised short ribs tacos. The things that I think you can pass on is the yucca fries, charcuterie assortment, and the papas bravas. They were good but nothing really special. Be aware that the paella clasica takes 30 minutes to cook! So you'll be screwed if you're full from eating the tapas, because that dish comes in last. It can easily be shared, but it is extremely filing. As for dessert, try the warmed chocolate cake! It is perfectly paired with the vanilla thyme ice cream. As for drinks, Joya has a fairly large selection of wine menus and plenty of cocktails to choose from, but they're also known for their sangria. The white and red sangrias are equally good. But the red sangria is favored more because it is bolder and tastier. But if you prefer something light and sweet, then the white sangria is more perfect for you. Joya has taken a great advantage for being a corner restaurant on University Drive. Their ambiance is charming , the decor is elegant, and their window outdoor seating is perfect for summer nights. It is recommended to get a table reservation if you're coming here for dinner on a Thursday to Saturday night. But if you just want some tapas and drinks, try to grab a seat at the bar or at the lounge area instead. And there's no excuse on being late because you were looking for parking, because they have a convenient parking garage right behind the restaurant.
Love Joya for lunch and dinner! Nice trendy restaurant, they serve good cocktails, staff is friendly. The paella is really good and you should really try the fried oreos for dessert, to die for!!
Everytime we eat at Joya, we have the Peach Sangria and just order a bunch of tapas. Never have we been disappointed by the service and attentiveness of the staff. If you're looking for a fun, vibrant place to dine with excellent food, this is your place.
still solid.  awesome mojitos!
This place stood out to me while searching University Ave. on a Friday evening.  Yes, I'm drawn to... Read more 
When life gives you lemons, you know what to do with them. Limoncello shots! Or lemonade if you're detoxing. When a homeless looking man who's probably a multimillonaire venture capitalist just dressing down for the day or dabbling in a social experiment (hello, candid camera!) puts a few twenties in your shirt (true story), what do you do with them? Tough choice. While the altruistic thing to do would have been to pay it forward to the local Salvation Army, I decided to indulge in another humanitarian cause-day drinking on the street. Joya really classes up day drinking on the street. I'm not talking about brown bags of malt liquor-I'm talking about goblets of sangria overloaded with chopped fresh fruit, with both white and red to choose from. Their white sangria is ridiculously refreshing, and for those of you who don't like sangria, I'm usually right there with you, but just try this white one. And the street I speak of is University Ave-not so shabby for some al fresco, daytime boozin' on the dime of a Jekyll/Hyde hobo/entrepreneur. Food to wash down those 3pm sangrias (it's happy hour in Spain, right?!) comes in all small tapas forms. A cubano sandwich was a good representation of the ideal. Perfectly sized, good flavor, and Dijon?! On a Cuban? Interesante... The place is nothing like the country, rustic places en Espana that I love. It's super faux-luxe, with its sleek earth tone decor, gilded curtains, and hot light fixtures. For me, it would not pass the 'If I weren't stuck in Palo Alto all day' test, meaning that if it were transplanted to SF/Oakland, I would probably not be a bar fly here, lest to bat eyelashes at the hot Latin servers and get my sugar and ethanol IV from the sangria. Joya is the nexus of bizarre experiences...hobos accosting me with free cash, me drinking sangria when I shouldn't be, and dijon appearing where it doesn't belong. Experiences can be what you make of them, and I have to say, this one was memorable.
I've always passed by this place but never tried it out. I finally tried this place out for happy hour and I really enjoyed the ambiance. There's a lounge section or a dining section. You can still eat in the lounge but it's more casual and cozy. The decor is rather lovely and the lounge area didn't get to packed but I would suggest getting there before 6:30 on a week night if you would like to sit in that area. We had the plantains and the sea bass ceviche. The plantains were a little on the dry side but still enjoyable and the ceviche was good.
I've been going to Joya for years now and the atmosphere, service, drinks, and food are hard to beat. Great for happy hours, networking, or weekends.
Went here for the first time looking to get cocktails and appetizers while sitting outdoors and was completely turned off by the rude and unaccommodating hostess. Despite there being several open outdoor tables, she refused to seat us there because we were exactly two and they were tables for 4. Then inside she gave us two terrible seating choices despite many better spots and wedged us into a table within inches of another couple. We ordered two cocktails, one was bad one good. They originally brought the wrong drink entirely, but two stars for the delicious cucumber cilantro gin concoction. You can definitely find a better place on university to get the same experience.
This place is no biggie. My family decided to go with a bunch of tapas. We weren't sure how big the tapas were or how many we should get, so we asked the waiter if ordering the Kobe Burgers, Short rib tacos, guacamole chips, asparagus, and chicken skewers would be filling for 3.  He simply said, "I honestly can't tell you. Everyone eats a different portion, so it's different for everyone." I was in disbelief. He's the waiter!!! Supposed to give us advice on these things since we've obviously not eaten there before!! Geez. Anyway we decided to go with the above order and it was a great portion for the 3 of us. We were all pretty full, and didn't take home any food. My favorite would be the chicken skewers, since it had some sauce on it that made it taste great. Tacos were decent as well. Burgers were adorable but not the best I've ever had. Asparagus was good but tasted like typical asparagus. Guac was average, but chips came in a variety of different types, which was nice. Total came out to $50.34, which was pretty cheap for 3 people. I did like the atmosphere of the restaurant, with half outdoor seating and sunlight beaming through. The inside was very modern, with a double bar, a cool feature for a restaurant. I didn't like the staff very much, they were pretty pretentious, but I guess that's Palo Alto for you. Won't come back, would go to Tamarine down the block if I were in the area.
My guy friend and I ordered a bunch of appetizers and drinks for dinner here.  It is okayyyyy as in... if you are hungry and too lazy to step back outside to look for other food (I heard the hummus place nearby is amazing) and you are taken by the nice ambiance in the place, then eat here.  The food isn't great.  The scallops with corn was quite good, the braised short rib tacos could not have been made with short ribs but rather the Barbacoa beef from Chipotle, and they stuffed the tacos with that, which were sitting in a pool of orange oil within the tortillas. The beef was also very bland.  The tuna tartare on avocado with yucca chips tasted good, but the tuna itself was not pink or red, but mostly brown. :(  I think they made need a consultant or new chef to come in and change the menu, because the space there is amazing, and quite deceiving!
A very nice chic restaurant to enjoy a nice and relaxing lunch. Love their tapas! I had their Cuban sandwich, which was super tasty and very fulfilling and their service gets no complaints from me.
Being a vegetarian, giving a place that serves primarily meat based dishes, a 5 star rating really does mean something. It is based on the food I have eaten, the wine I have drunk, and the impeccable service I have received. All have been just that: impeccable. Let me stop here and say that I have only ever eaten/drank at the lounge-bar. Even so, the service I have received has always been excellent. The staff is kind and patient, and they genuinely seem to care about the clientele. I have never been disappointed and will continue to find here for a good glass of wine, yummy tapas, and welcoming service. Thank you Joya!!! You've made this local happy!
SUPER DELICIOUS FOOD. GREAT AMBIANCE. Just took my mom here for her birthday. Our group consisted of 6 people and we ordered 7 tapas plus one entree to share. For those of you who don't know what tapas is (because I didn't before tonight), they're small dishes that are intended to be shared between people. Kinda like dim sum for all you asians out there :) This place is GREAT if you come in groups of 4-6 people so you can get a lot of variety. We were all very full with 7 tapas and the 1 entree. Tapas Sampler: this was the only tapas I didn't care for. I suppose you get a little of everything, but I really don't recommend it. I rather order their super delicious individual tapas than a variety of bleh ones. The Kobe Beef Sliders, Ahi Tuna, and Calamari were all pretty good, but they weren't particularly outstanding or anything. The crab cakes came with 2 cakes and they were really good as well. Poutine: sweet potatoes fries topped with shredded beef and cheesy gravy sauce. It was sooo good! Very different and I really liked it. Scallops with grilled corn: BEST THING WE ATE THAT NIGHT. IT'S SOOOO GOOD!!!! Delicious truffle oil, garlicly, buttery goodness. I just wanted more more and more! The entree we shared was pork tenderloin wrapped with bacon. It came with asparagus and mashed sweet potatoes. It was good as well :) Everything was just so good. We ordered their churros with chocolate sauce and asked them to place a candle on the plate for my mom and they did so that was nice. What was even nicer was that we asked them how many churros came in a plate and they said 5, we ordered 1 plate anyways, even though we were a party of 6. They gave us a 6th churro anyway! AND WHAT WAS EVEN NICER was that they gave us the entire plate for free cuz it was her birthday!! The 7 tapas, 1 entree, plus 4 drinks came out to a little less than 200 including tip. Definitely one of the better dining experiences I've ever had. The ambiance is just so relaxing and the drinks we ordered were sooo good! Sangria was not too strong so it's easy to sip on while relaxing and enjoying your meal. I definitely recommend this place and I will definitely be back!
Located conveniently on University Drive - this is the second time I have eaten here and both times have been wonderful experiences!  They serve exquisite tapas - with a wide variety to choose from.  We had (to name a few) beef tacos, chicken chipolte tostadas, grilled asparagus with poached egg and sun-dried tomatoes!  (my favorite) The restaurant has a nice atmosphere and even thought we did not have reservations during the busiest time of year - Stanford graduation - we easily sat in the lounge area and enjoyed cocktails and tapas!
Tapas Style baby!!! That's all I know about this grown & sexy environment. What's nice is if you want to come with a group, there is a lounge side. The dining area is beautiful, such great ambiance, and just the right amount of noise. If you want to make it a casual date, you can sit outside or window front. TAPAS is the BUSINESS here: Mac & Cheese, Chicken Skewers, Calamari....all Latin infused. OMG, my stomach is growling just thinking about it......
Get a seat by the window! This restaurant is really laid back and relaxed. Like every other review here says, the restaurant staff provides you an upper class dining experience without the attitude. The seared bay scallops with grilled corn is delicious because of the warm almost cheesy-like sauce it was baked in. Soo delicious and the corn was wonderful. The calamari never fails. It looks like it has tons of breading but strangely enough, it doesn't. The sauce is really good. Ask for extras if you're a dipping sauce kind of person! They actually give you a lot of calamari too. This is actually sufficient enough for 2 people, surprisingly. It's mainly because of the calamari dish being surprisingly large. However, we also ordered the open faced grilled steak sandwich. My bf complained how they didn't ask how we wanted it cook but it didn't matter because it was soft, cooked, and bursting with flavor. It even reminded me of seasoned beef jerky but in steak form. Definitely loved this place and will try it again if I'm in the area!
I went for dinner with a vegetarian friend.  Despite telling the server that he is a vegetarian, they put pork in his food.  He was horrified to discover this AFTER he had ate some of it.  They didn't even comp that little tapas plate. The food was mediocre,  I love the ambiance, so I really wanted to like to food, but unfortunately it was not the rich, flavorful tapas I am accustomed to having.  If they would just work on the flavor and getting the food and service right, I would love this place and be a regular. I came for drinks another night with a few friends.  The bar here is a pretty lively place, but the bartenders are a bit snotty.  The rest of the staff (hosts, servers, bussers) are very nice.  The bartender also touted the mojitos as excellent, but they were mediocre and flavorless.
I love this Tapas restaurant.  Their ambiance is really chic and the food is great.  We usually sit in their lounge area and order cocktails and small plates to share with friends.  The tuna tartar is to die for.  The fish is fresh and they out a lot of fresh avocado.  They use a different kind of chip, like a banana or plantain I think.  Whatever it is, it compliments the tuna very well.  The calamari and really good and so are the mini hamburgers.  It's a great place to go and get all dressed up and hang out with friends.  There is a private room int he bar/lounge area that you can reserve for a party.  It's fancy:)
I can't stop craving or raving about their yucca fries!  They are seriously heaven sent.  This place remains solidly my favorite restaurant in Palo Alto.  It's just consistently delicious food and good service.  Wish they'd bring back their sopes...
this is my fave restaurant in palo alto.  and every time i come back, it reminds me why i keep... Read more 
I thought the food here was quite good.  We sat on the sidewalk and had a few nibbles and chatted while enjoying a lovely late spring/early summer evening. I would come back for sure, even though I was a bit weirded out by being told in advance of sitting down that my enjoyment could have an expiration date.  "Hi, table for 2?  I can seat you inside now, but I'll need the table back at 8."  As a former restaurant manager, this is brilliant, but as a diner it was a little bit offputting.  So, if I wanted to linger, I'd have to go somewhere else?  I wonder if they lose much business?  Probably not, the place was packed. Also, it abounds with pretty young girls in super tight and/or short dresses.  Enjoy.
Pretty standard fake tapas at hint prices. The wine list is not that great either. There seem to be a lot of these restaurants in the area with basically the same tapas. The chefs need to go to Spain or the south of france to see what real food tastes like.
Great for Silicon Valley people watching. Lots of  Internet execs with their young girlfriends or younger engineering recruits. Decent tapas.  Strong drinks. Centrally located on University.
The steak and egg sandwich on the lunch menu here is to die for! Every time I eat here i leave happy. They have an excellent assortment of wine here as well. Also very dog friendly which is hard to find around here. I took my dog and we sat outside and the waiter brought him a bowl of water and a treat without me even asking! The staff is very well mannered and knowledgeable about the menu items. I love eating here because the menu is so diverse. The restaurant also has a nice lounge area to sip wine and socialize. Highly recommended!!!
Trying to plan a surprise party for my wife's 30th birthday last minute was tough, but thankfully, Jane (Private Events Manager) over at Joya was willing to accomodate me and our party even though they had other parties reserved for the same evening. She was very clear in her communication, made recommendations on different sections of the restaurant, food recommendations, and gave me the names of the people who would be helping me that evening. I ended up booking the VIP room and ordered a bunch of different tapas. I showed up with my wife and daughter around 7:30pm a two Saturdays ago. Told the front that we had "reservations". They walked us back to the VIP room where they had the curtains closed and SURPRISE!!!! Our friends and family were enjoying cocktails and appetizers when we arrived. Sure the room was a little cramped with 20+ of us, but we weren't expecting that many people to show up in the first place. Our party ended up over flowing into their Tapas Lounge area. Thankfully, nobody asked my party to move because the place was PACKED that evening. Kalli was our server for the evening and she did a terrific job handling our party. She was ontop of all of our drink orders along with keeping up with the food. There was always a fresh dish of food for our guests to enjoy. It got to a point where I had to ask her to stop bringing out food since everyone was stuffed! Appetizers and Tapas that were served: Guacamole & Chips, Cheese Plate, Charcuterie Platter, Crab Cakes, Ceviche Sampler, Beef Mini Burgers, Chicken Skewers, Yucca Fries, Paella Croquetas, Chorizo Corndog... ALL YUMMY and served HOT! Friends and family told us, "THE FOOD WAS HELLA GOOD!", and of course, their sangrias are pretty awesome too. :D Thank you Jane, Kalli and the rest of the Joya staff for making my wive's surprise party a memorable one!!!
Came here for the second time Saturday night. The first time I came here, my wife and I stopped by... Read more 
Joya is a very trendy place with decent food at very big prices. Not only is the food so-so but the portions are very small compared to the prices. Not a great place on a budget but it's also not a great place for people looking for good Spanish tapas. They're just OK.
The boyfriend took me here for our usual Friday night date and had such a great experience. The decor and ambiance of the restaurant is AMAZING -- just take a look at the pictures on their website. It is beautiful and very elegant. We had reservations for 5:30pm and it didn't get extremely busy like we expected, but that was also nice too. We started with the white peach sangria, which was so yummy! And we shared three tapas -- Kobe beef mini-burgers, paella croquetas, and the sea bass ceviche. The Kobe beef mini-burgers were so delicious; they're also so cute! The sea bass ceviche was also really good; our server also brought us extra chips. The paella croquetas were melt-in-your-mouth delicious. Overall, the food was really good! Kind of on the pricey side, but that's the only complaint I have! We also got the churros and hot chocolate dessert which was such a great recommendation from our server. The churros were so fluffy and not overly sweet and I usually don't like chocolate, but the hot chocolate was such a great dip. I thought the service was superb; our server was very attentive and made sure everything was okay. The food came out pretty fast and I really have no complaints about anything from our experience. This is definitely a great place to bring a date and I highly recommend this restaurant.
I just love good food & this is the place to get it. Nice atmosphere & reasonable prices.
Joya's a hip, trendy tapas joint right smack on University Ave.  We came here on a night where the weather was gorgeous so there were plenty of people out and about.  Parking may be a bit difficult on University, but there is a free parking structure on the back side of Joya which makes it easy breezy. My reservation was at 9pm and we were promptly seated.  I wasn't too fond of their sangria, but that's what I get when I stray away from my standard Raging Bull. While waiting for my dinner date, I started off with the guac and New World Chips.  Different, but I think tortilla chips would have been better.  The guac could have used more onion powder, lime juice, and more jalapeno bits.  We ordered the Braised short rib tacos, Kobe beef burgers, crab cakes, and pea sprouts. The short rib tacos were http://bomb.com as expected.  The Kobe beef burgers were a little too rare for my taste.  The crab cakes were ok and the pea sprouts--well tasted like fresh cut grass as expected.  The table and ambiance was excellent as was our service.  Where else do you go to pay $70+ for small plates of food and not complain?
Overall, I thought the food was overpriced for what it was, but not bad. The white peach sangria and the ceviche sampler were amazing and definitely the highlights of dinner. Everything else was just okay. Beef and mushroom empanadas were okay; I didn't like the skin or wrap on them. The chorizo corndogs didn't really work and I wouldn't order them again. The short rib tacos were good, but there was too much meat and not enough fresh and crunchy veggie toppings. I do love the outdoor seating or inside window seating. They also open really late on weekends, which is always a plus.
Great small plates! Everything was delicious - we pretty much ordered one of everything. Also, I HIGHLY recommend the cheese plate: great diversity of cheeses and chutney/honey/quince etc. There is a small semi private back room for a group of about 10 you can reserve. This place gets packed during lunch time with the University Ave rush - make a reservation or go off peak hours.
Awesome go-to tapas spot right in downtown Palo Alto. It was bustling at 8pm on a Wednesday night, but the same menu is available at the bar and its open seating (they also have couches in the bar area with open seating too). Two of us probably ordered 6-8 tapas and were very full by the end of it. This is a great, casual spot to catch-up while enjoying a delicious meal. Notable favorites include the chorizo corndogs (corndogs are already delicious, and chorizo just puts them over the top), beef sliders, short-rib tacos and bay scallops. Honestly, the hardest part of our experience was figuring out what items to order. Try it yourself - read the menu, and try to narrow it down to some reasonable number for two folks. Each sounds amazing, all the ones we ordered lived up to our expectations.
No reservations, had lunch with a coworker.  Seating was great, we had inside seating to an open window of University Ave.  Ambiance and decor, very tasteful and inviting. Menu: Ceviche sampling of three and the paella clasica First off when ordering and mentioning the paella clasica.  The server asked us with a question " do you know that it takes 35 min to cook."  Yes sir, its not my first time ordering Paella.  I am aware of the cook time. Being that it is $46 dollars on the menu one should not question but be appreciative that the company has customers wanting to eat such a decadent rich and flavorful meal. The Ceviche - sampling of three, full of flavors very tasteful and delicious. The Paella Clasica - Very rich and tasteful has a kick of spiciness at the end of each bite. I would rate the food a good 3.5 Joya is a very inviting place for company and drinks.  Yes I would come here again, maybe enjoy the ceviche and try other flavors that is on the menu. Even though the service lacks personality.
I am absolutely in love with Joya's drink menu (great drinks and extensive wine list), ceviche (we got the trio sampler and I particularly loved the original sea bass and the mango chili red snapper), and bacon wrapped pork tenderloin.  The Kobe beef sliders are amazing and the desserts are delicious!  (Our group split the caramelized pineapple butter cake with coconut ice cream and the Santa Maria strawberry and pear tart with cheesecake ice cream- NOM). This is not a "quick dinner" place.  Being that there is an extensive tapas menu, expect to lounge with your SO over drinks and good bites on the left or camp out with your party of five on the right and order the paella (request it when you make you reservation or as soon as you get there as it takes a solid hour before it's ready!) Service is great.  I forget who our server was but from the hostess to the wait staff to the maitre'd, everyone was so attentive. The bar is situated in the middle of the venue dividing the tables from the lounge seating area, and for good reason.  Please order something from the bar!  The bartenders are so adorable/hot and the drinks are amazing! I have also been here for private functions and they do a superb job.  I can't wait to go back when the weather is nice again to eat outside- I love not rushing a good meal!
Joya has just become my new favorite restaurant in downtown Palo Alto! Came here for Zha L.'s birthday on St.Patrick's day and was pleasantly surprised after all the mixed reviews I've heard about the place. Perhaps it was the round of shots and pitcher of sangria we had before ordering, but every single dish was fantastic! We asked the waitress to surprise us with a shot of her choice and she chose an appropriate chocolate cake shot. We continued the meal with the white peach sangria that was super refreshing and bursting with juicy peaches and tangerines (albeit canned fruit, but still tasty). We then proceeded to order every tapas dish that caught our eye, which turned out to be quite a lot for our party of 5. The kobe beef sliders, empanadas, macaroni and cheese, braised pork poutine, calamari, and cute chorizo corn dogs were all individual fiestas in my mouth. Yucca fries, though nicely crispy, not so much. We then finished off the meal with an order of the combination chicken and seafood paella which definitely filled in all the cracks. They brought over a dessert of warm chocolate cake with vanilla thyme ice cream for the birthday girl which was devoured in an instant. Unfortunately, the rest of the night was a bit of a fail because we were all so full from the food that we were unable to become exceptionally drunk in honor of St.Patrick. But I'll let that slide since I can't stop thinking about when I'm going to return to Joya for another delicious meal.
I went to Joya for lunch to have a business meeting.  I have heard great things about this place (especially during happy hour) but I have never had lunch there.  The ambiance is great and when it's a nice day out, as it was today, you can sit inside near the outdoor patio area or sit outside.  We were one of the first customers of the day there and the staff and chef were extremely hospitable.  The chef was making some paella for a PR person and because he can't make just one portion, he ended up giving us a free paella!! We didn't want it at first even though they were offering to give it to us for half off.  After a few minutes, the server comes back with it in his hands and just says "this is on the house from the chef."  Awesome!  So we had to taper back on the tapas we were going to order and instead got the mexican empanadas with mushrooms and the warm goat cheese tapa.  It was delicious!  We also ordered the white wine sangria which was AWESOME! I'll definitely go back to this place another time and try their happy hour/dinner menu.
A friend and came for drinks and snackies over in the lounge area. I was a bit bummed to see the only thing vegan was either chips/guac or yucca fries at the bar and both the chips and fries were fried with other meaty bits. I wish I got the name of the woman who took care of us because she was about as awesome as it gets. She had the kitchen make me a half order of vegan paella which was really, really good. Full of all kinds of mushrooms, a cool variety of veggies, truffle oil, etc. My friend had some chicken and seafood dishes that were on the small side but she said they were great.  She still had plenty of room in her gullet to dig into my paella as well. We also got two glasses of sangria that knocked us on our asses as it contained schnapps, wine and brandy. One was enough for each of us. Nice environment too although I am not the fancypants type. It wasn't so loud that we couldn't hold a conversation and we never felt rushed out though we were there for quite a while.
We (3 of us) had lunch a Joya and enjoyed their food, but hated their slow service. In the beginning, we were promptly seated, given the menu's and served water. We started with their Yucca fries, which I found very tasty. They're sweet with a slight hint of salt- not too salty- which I loved! The Yucca fries were accompanied with a thick chipotle aioli- amazing! The drinks and the yucca fries came within 10 minutes. I ordered the Ajillo Martinated Chicken Sandwich- it came with avocado, oaxacan cheese and chipotle aioli! Yum, it was absolutely delicious! Mmmm.. it was so good, I didn't mind eating a messy sandwich and getting avocado and aioli all over the place (cheeks, tablecloth and pants)! So delicious! However, I was fairly disappointed when I saw I had a green salad accompanying my sandwich and not fries! I was disappointed! I tried waiting for my waiter (10 minutes) and after I noticed that he never stopped by to see how the food was tasting, I decided to eat my sandwich. The salad was flavorless- no dressing! The open faced steak sandwich and the walu fish sandwich were ordered and both looked good. I know my cousin and her fiance enjoyed their dishes. The food was scrumptious. However, the service was disgustingly slow. It took our waiter approximately 30 minutes (we were all done eating) to come back to our table and offer us dessert- after we had asked for the check. We only saw the waiter to place the order and pick up the check. That's it- no in betweens and no "how's the food." I will probably return, but I will make sure I get another waiter. Great food, but slow service.
Made reservations on a whim for a last minute date night. I pass this restaurant everytime I'm headed to work and it always looks like a party, so it made me want to try it out. Used open table to make our 9:30 PM reservations which was super easy and the hostess sat us no problem. The service wasn't the best..the waiter seemed eager to get us in and out, and when we asked for suggestions on what to order he wasn't very helpful. He also added that "the kitchen was going to close so we better decide what we want soon". Uhhh why let customers make a 9:30 reservation then? I was sad that we couldn't order the paella since it takes a while to prepare, but we ended up ordering the yucca fries (alright), sliders (hubby loved these), the tacos (nothing special), and the goat cheese (not a fan). The winners for the night were the drinks and dessert. White peach sangria and some pineapple cake with coconut ice cream..super YUM! I'd come back for those two things and to try the paella.
If it was possible, I'd give 0.5 stars. I recently came back to California, and I'd been excited to go back to Joya. I'd been singing the churros and sangria somg for so long. When I was finally able to drag my sister there, we had to wait over 30 min on a slow Tuesday early evening for a menu when we were at the LOUNGE before my sister walked over to the front and asked for a menu. The girls at the front pointed her to the end of the bar, telling her to take the menu herself. My sister walked over  and grabbed 2 menus and we perused through it, still happily hungry and eager to order a lot. The waitress took care of each of the parties on either side of us, but completely ignored us each time we tried to order. We had to flag down one of the guys from the kitchen to get some water that we had asked for twice already, and waited 20 minutes for. Ordering itself was difficult when the waitress believes you aren't a living, breathing, and eating entity. We had to order from someone else because we kept getting completely ignored. It was almost amazing to watch her completely ignore a group RIGHT in front of her as she made small talk with each of the groups on either side of us. We ordered a pitcher of the red sangria, and one dish of the chorizo corndogs. They were both good (I will forever lose my respect for you if you can't do corndogs), but we were ready to do a lot of damage after a long workday. We'd gotten off early on purpose to eat and drink. Girl's gotta destress. The service could have been endured if it didn't take so much effort to get anyone's attention. It took so much out of us to order just that one drink and dish. We wanted to stay and chat, but it's just too much when you have to work to just order your food. I'd already come to Joya a few times for business, and have never had such horrible service. My sister and I have both been in the service industry, so we always give more than 20% tip, but giving any kind of tip was actually painful this time. She absolutely refuses to ever go back again, and I can never find a good enough reason to subject myself to that kind of service again.
I've tried almost all the food here, but these five stars are for only one thing: the churros! I... Read more 
Great place + great food = FUN
I didn't expect a world-class dining experience but the menu looked stellar and the place was busy. Unfortunately, there were several dishes I asked about receiving with no cilantro... and I could not be accommodated. Translation: the food isn't made to order. Cilantro wasn't listed as an ingredient on the menu in anything I asked about btw, it was just magically included. With the number of people who detest this herb, it still blows my mind that there are places who can't make a dish to-order. On top of that, the service was cool at best. After we got our food we did not see our waitress again and had to flag someone down to pay our check so we could leave. The open-faced hangar steak sandwich was the only thing I could order and it had good flavor but had to be sent back b/c the egg was a little on the raw side. I like a runny egg but the whites should never be CLEAR. Ick.
If your looking for an awesome place with good food, people, and many small, amazing dishes, ranging anywhere from delicious fish tacos to succulent sliders, go to Joya.
We had a variety of small dishes that from their description sounded delicious -- roasted bone marrow; cheese plate; sauteed pea greens; seared scallops; chorizo empanadas; snapper ceviche -- but none were particularly great. The best were the seared scallops, the most disappointing the bone marrow (very little actual marrow, lots of bread crumbs). It also wasn't inexpensive (~$85 for the above plus one sangria and tax/tip). Service was friendly and pretty attentive, though the restaurant was pretty busy (Thursday evening) and this was reflected in the service. Overall, I'd suggest skipping the restaurant; there are numerous better restaurants in the area at the same price-point.
A few of us from work decided to come here for some drinks at their bar on a Friday night. Wow, this place is hopping! Luckily the bar has 2 sides and there are multiple couches in their lounge area. We were only able to grab 3 seats at the bar for the 6 people that showed up which is unfortunate. I split a pitcher of sangria with a shot of rum with 3 gals and it was really tasty. Not too sweet (we tried the white sangria and it was incredibly sweet). I also ordered the ahi tartar and the yukon potato fries. The ahi tartar was very good. Light and fresh. The potato chips were a great texture and compliment to the ahi. Would definitely recommend it!. The yukon potato fries were baked just right. I enjoy the chipotle sauce. It's loud and crowded on Fridays. Just an FYI. Other than that, the food was good and the drinks were good.
The reason for my visit was to spend time with coworkers during happy hour. First negative on my list was that according to them, they don't have a happy hour. Which I've never run across before at an establishment with a bar! So that straight off, was minus points. The atmosphere inside was nice. There were dark colored walls and lounge/bar tables and seating that included very comfortable wrap around couches for larger groups to socialize, eat, and drink around-- which was great. The servers were relatively attentive to us, giving us enough eye contact so that we could catch their attention to order. The servers were also very polite and friendly. Prices were definitely on the expensive side. Dishes/drinks that were memorable that I tried included: *The chicken tostada: Verdict: Kudos to this dish. The long: Was simply amazing. I kept raving about it to everyone in my group which prompted us to order it again, and again... I think we ended up ordering it 4 times while we were there! The tostada had several positive traits. One, it seemed more worth its price tag that a lot of other dishes-- where its size alone was generous. It was a miniature mountain of meat, veggies, and other good stuff on a tostada. Two, it was SO flavorful, but not overwhelming at all. Three, the meat was so juicy, it tasted like it had been stewing for hours and had absorbed deep and rich flavors in the process along with tons of broth. *Calamari: Verdict: Disappointing. The long: This dish is usually hard to mess up in my mind. But this calamari was definitely not good. The texture was right, but that was about it. The big thing that got me was that it tasted like there wasn't a single grain of salt in it. It was very bland. And I tend to have a low salt threshold, meaning I'm pretty flexible with seasoning level, even if it was lightly salted or over-salted  for that matter, I would have been fine with it. But this dish somehow didn't register at all. I didn't taste anything. The batter seemed to have no seasonings whatsoever. So this dish was disappointed. And I love calamari. :( *Twin sisters (drink): Verdict: Delicious. The long: There is no long. Just a great flavor combination. And it definitely is flavorful, yet not overwhelming at all.
This place was amazing. From the food, to the ambiance, to the cute bartenders, I don't even know where to begin. We started off with a pitcher of the White Peach house-made Sangria made with fresh fruit and sauvignon blanc wine, which was $24. We were told this was the best bang for our buck (as opposed to ordering individual Sangrias for the the three of us), and it definitely was. We thought that it would be like how you order milkshakes at a diner and they pour whatever will fit in your glass and give you the remainder in a pitcher, but we had 3 full Sangrias PLUS a full pitcher. Needless to say, we all got a pretty good buzz. (Even though we had 5 different tapas.) It tasted a little like one of those Dole fruit cups and sure enough, (after a little convincing) one of the bartenders told us that they were indeed made with canned fruit. Delicious! The tapas we ordered were: Mango Chili Red Snapper Ceviche $9.50 This was really fresh and tasty with what looked like plantain chips. Ahi Tuna Tartare $13.50 avocado, jicama, lemon, serrano chili essence This was DELICIOUS. Mostly because I'm a sucker for raw tuna but also because  they quite simply did it right. Raw tuna and avocado are two of my favorite things. Mexican Empanadas $9 Two spiced pork & green aji sauce empanadas These were really yummy too. A little spicy but not too spicy for my taste. (Usually I have pretty low tolerance for spicy foods.) They were hot at first and I felt like I was going to burn my mouth (much like I do whenever I eat Pizza Rolls) so I set it down after the first bite when I saw the steam coming out..I was just so excited! I am also now realizing that they gave us 4 instead of 2 (and I don't think they charged us extra). Probably because there were 3 of us. (But weird they didn't just give us 3..I ended up eating the extra one, of course..faaaaaat.) Kobe Beef Mini-Burgers $11 three mini-burgers, oaxaca cheese, soria pork chorizo, chipotle mayonnaise These were delish! Perfect little nugget sliders. Macaroni and Cheese $9 jalapeno & smoked mozzarella cheese, crispy serrano ham This was super tasty too. I'm lactose intolerant so I was wary of over-indulging but surprisingly, this didn't affect me at all. (And I had quite a bit..I just thought, "Oh well, it's so good so fuck it") This might sound weird, but it had a coffee-like taste to it..in a good way! (The others with me did not agree so take this with a grain of salt.) Either way, super yummy. Overall, I loved this place and will definitely be returning. Amazing!
Came here for happy hour a few times, always left with a smile on face. Love their drinks (not water down, just nice) and love their food (fried yucca is a must-have). Will come back again soon.
Good food. Great service. Really nice ambience.
Great place to have a cocktail and eat tapas (Lounge area). The tapas sampler plate is perfect to complement a strong drink. The white sangria is delicious too. The only issue there is to be lucky enough to find enough room to seat with all your friends. Try not to go with groups larger than 4 people.
This place is a thumbs up. You can sit outside, inside/outside, or inside. Nice decor, nice people. During the meal, I dropped my fork and it was picked up and replaced within 30 seconds. They have a good winelist, and set of good choices on the menu. I had a malbec, the kobe beef mini-burgers (fantastic), and the braised pork shoulder (caramelized onions, chipotle pork jus, coconut rice & house-made tortilla) The pork was perfectly cooked and accompanied by a barbeque sauce that was not sweet, yet not sour. The rice was fluffy and had a seasoned sauce that was pleasant. I recommend that you try this place.
3.5 stars.  food here is better than i expected.  i started at the lounge and shared crab cakes, mushroom empanadas, and the goat cheese.  the empanadas were the best out of the 3.  i got the desert heat drink, which was really good. then we sat down, and i had the halibut entree, which came w/ a nice salad on the side of charred corn, greens, and cherry tomatoes.  the portion was actually quite large. this is a nice place to share some tapas, b/c the tapas menu is big, and there's something for everyone.
Let me tell you a story of two young ladies out on the town that decided that they would splurge on a nice meal, (instead of snacking on discount cheap fried foods at a happy hour @ Nolas)......Walking into Joya we were greeted by  5 hostesses, which may or may not be too many? lol...They said the wait was 30 mins, and we were not in any rush, and the bar was calling our name--so, we decided to wait it out with a nice glass of vino. We sat down and a group of nice business men decided to converse with us, (which we then did not need to empty our wallets of any cash) Lame? No, smart! =) They were seated about 30 minutes into our wait, which i found rather odd, since we had been waiting an extra 10 minutes before them...I told my friend, we need to see how much longer this wait is going to be..She agreed, so we walked back up to the 5 hostesses, and they then told us ( empty eyed and dismayed) that we would need to wait another 30 minutes. Flabbergasted and pissed off, I then turned to my friend who immediately asked for a manager. She expressed to him how we were told the wait would be 30 minutes by the team of hostesses, and now the wait was an extra 30 minutes! He told us not to worry and that he'd get a table for us right away!--I peered across the street and added my little dig, " It's ok, we can just go to Pasta? I have never had any problems with them, and they have great food!", He looked at me and said, " Oh no no no, come here, we have a table..We were seated right away, and after asking for plain water, I was then greeted with a tall bottle of VOSS, "Um, I did NOT order this.." The waiter then told me, it was on the house! Not only were we brought free superb drinks, our meal ended up being 53% off! All in all, this venture turned out to be very well worth the wait! Sometimes places end up surprising me, this was a rare occasion that deserved to be yelped about! Joya, you still have my heart! Some times bitching goes a long way =)
OK, I finally went to Joya. Having read quite a few mixed reviews and hesitated due the number of mediocre reviews. We decided since they had a french chef cooking Spanish and Latin tapas, this could be an interesting combination, but no, please find a Spanish chef to bring up the taste. So, we went and were first quite impressed with the look and feel. The hostesses were fairly bland with sterile looks on their faces, although a small smile tried to persevere. We ordered yucca fries, Paella Croquetas, scallops, chicken skewers, macaroni and cheese and cerviche. Drinks. First of all the cerviche was quite tough and had too strong a fishy smell. Yucca fries were too greasy as if reusing the oil for frying. The croquetas were ok although beyond the deep fried rice, we ere looking for some hint of paella ingredients like sausage or other meats, but no... rice deep fried in the same strange tasting greasy oil as the yucca fries. Mac and cheese were decent. The chicken skewers showed some promise if they hadn't been burned too much on one side. The feel for all of us afterwards was the same greasy feel one gets from a fast food meal. The drinks were very good. The wait staff were generally nice although when we mentioned the food was somewhat mediocre, our waiter shrug the shoulders and walked away, but really nice otherwise. We will not be going back, instead Reposados on Hamilton is a much better bet even that being a Mexican restaurant, their flavors are more aligned with traditional Spanish tastes and the ambiance is very cool with really nice staff!
The PERFECT place to grab dinner and drinks with friends. My college roomies and were looking for a place for our "catch-up" dinner and decided on Joya in DT palo alto. *Note: MAKE RESERVATIONS. The place was packed for a Wednesday night. I called earlier in the day and didn't get a reservation until 8:30. On to the food... Ahi tuna tartare - Standard tuna tartare served with chips. A good, refreshing, light starter that's easy to share. Ceviche with sea bass - arguably one of my favorite dishes of the night. The ceviche was also light and refreshing, and soooooo tasty. This dish was also served with chips. YUM. Mushroom empanada - second favorite dish of the night. This dish came with two small empenadas and an ammmmazzinngg dipping sauce. It was nice to have a warm tapas after the first two cold ones Yucca fries - (is this pronounced yoo-ka or yuck-a?) anyways. This was a standard fry dish. Tasty, but nothing too spectacular Churros with chocolate dipping sauce - YUM! I hate donuts/churros but this was so fresh and delicious Pineapple cake with coconut ice cream - perfectly tropical. Great sweet bite to end the meal We got both of the white and red sangria as well. The consensus was that the white sangria was better, though the red wasn't bad as well. Overall the bill came out to be around $30 a person, which wasn't bad considering we were all stuffed at the end and decently buzzed. Great dinner!
I remember when this place first opened. I've been here a couple times, but never willingly.  It was usually for a girls dinner or for someone's birthday.  Ambiance is perfect for that. Although it looks so nice and would be a GREAT place to take a girl out on a date, it is SO expensive.  My friend and I decided to split 3 chicken skewers or something like that.  It was $8.  Our waiter asked us if we wanted an extra chicken skewer so that we'd each have two.  We said yes.  When we got the bill, that one extra chicken skewer was $5.  Ummmm yeah.  The food was delicious, but... really??  We would have just ordered another plate of 3 chicken skewers for $8 if that ONE extra was $5. I mean, food was good though.  Just know what you're getting yourself into.  OUr waiter I remember was REALLY hot and super friendly, but just SO slow and gave us terrible service. One of our friends had to leave early so she paid her part of the bill when she left and   tipped for us.  The waiter then gives us our check, but fails to tell us that our friend has already tipped, so we almost tip him again so that he'd get 2x the amount.  And this was a large sum.  We're not just being stingy!! When our friend texted us and told us she had already tipped, we were super annoyed, but figured shit out.  Sighh.
One of my favorite restaurants in the area.  Great food, usually order tapas, lots of energy.  I love to frequent this place.
My favorite spot for large groups in Palo Alto. - Go big on tapas. Skip dessert. - Red sangria over white sangria - Poutine. Burgers. Brussel sprouts. You want them.
I'd come back for a few drinks and appetizers after a long week of work. Although it wasn't too crowded at 5:30, this place does get crowded around 6 and later. Luckily we were able to save a few stools at the bar until our co workers trickled in. The pitcher of sangria was refreshing. If you like really sweet drinks, you should get a sample of their white sangria. Both were fresh and had pieces of fruits. I highly recommend getting their ahi tartar. Our bartender recommended this to us so we gave it a try with the yucca fries. Both were delicious with our sangrias. The ahi tartar was so fresh and the chips it came with it was very delicate and crispy.
My wife and I journeyed to Joya last week for our date night; we had heard some mixed reviews, but the place looked great aesthetically so we made a reservation. First off, the ladies at the front (hostesses? managers?) were awful. They were not very courteous, helpful or nice. When I called one of them to confirm our reservation and get an estimation of if they'd be running behind, I was met with a snarky, vague response of "well, your reservation is at this time, so I don't know what you're asking." Luckily, while we waited for our table, the bartender was fantastic and helped drown our irritation with ice-cold cocktails. (I had a lovely mojito and my wife had some mixed drink that I cannot recall.) Once we sat down at our table, everything was par. The server was relatively prompt and attentive. We had the guac as a starter and the sauteed camarones and jerk chicken for meals. The shrimp was great. Everything on that particular dish was tasty and the flavors complementary. The jerk chicken, however, was left wanting. One, it's half of a chicken...so you're stuck cutting/gnawing/working to get manageable bites. Two, while the flavor was okay, it certainly did not warrant a price point above $20. Overall, I'd consider Joya an average dining experience. Unfortunately, due to the poor host service coupled with food that does not warrant the pricing, I have to slap a "2-star" down.
I was pleased with both the food and the service. Our waitress (Heather) was never intrusive but always seemed to be there. From the minute we walked in and sat down she was attentive and our first glass of Prosecco arrived in record time. So, to the most important part of every meal...the food. I loved everything (except the platanos fritos) and I ate way too much! The only reason I didn't like the fritters is because they were too sweet for my taste. The mushroom empanadas, paella croquetas, and the ahi tuna tartare were all delicious! I could have made a meal out of those appetizers and a couple glasses of wine, but oh no I couldn't stop there! I had to try the wild mushroom paella. So my husband and I dived in to do some damage. I am sorry to say we were not able to finish it and it was my favorite dish of the evening! I will definitely go back, only this time I will order the paella first and savor every delectable mouthful!
For a hip, swanky Latin American tapas restaurant, Joya isn't too bad, but I think their food could be much, much better.  It has so much potential, but their tapas was pretty weak compared to other food choices on University Avenue. MINI BURGERS (3/5):  They're so cute, but when we got them, the meat was a little tough. CALAMARI (3.5/5):  Not as fresh as the ones I've had in Hawaii, but these calamaries were battered and fried perfectly.  The batter didn't fall off when I dipped it into the yummy aioli and it was delightfully crunchy and seasoned well. GUAC & CHIPS (4/5):  Loved the variety of chips (banana, sweet potato and taro).  The guac was smooth and freshly made.  Definitely a crowd pleaser. TUNA TAR TAR (3.5/5): Fresh tuna with a citrus lime marinade.  Loved it!  I think I might like Tamarine's tuna tar tar a little more because of the chunks (literally, CHUNKS) of fresh sashimi slices and cubes they put in their tuna tar tar. SANGRIA (4/5):  The sangria at Joya is solid and packed with delicious fruit that's perfect for absorbing the sweet and tangy wine.  We had red sangria, which was delicious. The white sangria is equally as good and a little sweet too. TIPS: - Make reservations.  This place, along with Tamarine, Evvia and Three Seasons, are the popular, higher-end restaurants on the University Ave. Strip, so you'll have to be aggressive about making an appointment for seating. - Great for private parties and events!
Ive always enjoyed my meals here and the mushroom empanadas and Brussels sprouts with bacon are amazing. But, I'll let you in on a little secret: the reason I like this place is because the owners (who also own La strada) are so generous with local non-profits. They cater for free at events. I went to a fund raising event over the summer for Deborah's Palm and they catered it all for free! It was so good and good hearted :)
Besides the annoying waiter who was extremely rude and unpleasant, Joya was a pretty decent place! Not just any place where you can walk in with just jeans and a t-shirt mind you, there were plenty of people who dressed up and it might be a good idea for you to dress up a little more formal than on the casual side (which i clearly didn't do -_- ahhahah) The ambience in really nice, as in all the other reviews but its also really dark. DO NOT TAKE FLASH PICTURES -_- unless you want all eyes on you (which might be your thing, not mine though especially if you're the girl in jeans and a t-shirt -_- ) The food was also really interestingly good! Although a little on the pricey side and rather small portions, it was good! :) Especially the Yucca fries. oh man.. the yucca fries... SO for 3 people (who were hungry) we ordered the Yucca fries, appetizer sampler, tapas, and the seafood paella. and we didn't even finish. the rude male waiter(i think the only non mexican waiter) said that it could only feed 2 people? yeah right. we were stuffed by the end. and i eat a LOT. The yucca fries i already mentioned are amazing. They're like these potato fries but MORE DELICIOUS-ER. oh man. crunchy and delicious on the outside and super soft and delicious on the inside. so in total. it was freakin delicious. The appetizer sampler was ok too but i don't think it was worth how much we paid. i for how much it was (i remember it was in the $20~ range) but it was just eh. not too much and not as great. I would've gotten like 3 more yucca fries order instead of that one appetizer sampler, although they had some good ones like the chorizo and the ceviche. The tapas were just ok. My friend from colombia liked it but she said she didn't like how it had cheese on it. The seafood paella was freakin good. and i just want to make sure you readers understand something. i definitely HATE seafood, but i had to get this dish cuz the rude waiter (who did something right and helpful for once) recommended it and my friends like seafood. And man oh man. it was delicious! :) I really enjoyed it and so did my friends! Total came out to be less than less than $100 for the three of us which isn't bad but the rude waiter totally ruined it for us. We might be back for the yucca fries and perhaps the Paella and the White peach Sangria everyones talking about hahah
I was in the worst possible mood when I came here.  I was PMS-ing and it was too late to cancel.  Came in and everyone were really friendly so I managed a smile.  The people at the front knew instantly where my girlfriends were seated so they led me there. The place is classy and the ambiance really fun. There were 9 girls and they gave us the special corner at the back of the room which was pseudo-private - dim lighting, really intimate and quiet.  Because we were a big group, they assigned 2-3 waiters to serve us.  The birthday girl felt really special.  She has been there before so she briefed us on the menu.  We ordered the ahi tuna, some kobe sliders,  soft tacos, chicken BBQ and a few others.  All the tapas were really good.  The only reason why I gave it 4-stars is because the waiter forgot my sparkling water and I did remind him twice.  He was probably a little distracted cause there were 9 very good-looking girls yapping at him at the same time;) The highlight of the night was the vegetarian paella.  Oh my god, it was perfect.  The veggies were still fresh and not overcooked.  I think my girlfriend ordered the large one for all 9 of us and we didn't even finish it.  The paella is a must-try if you are a big group.  If you are having paella, take it easy on the tapas/appetizers - they will fill you up.  My girlfriends loved all the desserts.  I skipped it coz I ate half of the paella (lol). After dinner, we moved to the lounge area and shared a table with 3 Italian guys.  I really like the atmosphere here - the music was nice but not obtrusive.  We had a great conversation just trying to catch up.  At the end of night, I felt great.  As a matter of fact, I didn't want to leave.  So the moral of the story is if you feel shitty, come here and it will make you feel better about yourself!
Came here a few times and everything is pretty tasty, just a tad pricy, but what tapas place isn't? fried calamari with chile salt with cilantro aioli- this was ok, a little on the bland side without the lemon or the aioli. chorizo corndogs venezuelan slaw, mustard cheese- not a corndog fan, but these were pretty decent and interesting with chorizo. charcuterie assortment serrano ham, lomo embuchado, salchichon, soria pork chorizo, served with pickled nopales- this was tasty. ceviche- sea bass traditional, coconut rock shrimp, or mango chili red snapper- tried all three and the best was probably the two fish ones. peruvian spiced ahi tuna nicoise persian cucumbers, tomatoes, wild arugula, spanish olives, fried soft boiled egg- small salad serving with a few slices of seared tuna and a over fried egg, wish the egg was more runny and a little more greens to enjoy, but overall, the taste was good. Sangria is always good, too much ice i think though. Overall, service is pretty good, food is pretty tasty and prices are normal. Been back a few times, so i'll be here again.
We decided to spontaneously go to a nice dinner the other night.  We got two drinks- the red pineapple sangria and the mango mojito.  I liked the sangria a lot.  I love fruit so I'm glad they added a lot of fruit in it.  The mojito was a little strong but still good. We decided to just share all of the tapas.  They were able to accommodate us and make the meal vegetarian friendly :).  We started off with the deviled eggs which were delicious.  There were two types: one had capers on it and had a smokey taste, the other one had chives and sour cream on it.  It was probably my favorite tapas dish.  We also had the Cauliflower- potato soup, which was creamy and delicious.  In particular, I really liked the microcilantro they added to the soup. We also got the mac and cheese, the fried plantains, and the paellas.  The paellas weren't too special, just fried rice and cheese, but the sauce that came with it was good.  The fried plantains were absolutely delicious.  They came with oxacaan cheese which added a nice subtle cheesey flavor to the dish.  I really wish I had more room for the plantains.  The mac and cheese was okay.  I wish they used spicer jalepenos. We also got desert: the sorbet.  We got three generous scoops and they were all delicious: guava, pineapple, and passionfruit. I really enjoyed my meal at Joya.  Service was also excellent; the waiter was there when we needed him but otherwise stayed behind the scenes.
Service was borderline ok.  A couple of times our server left before we had finished speaking. The food however was very good.  The potatoes in the red chili sauce with cream were excellent.  The brussel sprouts were minimalist and delicious.  The tostadas were ok.  The short rib tacos (with corn tortillas) were very flavorful.  And the classic paella was excellent (and huge).  Overall, the food outweighed the service.  I'll be back.
Outside seating, awesome looking lounge, and of course the white sangria is a must!  The food was ikay....but will be back for sangria for sure on a nice warm day in Palo Alto.
Went here for my birthday last year and was so happy about this choice over the other restaurants downtown. The tapas were delicious and so was the dessert. Since it was my birthday our server gave us a free dessert. We ended up getting the Yucca fries, calamari, dungeness crab cakes, grilled chicken skewers, and the ceviche, and the jerk-marinated fulton valley chicken. Enjoyed all of it especially the jerk-marinated fulton valley chicken, it was juicy and flavorful. I can't remember the name of the dessert we ordered, it was mint ice-cream with something. I remember I did like it :). Best part of lunch was that my daughter slept the whole time. Wish their pricing was more reasonable so we can go here more often.
Joya is my new favorite tapas restaurant. The stylish lounge is a great place for a White Peach Sangria; this luscious beverage will make you forget your bad day at work. The ambiance is lovely, the service is excellent and the food is mouthwatering. Typically you order 2-3 small plates per person. Here's what I like to get when there's two of us for dinner: 1. ahi tuna tartare: it's the restaurants most popular dish. The fresh tuna is served on top of a delicious mixture of avocado, jicama, lemon and Serrano chili. 2.  Dungeness crab cakes served with a ginger chipotle aioli. 3. warmed herbed goat cheese served in a pool of fire-roasted roma tomato sauce 4. sauteed Brussels sprouts with bacon and lemon zest (vegetarians can request no bacon!) 5. the charcuterie assortment which includes a delicious variety of four gourmet shaved meats including Serrano ham and lomo embuchado. The other "most popular" Latin tapa dishes are: kobe mini beef burgers, braised short rib tacos and the sauteed gambas. Bonus: you can call your parents after dinner and tell them you finally ate your Brussels sprouts! Of course, when you sautee a vegetable with bacon--it's guaranteed to be heavenly. Joya is a perfect choice for 2 to 6 people. Make reservations.
Another great experience last night at Joya! Even tough the restaurant was almost full, the hostess gave us the choice of several tables to choose from! Our waitress who was from Poland was very friendly, all smile and the service was spot on! The bus boys consitently refilled our water glasses, the Manager came by to check on us and the food was amazing!! Chef fabrice is very talented and we really enjoy his cooking!  All the staff smiles and that only tells you a lot about a restaurant that is well run and Joya definitely is in that class !!
A great experience on saturday night at Joya.. From the hostess who saved  us a specific table we... Read more 
Joya was one of the few restaurants that were open on Christmas Eve in Palo Alto. Just because of this they deserve one additional star! We were three ladies that did not have a big appetite for dinner last night, so we only ordered their small plate dishes to share. We had: Braised short rib tacos - three mini tacos that were perfect for the three of us to share. Loved the short ribs that were braised to fork tender and the sauce was very good. Seared bay scallop with corns - yum! Local sea bass ceviche - very fresh sea bass with good relish Wild arugula, quinoa, butternut squash salad - a big plate of peppery, fresh arugula with small-cubed squash and quinoa that is enough for three to share. This was a little light on dressing so was a little dry, but a healthful and delightful dish none the less. Loved to see quinoa in this dish as it is a very healthful grain to eat. We each ordered a drink with either coconut milk, mango or pineapple and they were all good. It is a little on the pricey side but given that this is a higher end restaurant I think it is reasonable. Will come back to try their main course dishes.
Great atmosphere for a date, business dinner, or night out with your girlfriends.  The furniture is modern and lounge-like with  black and amber colored decor. Service was attentive.  Food came out slow.  Our busser with the braided pony tail was on it!  He filled our water, never letting the level sink below half empty, he cleared our plates immediately, always asking beforehand, and he folded my napkin when I left and came back to the table. Food was savory and delicious! Chopped Romaine Salad: ($9.50) So good!  It was limey and the vinaigrette was light and gently tossed with the lettuce.  There were rows of charred corn cut off the cob and crispy pieces of shaved ham to add some saltiness.  A refreshing start. Charcuterie Assortment: ($12) Yuck.  Our second course that we picked did not live up to the first.  The meat assortment was salty and gamey and didn't pair well with the fresh aftertaste of a summer salad.  This is something you order at a gastropub to go with your Belgian beer. Seabass: ($28) Cooked perfectly.  The fish was white, firm like halibut, and not fatty as salmon, moist, with a mild flavor.  The sauce was yummy.  I got sauteed spinach with cubes of bacon and raisins in it instead of the carbs. Bacon Wrapped Pork Tenderloin: ($20) Awesome.  The meat was moist and tender and its juices melted with the salt and fat from the bacon. Nice ambiance.  I can't wait to come back for my friend's birthday dinner!
Great ambience - would come here for drinks anytime. Food is good - we enjoyed the gambas and paella.  Not necessarily outstanding though.
One random night my friends and I decided to come to Joya for tapas. We had a 8:30 reservation but didn't get seated until 9:00pm since it was a Friday night. When we finally got seated, our serve (John) was extremely helpful and knowledgeable about the menu. I told him I wanted something vegetarian and he helped me decide on the paella croquetas and the mexican mushroom empanadas. I didn't really notice the cheese in the paella croquetas but it did come with an amazing cheese sauce of some sort. The mushroom empandas are one of my favorite vegetarian dishes here. They were not too crispy and fresh out the oven (or wherever fabulous empandas are made). The only recommendation I would make is to dip them in the sauce that  the paella croqetas come with. I didn't really like the sweet lemon? sauce it came with. Service was 5 stars! We were at our table for 2 hrs and John never got impatient or tried to kick us out. In fact, as my friends kept oogling over him and stalking facebook to find his look-alike or long lost twice, he came over and gave us complimentary churros with chocolate sauce. How can I not give this place 4 stars!
One of my favorite places to go eat downtown. I love the ambiance and the great service. Last time I went here, I ordered the salmon and my friend got the swordfish, both were delicious! Definitely a great place to go drinking with your friends on a Friday night, with its young and modern feel, unlike the other bars on University ave.
Joya is a hip and friendly new restaurant with a great wine list and a delicious menu. Get the hanger steak...money!! The homemade guacamole with taro root, plantain, sweet potato and yam chips are a treat as well. Britta the manager was especially kind and helpful.
White and red sangria available - Red is sweeter with mandarin oranges.VS. White has peaches but taste a little more bitter compared to the red but the peaches are freaking delicious! - Both were pretty light in alcohol content Came here with a large party and they seem pretty strict on how many people u can have in the private dining area - believe its for fire safety. Tapas Their KOBE BEEF SLIDERS were super juicy and worth every bite. comes with 3 sliders.  I think this was the one tapa that we put top of the list per the rest of the items we orders. Their CEVICHE SAMPLER ($20) was good too! The ingredients taste fresh and each one varied in their particular way. 3 different kinds: local sea bass, coconut rock shrimp, and mango chili red snapper. Comes with chips of ..different potatoes Desserts Don't bother with the hot chocolate with churros - its nothing special. However, the JOYA PATRON XO FLAN ($8) = BOMB.COM.. U get flan made with patron AND cognac that makes your taste bud tingle with the complex flavor. Pretty small portion though so spoon feed yourself slowly, it's about the circumference of a petrie dish. Nice lounge and sophisticated feel to the place, fancy enough to wear dressy casual .
Finally made it to Joya, I've been eying this place since they opened..finally made it in!! And I hate myself for waiting soo long! Our waitress was Cory! She is awesome!!! Started off with white peach sangria! Very yummy. Chunks of peaches and other fruits.. And since tapas is the name of the game, that what we had! Ahi Tuna Tartare-so fresh and avocado gave it a nice kick of flavor. Kobe beef mini burgers- aaxaca cheese, sorta pork chorizo, chipotle mayo, made each bite juicy and yummy! Braided short rib tacos- jicama salsa, horseradish cream on a mini handmade tortilla.. Seared bay scallops with grilled corn- roasted vanilla beurre blanc, smoked sea salt, ruffled essence. A MUST HAVE!!!** And for desert Cory recommended: Oreos Fritos- deep fried Oreos served with whip cream and house made mint ice cream... Over all every single bite  was devoured throughout entire meal!! Great service, great ambiance, and spectacular food!! Can't wait to go back!!! * Thanks Cory for an awesome experience!
I ate here today with my cousin. We ordered tapas: the sliders, ahi tuna tartar, the scallops and corn with truffle oil and the short rib tacos. We loved the ahi tuna tartar and the scallops and corn with truffle oil. The short rib tacos and the sliders were ok, nothing too spectacular. All in all the food was really good service was okay, it took a while for them to give us the check and for us to pay. We ate outside so I can't really say how the restaurant  looks inside, though.
For a fabulous Sunday brunch, or a "night on the town", Joya is an excellent choice in Downtown Palo Alto.  Their Latin tapas do not disappoint.  If i had only one word to say it would be "creative".  oh, and "delicious" but that's two words.  Oh and as long as i'm at it -  here's three more words - truffled.deviled.eggs.  Joya has a spirited, exhuberant environment with lush leather seating and can be a great opportunity for people watching, if you're not too busy diving into the amazing kobe beef sliders  or sipping on a marvelous ginger lemon drop.  Just make sure you have enough room on your credit card to go for it and try as many dishes as incite your appetite. ;-)
Joya is one of my favorite places to go for Tapas.  Although it doesn't feel as authentic as Iberia in Menlo Park, the dishes are delicious, there are plenty of vegetarian options, and the atmosphere is chic. The bar side of the restaurant can get crowded but the seating is comfortable and the bartender is kind and helpful. Both the bar side and the restaurant side have a semi-private room shielded by curtains.  If your group is large enough, you may get seated in these rooms, making the experience comfortable and memorable! There are many great dishes to try here but I recommend the patatas bravas!
Trendy, chic decor. Delectable menu. Impressive wine list. Top 40 music. Joya is a must for dining. A few friends and I tried this place out around Thanksgiving time since we were starving and had all heard great things about it. Even though it was a Friday night, we didn't have to wait. The server was very helpful with menu suggestions and she was extremely patient and attentive throughout our meal. I ordered a glass of the Joseph Carr Cab and everyone else ordered the sangria, which they raved about. The food itself was excellent! We ordered the Paella Croquetas, Mini Burgers, and Chipotle Chicken Tostadas (only 2 of us actually ate food so this was more than enough) and we wolfed everything down. The burgers were perfectly done, the tostadas were scrumptious, and the croquetas were addictingly delicious. We took the plunge with dessert and ordered Oreos Fritos. I am not sure if I was just full or the fact they were deep fried but I wasn't a fan of them. Next time I'm going to try the churros. I will give this place an A+ in putting you in the mood to go out and dance afterward. With the techno music and top hits you hear in the clubs, their playlist makes you want to go to the clubs. Needless to say we went out once we left the restaurant. We will be coming back soon.
Nice atmosphere especially on warmer days when they open up the glass to University Avenue, but all their food is mediocre and overpriced. After years of passing by and feeling good vibes, I vow never to return unless someone else is paying for me. Nothing really sets it apart from many other similar joints in downtown Palo Alto.
I like this place a lot for brunch or dinner. I love getting their tapas! Their drinks are also really good.. the bartender makes them nice and strong! The atmosphere is always nice and open. I like it when they open up the sides so that you can get a full view of the outside. As far as food goes... i love the following tapa plates: kobe beef sliders, platanos, short rib tacos, guacamole & chips, truffled deviled eggs, ahi tuna tartare, and sauteed mushrooms. The rest of the tapas plates are OK. My least favorite ones are the patatas bravas and the yucca fries. I have yet to try their full dinner meal. For dessert.. I highly recommend the fried oreos and the churros. As far as drinks go... you can't go wrong with their sangria and mojitos!
I really like this place and am starting to think I should become a regular.  The food is quite good, though on the expensive side for the amount you get.  But then, so many "fancy" restaurants are like that, I can't really knock them too much for that.  What I like here, though, is the atmosphere.  It's such a cool space and the three times I've been here, the staff have all been very good each time.  And last time we went, we arrived just as the kitchen was closing, but they didn't ever rush us and even let us order the paella, which takes 45 minutes to prepare. Also, it seems to be the place to see and be seen in Palo Alto these days, as it's always full of beautiful people, both staff and customers.  It's definitely a great place to go people watching if you don't mind lightening your wallet to do so.  But, you can also go to just to the lounge side and eat the tapas for a delicious meal without spending so much.  This works out well, as I find the crowd more interesting in the lounge anyhow.  There isn't much for standing room, but the way the tables and seating are arranged, you often end up sharing a table with another group, which usually leads to some interaction and interesting conversation for sure!
Joya was a joyful as before.  From the fabulous mojitos to the scallops to the pork everything was delish.  Even bravely tried the pea shoots.  At least they were green and healthy, but might pass on those next time.  Great vibe on a Friday night in Palo Alto and tho really busy, our server made us feel special and not rushed.
Came here after a birthday day spa. The place was very fancy however I felt awkward going inside without wearing any makeup because I had facial. We ordered some sangria which was a creeper however they came in a small glass, I could have drank the sangria in one shot. I ordered the pulled pork sandwich with salad on the side and it was pretty descent but difinitely forgettable. Wasn't much of a wow factor for me. The other dishes my girlfriends got looked pretty good though.
I am still SO disappointed that my friend made me leave here without getting a second order of the scallops! I could seriously kill her because I am craving them, they are all I think about now!! Fresh scallops over a bed of white corn and other veggies, so yummy!! The white peach sangria (with extra shot of kettle) was pretty good too. The ambiance is contemporary and really nice and this place is always busy!! We sat outside which was enjoyable on a summer night. Next time I come I'm getting 3 orders of scallops (not kidding) and I definitely want to try to paella
No complaints about the food but service and attitude is terrible. I left my sunglasses on the table on Wednesday evening and went back for them in less than 10 min and they were gone! The general manager, Mike Lowney, took less than 1 min to proclaim they didin't have them and asked for my number and info in case they locate them. I returned the next day and asked for the status along with the name of the employee who cleared our table. I wasn't given the name but one of the staff members offered to look for them (should have happened the night before). Alas,  he was intercepted by  Mike Lowney who claimed that he called earlier in the day (I got not calls) that he didn't find them and when I pointed out that I got no calls from him or the restaurant, he just shrugged his shoulders and claimed that he may have called the wrong number. His facial expressions throughout these interactions pretty much said "I told you I don;t have them. Stop asking me questions and go f##k yourself". Bottomline: Don't leave anything behind. They claim them! Update: They followed up since the review. They didn't find the sunglasses but the prompt followup and the communication is very much appreciated.
This place has a great ambiance, good drinks, but sadly just so so food.  We had a party of four for dinner and ate family style so we could enjoy more of the food options.   The food wasn't bad, just bland and for the price I would have expected a lot better. If you come here for dinner, make reservations and come early because parking can be a hassle if you go during peak hours.   Otherwise I suggest it only for the bar/lounge area.
Came here with my girlfriends hoping to have a great girls' night. Instead we got a waiter who looked like a clueless male model and didn't seem to understand that waiters are there to serve people food and drinks. I felt like I had to speak slowly and repetitively so he could understand that I was ordering a caipirinha. When I finally got it, I was so disappointed because it was in such a tiny glass and filled with more ice cubes than drink. There must have been about 5 milliliters of actual fluid in it and forget about the alcohol because if there was any, I wouldn't have tasted it. He also forgot to bring us an appetizer and someone else ended up having to give it to us after we packed up to leave. It also took an hour for us to get our drinks (there were only 3 of us) and 3 appetizers. Save your money. Never coming here again.
Any nice place in downtown Palo Alto can get crowded and Joya is no exception. The staff is friendly, but aloof.  Food is good, and there's a nice wine selection.  Great "nice" place to go for a drink and appetizers.
Went to Joya the other day to celebrate my birthday, and i have to that the food was terrible and not at ll worth the price.  The service was also terrible, it took them so long to bring the appetizers as well as the main dish. i thought since it was my birthday that they would at least have some special birthday dessert, but that didn't happen.  Never going here again.
I have tried several Tapas places in New York and Philadelphia and this is definitely a great place. I dont recommend coming here for the entrees. My husband and I just enjoy coming here to have some tapas and their sangria or wine. Some of our favorites include the crab cake, ceviche, tuna tartare, chicken skewers and their warmed herbed goat cheese. My husband loves his fish and crab and is very particular about their freshness and the crab cakes he gets here are his favorite in the city. Definitely recommend this place for tapas but not entrees. Come in large groups and njoy.
nice place to go on a date, the atmosphere is good, low music and low lighting. i havent tried their dinner plates yet. My husband and i go mainly for their appetizers and the mixed drinks. cant go wrong with sangria and finger foods.
Joya is located on a pretty busy part of University ave. It's on a corner, and theres some seating outdoors, and seating indoors that look out onto the streets. It's great for a business lunch/dinner or any kind of classy get together. Perfect for 365 days of California weather. The food was great! We had cocktails, and their white peach sangria. The peaches within the jar was marinated overnight, so it's drenched in alcohol! (AWESOME). It's a pretty light drink, and went well with the food. For food selection, there was 3 of us and we went for all tapas. Forget the entree, the tapas will get you full! What we got: -The 3 types of ceviche (probably my favorite of the night.. i love that tangy taste and the fish was good quality fish! -Croquets (comes in 5) - crispy on the outside, dipped in a smoked mozarella sauce! -Truffled deviled eggs with smoked trout caviar (comes in 6) - the size of the egg makes this a good bite size snack. Not too spectacular, but still good -Kobe beef mini-burgers- comes in 3, pretty good sliders, and nice surprise with the added chorizo slice) - Braised short rib tacos (comes in 3) : i liked these, it seemed like homemade tortillas, and the meat was really juicy Make sure you make reservations! Our reservation was for 6:15, and at first we weren't going to go in yet since the restaurant looked pretty empty anyway. But we found out all the tables were reserved, and the wait was already 40 minutes out! Thank goodness we had reservations. The place fills up pretty quickly on a weekday for dinner, I can only imagine how it's like on the weekend!
Joya is a great place to grab a bite and get great service with a fab. wine selection. If you like seafood, the scallops with grilled corn are to DIE for! They drizzle truffle oil in the dish-delish. To finish off your meal, don't forget to try the churros with hot chocolate. The churros are homemade and their perfect with the chocolate dipping sauce. Another thing that I love about Joya is the blues/jazz band they have on the weekends- perfect place for a first time date ;)
You have to try the "truffled deviled eggs with smoked trout caviar" they are to die for...  The whole meal was excellent and the "argentinean-style hanger steak" melted in your mouth. Fantastic meal with wonderful service...
This review is for the lounge- drinks and appetizers. Clientele there is always well dressed and it seems like they get a good after-work crowd. Look for the awkward first dates going on there- always fun to watch. I love the drinks here! One of the rare places that has white sangria year-round! Any other drink I've ordered (names are escaping me- probably something with whiskey or rum) was made well and super yummy as well. I hate to say it but I did not like the food, though  I must say choices are limited for one who doesn't like seafood. The coating of the empanadas made me think they were store-bought or frozen or something and the mushrooms tasted really bitter, plus the bit lettuce on the plate did not help the presentation. The chicken skewers were blah but the salsa verde and BBQ sauce were alright. Overall, I will say that Joya Lounge is only a good place to drink. The next time I wanna snack on something good with my yummy drink I'll make it over to the Patio!
Came here to eat tapas, not to drink. Was mostly disappointed. For the price and all the image, they can't really cook that well.  It's one thing to be inauthentic --  that would be okay if the cooking was good. But to be inauthentic AND bad is just a bummer. Papas bravas- not very "brava" (spicy), not authentic recipe (assume this for all dishes following), and greasy instead of crispy potatoes. Fish sandwich- fish was terribly overcooked. Dry as a bone. Cuban sandwich- okay actually. But tasted strongly of mustard. Mussels- very mediocre flavor. Overcooked. Ahi tuna tartare- why's this on the menu? But it was pretty good actually. Ceviche- again, mediocre. Scallops with corn- delicious!! By far the best thing we tried. We ordered a second one.  A whole star is due to this dish. Deviled eggs- way too much mustard! Totally overwhelming! Churros with dipping chocolate- tasted good but churros were undercooked in the center, making them mushy and unappealing. I will not go back. Not for the food at least. Too bad.  Really wanted to like it.
My first review...and I thought hard. Definitely Joya is worth it. I went with 3 other girlfriends on a Friday evening. I made the reservation through open table which was on their website. Very easy and the day of the Birthday I got a follow up phone call from the restaurant. It's hard to get good service unless you know somebody or can pull out the cash a little. Joya is amazing if you don't have either! The food is delicious, and the ambiance made the night perfect. We had some tapas and a bottle of wine and then when we finished, ended up making our way to the bar where I met some other cool individuals working around the area. I think I like this place for the food, and I love this place for its ambiance and the people it attracts. Awesome location and the staff was on point! They didn't hesitate to take our jackets to a coat closet and remembered to bring it back without me having to ask at the end. I am ready to go back for more! Next time on a date!
Really, really good service. Honestly, once you start off with good service not much can go wrong. Food was fantastic, although places like Andalu in the city have more tapas to choose from We got: Braised short rib tacos(short ribs were pretty tender) Burrata with serrano ham and cherry gastrique Papas bravas Romaine salad Spanish Chicken skewers (juicy, perfectly grilled. Nothing like normal chicken skewers) Croquetas (Fried potatoes with sundried tomatoes and mozzarella fondue) * definitely recommended. The inside was the texture of mashed potatoes while the outside was perfectly fried. Warm chocolate cake with thyme ice-cream for dessert. (cake part was a little dry but the ice cream was delicious) all washed down with white/red sangria. I would go with the white peach if you're debating between the two. All in all, Joya had great food and excellent service.
Great place to sample lots of fun dishes.  Tried the seared bay scallops with grilled corn - tasty but slightly bland, I think the dish may have just needed a bit of salt.  The croquetas were delishious, probably can only eat one or two as they are a bit rich.  The braised short rib tacos were really good!  A nice spice to them...they come three to a plate and I'd say are a must have.  We had a couple other dishes, including the Joya salad which was fresh and simple, and a nice addition to all the heavier small plates. Parking was easy, garage just around the back side of the restaurant.  Fun atmosphere, nice lighting, good food - good times.
I'll be back again. Came here with a group for dinner the first time and loved it. Second time by myself for lunch. LOVE the choice of small plates and will return to taste the rest!
I love this place for the food and the ambiance. I can also bring my dog here so it's really quite perfect for me. The location is great, right on University Ave and close to the parking structure. I've been here twice and both times I have been very pleased with the service and food. I had the same waiter both times and he was wonderful except he forgot to refill my iced tea. It's ok though, the water boy did his job. For food, let's talk tapas. I really like the juicy kobe sliders, tuna tartare and spinach empanadas. Jason and I are going to go back again and have an all tapas dinner. I'd like to try all of them! for entree, we had the ribeye and the pork - both were delicious! The pork comes with a sweet onion topping - which can be a bit too sweet for some people. The ribeye was delicious and the potatoes went perfectly with it. As for dessert - both times I ordered the Oreos fritos. It's just THAT YUMMY that you have to order it when you are there. Pair that off with some coffee and BAM! done deal. TOTAL MUST DO: make reservations! I'd list this place as one of my fave restaurants in Palo Alto.
They have very good options for tapas and good selection of wine. I tried the white peach sangria as many users have suggested but i find it too mild and kinda girly(sorry!). I'd recommend redwine sangria instead. This place really gets crowded for dinner in weekends, i'd suggest getting a reservation if you're a party of more than two.
My family and I happened to be in downtown Palo Alto around lunchtime when we spotted this cute tapas bar. My initial reaction looking at the menu was that it was overpriced and a little shi shi. But, we thought we would try it out anyway. We were seated outside in the warm sunshine and brought our drinks immediately. Fast forward to our first appetizer, an array of sweet potato, plantain, and taro chips with the most flavorful guacamole I've ever tasted. OMYGOODNESS...I wanted to order another round just for myself. Our second appetizer, the homemade gazpacho soup, was also incredible. The serving which they give you was large enough for the three of us to share. Later we ordered fish tacos and the nicoise salad with a fried soft-boiled egg and Turkish olives. We were all very impressed. To top it all off, our server was very attentive. The entire staff made sure our  experience was impeccable. Go team!! My Rating: Service: 4/5 tapas Food: 5/5 tapas Presentation: 5/5 tapas Ambiance: 4/5 tapas Overall Experience: 5/5 tapas
Hubby and i had lunch there on a saturday. We sat outside since it was a beautiful day! We had the following: Peach sangria and Virgin bloody mary for drinks.For appetizer we had their fried calamari which was very fresh and tasty, specially with the dip it comes with and finally we ordered wild Mushroom paella( it serves two) which i recommend you to try.It is a bit heavy but sooooo yummy.I loved the assortment of wild mushrooms and the rice. The food was made fresh and the waiter warned us about longer wait time since it was made by orders(  We didn't mind the wait as we had our drinks and appetizer in front of us). The service was quick and efficient. The place is very inviting.Although the outside sitting area is on the street you don't feel being in the way for people walking by. The reason i'm not giving the place 5 stars is the price. I think a lunch should not cost you that much!We paid  $65 for a lunch.
I felt uncomfortably young here. And I am 28. Very collared shirt, married, out on a mid-week date/business dinner type of clientelle. Tasty guacamole, and overall good food and service. The standout item, to me, however, were the bay scallops with roasted corn. Sweet, juicy, and really yummy. Tuna tartare was also really good, but came with a large portion of guacamole, so no point in ordering both like we did. Oops.
Had time to kill after taking my daughter to admit week before my plane. Wanted to eat at a "sit down" place to enjoy and have relatively healthy food for lunch and this place was just right. Just their romain salad was great with perfect asparagus pieces. I had short rib tacos. 3 small artisan tacos on small hand made tortillas. I bet the dessert there would have been great but I wanted to try another place. Great attentive service helped the experience as well. Have to admit I was tempted by the cocktail menu but too early for me.
The mango snapper ceviche was good but not something i'd order again. The tuna tartare is DELICIOUS-- tuna tartare on guacamole, served like layered dip with yucca chips but  more delicious! The best dishes were the warm tapas. Try the mushroom empanadas and the scallops. Tapas range from $9-15 per plate. Great service and ambiance.
This place is intimate and romantic it sets the mood if you are on a date or hanging out with friends for happy hour. We had ordered crab cakes, calamari, steamed muscles with chorizo and ahi, poke ceviche. Everything was good but i didn't get to try out the ceviche because the food was raw. Anyways calamari was on the burnt side, but our server was kind enough to ask if we wanted to get another one. Our server Allie was alert and attentive. Definitely will go here again with my co-workers for some happy hour debauchery.
Came here this past weekend to celebrate my early birthday with my sisters and cousin.  This place is Michelin recommended.  I was the first one to arrive so I hung out at the bar and waited for the familia to come.  I started off with their coconut mojito $12!  It was made with coconut rum and its on of their popular flavors and it was delish!  They even have a guava flavor. As the familia came we ordered about 4 dishes to share along with two desserts: We started off with a pitcher of white peach sangria $24.  It was great and got several of my cousins who don't really drink buzzed.  You can add a shot of rum, tequila for $4 more but we just had the regular and felt it was strong enough for us. As for our tapas we started with a sampling size of Ceviche $25.  The choices were local Seabass; coconut rock shrimp; and mango, red chili snapper.  This was really good and came with different chips like taro chips, banana chips, etc.  The ceviche was nice a fresh with tons of flavor. We then got an order of the Kobe beef mini- burgers $11.50 made with Oaxaca cheese, soria pork chorizo, Chipotle mayonnaise.  I didn't get to try this but it look really good. Braised short ribs tacos $10.50, with jicama salsa and horseradish cream.  I enjoyed this a lot and the braised beef was very moist and tender and loved the sauce.  Almost reminded me of the La Vics sauce but less spicy. Paella Croquetas $9, Saffron rice, Oaxaca cheese, With pequillo Chipotle cream.  This was also very fun to eat and very flavorful. As we sat and talked for a while, we took our time eating, our stomachs felt content.  We then ordered dessert and ordered: Churros with hot chocolate $8, Argentinean donuts alongside On ibarra chocolate dipping sauce.  The donut was nice and fluffy and delightful.  Chocolate dipping sauce was just perfect.  We also had Oreos fritos $9, Six pieces of deep fried oreos with house made of i think vanilla ice cream instead of mint.  This was just as great. Overall, great attentive staff and everyone was very friendly.  Would give this place a 4 stars.  Our bill was about $117 for 5 of us and very reasonable.
I've had a nice dinner here with the Huzbeau. I've had a good business lunch here. I've had a need-to-break-up-a-stressful-day-so-lets-have-an-outdoor lunch here with a co-worker.  This one only involved a pitcher of Sangria, sweet potato fries with a main course of People Watching and a large side of chitchat.  :) Each different experience (not necessarily in this order) was a pretty good one and I leave Joya liking it more each time.  I love the outdoor seating, but the inside is just as pleasant.  The servers and hostesses are always so nice.  Some dishes are better than others.  The restaurant as a whole package earns a 4 stars.  :)
White Peach Sangria- amazing!!! Ahi Tuna Tartare, Spanish Chicken Skewers, and Croquettas were all awesome. They had soooo many appetizing dishes I am looking forward to coming back and trying more ! I came or a late dinner Saturday night-- around 9:30p the place was completely packed which was nice. Enjoyed a few drinks and some tapas while people watching :-) I love the set up of the place and seating arrangements. At first I thought it was weird that the tables were all pretty close to one another but it actually didn't bother me. I like that the place was pretty loud because I didn't feel like everyone could hear us talking.
Its important to come here with good company given the food choices.  You can either do Tapas style meal or order some other options for yourself. Of course if you're with someone fun and easy going, then Tapas is the way to go. We ordered a few different dishes which were all tasty but the scallops stood out the most for me.  Usually there isn't much to do with scallops and Joya did a fantastic job. If you're not coming here to eat then just grabbing drinks is a great option too! on the other side of the restaurant they have a little lounge where you can relax and drink their awesome peach sangria!! Trust me its worth having! It tastes like summer on the beach with an amazing tan and fantastic sunshine :) Luckily my date was willing to step out of the "man" drinks and have fun drinking one of these with me ;) On a side note, they always have awesome music playing. Makes you enjoy the night even more.
I've been to this place a few times for both lunch and dinner. It's certainly situated in a good location in downtown Palo Alto, right at the center of University Ave. It has half of its exterior open to the street. So it feels really accessible and welcome from the outside, in the meantime, it's good for diners to do some people watching while dining. The wine list is decent. There're sufficient options of tapas items on the menu. So it's a good alternative if you feel like having a light lunch in the late afternoon or just want to have a feel drinks with some small dishes. The prices are on the steep side, you are also paying for the location and ambience. During weekend, sometimes there's live performance in the restaurant, which IMO can be a bit loud and distractive. Overall, the food there were decent enough for me to go back.
Only negative stars for this restaurant. I felt so stupid even trying to make a reservation in this place. The hostess was full of excuses. She just would not acknowledge us even after hours of waiting and all we got was a "I got your number wrong". I got the feeling she was being racist coz the tables outside were practically empty. Do not go here if you want to be treated human who just want to dine out with friends and have fun.
Churros..... Deep Fried Oreos... Fresh Whipped Cream... SEAFOOD PAELLA WITH SEAFOOD! Everything tasted fantastic. I had tried some of these deviled eggs and loved them. My significant other doesnt usually like egg yolks but warmed to the flavorful dish. I had a taste of their blood sausage and was impressed that the iron taste was greatly diminished. I had found that their fresh whipped cream went perfectly well with deep fried oreos. I hear though that their upcoming bonbon dish will be absolutely amazing. Did I mention that the beef sliders were delicious!?!?!?! Because they are... I had three of those and I barely had enough room for their churros. Between you and me, I love churros and I couldnt eat enough of them. Reminded me of Spain! The owner, Alex, is great and the chefs, Fabrice and Ann, are personalities that I wish I could just watch cook. They are something else to be seen in their element. Its a shame that I cant pull up a chair to watch them work their magic. And the wait staff is simply perfect: courteous, attentive, and charming all that same. I cant wait to go back again! ;D
Oh Joya, when did our love affair begin? I had walked by many times admiring the open windows, wine selection, romantic decor, and patrons enjoying themselves - only to find that it was impossible to get a table... Finally, I've gotten my act together to make a reservation for dinner. Only then, just then, were my friends and I allowed entrance. Your hostesses were kind enough to have noticed my request to sit by the window. Some people were so into the environment to stay around after paying the bill, my friends and I waited patiently at the bar with glasses of wine. Once seated, my friend who lived in Barcelona for a few years started ordering tapas she missed - papas bravas, calamari, croquetas, herbed goat cheese, ceviche, and the cheese plate. Your white peach sangria was certainly the perfect drink for the night! One of us got the skirt steak - though I didn't get a taste because he wolfed it down - I was sure that was delicious. Our night ended with churros with chocolate sauce... sorry, had to stop fantasizing... I'll definitely call you later!
Pros: 1. Ambiance - very nice decor 2. Tapas - Tuna tartar = awesome, crab cakes = awesome, yucca fries = ok, kobi burger sliders = double awesome, tapas sampler = recommend 3. Dishes = Paella = awesome 4. Drinks = wine selection is nice, do not leave there without trying the Sangria!! 5. Service = quick, friendly, competent wait staff 6. Parking - right next to Parking garage Cons: 1. Pricey for some items - buy hey, this is Palo Alto 2. Dishes = Bass with tamarind sauce -- a little too sweet for my taste, but ok dish. This place will probably not be my choice for dinner, but great place for drinks and Tapas.  If you eat enough tapas you really don't need to order any entree!
I came here for Happy Hour but realized they didn't have happy hour specials, but honestly this restaurant doesn't need it. They are simply a more upscale restaurant and they get their customers no matter what. I came here around 5:30 and beat the crowd, the left side of the restaurant is all open seating (including the couches) so if you have a big crowd, it's a great place to go to. Regarding the food, I had their Chorizo corndogs, which was very good, the Chorizo was on the drier side though, I also had their Short Rib Tacos, they make their own tacos which is a plus (it simply adds a different texture to the already good entree) The bartender was cool and when I want to feel cool and hip, I'll come back to hang out I think I may try to make it a weekly thing by coming here on Thursdays around 5:30pm. I've always wanted a regular hangout place :)
I loved the lounge atmosphere.  Its more a place to kick back and have some drinks with a few awesome friends. And by drinks, I mean SEVERAL PITCHERS of the red sangria. It was amazingggg.
YUM. Went here on a Saturday night and encountered a 30 minute wait, but was well worth it! The four of us chose to go tapas style.  Yucca fries were out of this world.  I don't even know what yucca is, but they were thick and crispy and came with an amazing chipotle dipping sauce. The scallops with truffle oil were delicious as well.  And (I'm told) that the braised short rib tacos were spot on. I also had an amazing cocktail with tequila and jalapeno, but can't quite remember the name. The atmosphere was young and trendy - a great weekend dinner spot for a date or with a group!
A friend of mine had been raving about this place for ages now and since I didn't really know what to do for my bday... I told the S.O. that I finally want to give this spot a try. And I'm glad that we went! S.O. arranged for flowers, card and his bday gift to be placed at our table before our arrival... you can read his review and his take on how the night went on below. I asked our wonderful...friendly and prompt server named Reuben (sp?) his recommendations for drinks... he suggested the classic mojito. Done. The first sip... wow. That was refreshing and truly was just made right! It had the right balance of mint... sweetness and of course, alcohol! Delicious indeed! Since I didn't want to eat a whole lot... S.O. and I shared the following: - yucca fries with chipotle aioli = S.O. liked it but I ended up not liking it since the dipping sauce was made of mayo... duly noted for our next time up! - tequila basil infused melons with crispy serrano ham = this was delicious! The melon balls was sweet and it balanced the saltiness of the ham. This will be good for those summery nights that should be coming our way in the next few months! - kobe beef mini-burgers = This was all S.O. (it had mayo...) so I wouldn't personally know what it taste like but he said it was good and he ended up taking the rest home. - braised short rib tacos = S.O. ordered this as well... didn't eat any since I wasn't too fond of the ingredients ... but when the S.O. was eating it, he couldn't stop raving about the tortillas. Unfortunately... this dish didn't sit too well in his stomach... duly noted as well. - seared bay scallops with grilled corn roasted poblano beurre blanc, smoked sea salt, truffle essence = MY FAVORITE! It had scallops (lots of it I might add!) and the grilled corn... wow... really creative and delicious dish indeed! The S.O. said he doesn't like scallops but upon having his first bite... he said he could make an exception for just this dish. - cheese plate = I think I'm just spoiled with the cheese plate that my sis orders for me... so lesson learned yet again: won't order without my sis! The cheeses weren't up to par to my taste buds. Plus, some of the cheeses were really stinky... I know they're suppose to stink but not that bad... - churros with hot chocolate argentinean doughnuts alongside an ibarra chocolate dipping sauce = MY FAVORITE as well! I'll probably get this next around b/c it had churros which melted in your mouth sans the dark chocolate dip... then when you do dip it, it was just heaven! By that time... I was already a bit tipsy and full so I only managed to eat two but I will definitely save room for next time! To top off the night: Reuben (sp?) gave us a complimentary dessert wine that really went well with my churros (unfortunately I forgot it's name) so I'll definitely ask for that next time! Overall... yes, it is worth the hype and it is worth going! Definitely make reservations! They get packed! Thanks CW for suggesting this place... thanks for the staff of Joya for making my night a memorable one and of course... thanks to the S.O. for going beyond his duty for making my day... a special day indeed.
Was just here the other night with some girlfriends and off the bat, food was amazing. The venue was very modern and classy.  indoor and outdoor seating.  Pleasant, friendly and approchable staff; Gary and Britta are my favorites! Had the kobe beef mini-burgers, guacamole & new world chips, braised short rib tacos, chorizo corndogs, ahi tuna tartare and for dessert fresas y crema and the warmed chocolate cake.  for drinks, white sangria.  AMAZING. Must go. :)
This review is solely for Joya's Tapas menu. That being said, I really wanted to love this place. The ambiance is wonderful, we sat right next to the open air; practically on the sidewalk. This was great for people watching. My girlfriend and I had a ton of catching up to do, so we ordered (from the tapas menu): - Charcuterie Platter - Cheese Platter - Chicken Sopes - Kobe Sliders - Pappas Bravas - Fried Yucca - Sea Bass Ceviche Yes, we ordered all of that for just the two of us. I had the sangria (which was pretty good), and my girl had the house chardonnay (which I'm guessing she loves, since this was her spot, and she'd been here before). The ambiance was great, service was friendly and attentive, drinks were good....why only 3 stars? The food was meh.  I mean, the pappas and yucca were great, but really, how hard is it to ruin fried potatoes? The chipotle mayo and garlic aioli were great accompaniments, but I guess I was just looking for more. Maybe ,my expectations were too high going in...or maybe I need to order a dinner entree next time (if there is a next time). The kobe sliders were good...overcooked though, to my liking. Honestly I have had better prepared sliders at the bowling alley. The cheese and charcuterie were a waste of money and space on the table and in my stomach.  The one thing I did love though, were the chicken sopes. Flavorful and just the right amount of spice. I wanted to love it. But ambiance and service alone isn't going to get you four (or five!) stars. I liked (and finished) most of the food we ordered, but it would be a battle to get me to give this place another try (for tapas at least). Three Tiered Tapas stars.
Met someone here for a first date; upon arrival realized this place is quite the scene!  Was packed with singles - ended up scoring a table outside (great to escape the noise so we could have a real conversation!) and had a couple of tapas (ahi & bruschetta) and their white peach sangria. Food was good, sangria was okay, service was great!  I'll definitely come back for another date or a girls night out.
Good paella, a bit pricey,  but good service. Fancy night out, sometimes they have live musicians playing outside.
First visit last year, birthday lunch.  Second visit yesterday, walk-in, wearing gym clothes.  Well, misis wearing Lululemon with a wite cap on, myself in shirt & pants from any given Sports Authority. The interior:  fairly swanky.  It's set up for a lively happy hour setting with a central bar, a lounge area, open air dining area, and a large party dining room.  How dare we walk in wearing gym clothes, but they treated us indifferently from their significant business lunch crowd.  For that, gracias. The food:  TAPAS!  We went with shrimp/gambas, mussels, short-rib tacos, and medium-rare Kobe sliders.  The shell fish items are must haves.  They're prepped in similar sauce base with chorizo slices, so good you'd want extra bread or at least sip up the sauce to the last drop.  As for the mini burgers, I don't dig sliders, but these Kobe minis are tasty, savory sauce, though the paper-thin tomato slices are not necessary.  The tacos are good, but a bit much with the Kobe sliders, and that's our mistake.  All in all, a very good experience.  Already, I'm contemplating on going back. Muchas Gracias, Joya.
Dining at Joya is a delightful experience from the time you walk in and are greeted by the hostess, to the moment you leave.  Our server was fantastic (can't recall his name) and so knowledgeable.  The Sangria is amazing (!) and most of what I ordered (short rib tacos, brussel sprouts) was quite tasty, but the chorizo corn dogs were almost cold (sent that back).  I had a bit of guacamole as my friend ordered that with her meal.  Our table was at the front window and we really enjoyed the people watching. I'll definitely be back.
Food is great, waiters fantastic, however the manager/owner - a disappointing service to say the least.  Started with a party of 4, seated outside and then 2 friends joined.  The manager put on a scene that they can't have a party of 6 outside.  No problem - city regulations. We asked to be moved inside but were told to wait.  While waiting the manager kept harassing our 2 friends not to sit with us.  Eventually the hostess sitted us inside and the manager never appeared again.  A good manager would have at a minimum stopped by to apologize for inconvenience and thanked us for staying and spending hundreds of dollars even though they did not make it easy for us.  Any other manager would offer free desserts or drinks but all I would have expected is a Thank You.
I think this place is a hit or miss, perhaps they change chefs each night and each chef cooks differently. Sometimes the Grilled Sea Bass is delicious, tender.  But tonight the sea bass I got was hard (the texture tasted almost like chicken), it was bland and tasteless), the portion was tiny.  The sangria tasted diluted and flavorless, I didn't taste a hint of wine, it was almost like fruit punch, I did not feel teeny tiny of buzz, even when drinking on an empty stomach. The service tonight was slow, negligent and unfriendly.  The host was spaced out, sat the party of two behind us before us, then realized that we should've been seated first. After tonight's experience, I will have to think twice before going there again.
somehow the food or the menu has changed over time, i wonder if they changed their chefs.  I used to... Read more 
I tried Joya this week for a business lunch. The atmosphere is very nice and a perfect place for a business lunch as well as friends get together. We ordered the following: artisan cheese plate valdeon, manchego, urgelia & marinated queso fresco, served with membrillo el quiote, poached apricot with chili flakes, red wine marinated bing cherries and black truffle honey truffled deviled eggs with smoked trout caviar creme fraiche, chives sauteed pea tendril meyer lemon, garlic & manchego salmon cakes salad frisee, baby spinach, chile arbol and bacon vinaigrette The food was presented beautifully and everything tasted good. If I had to order again, I would have done without the devised eggs and the sauteed pea tendril. They were good, but considering the fact that Joya is fairly expensive for a lunch, I would spend the money trying something that was more memorable. I really enjoyed their selection of cheese and preserves. It was a great mix of delicate favors that I really enjoyed. The Salmon Cake salad was great as well. Keep in mind the portions are very small, so depending on your appetite you may want to consider more food for two people. I would have scored it higher, if it was not as pricey as well as better/faster service. Overall, it was a great dining experience and I would try it again with other friends.
Fantastic. The restaurant itself is stylish and comfortable with a spacious, open patio area.  The tapas and various appetizers are all delicious and could serve as entrees if you so please. The main dishes themselves are fun and full of flavor.. We had a party of 5 and shared various plates, all of which were delicious. The wait staff was friendly and provided excellent service, and the food was brought out relatively quickly.  It's a bit pricey, but well worth it on occasion (depends on your budget I suppose). I'd highly recommend checking it out, and keep in mind -  their mojitos are excellent.
Meh...Not great at all.  Tried the white peach sangria, and it was average at best.  The Mac and cheese was good; calimari was average; chicken skewers were average; beef tacos were above average; pea shoots were above average; beef mini-burgers were average; paella was above average.  I'm really quite surprised by the 4 and 5 stars.  The reason for my 2 stars is that the price is not commensurate to the quality of the food.  I'm the type that's willing to pay $100+ per person for great food, but this just doesn't cut it.  Over-priced and over hyped in my opinion.  I literally could have made this stuff myself.
Normally I do not expect much when eating at a restaurant with a large group. There were 18 in our group. After sitting down and checking out the place I figured things were looking up when i spotted Hall of Fame Quarterback Steve Young a couple of tables away with a party of 22! Our group tried several Tapas, the two winners were the Dungeness Crab Cakes and the Kobe Beef Mini-Burgers. The Crab cakes were perfectly breaded, spiced and contained a lot more crab than breadcrumbs. The Kobe Beef was was the best I have ever had, the meat literally melted in my mouth. Sweet, tender and amazing. For the entree, I had the Lobster Paella. this would have been a 5 star dish except that there as way too much rice and the clams violated one of my top 5 pet peeves. They were gritty.  The dish was a perfect mix of Cajun spice. It literally made my taste buds dance with joy. Squid tubes exceptionally tender, huge shrimp, mussels, an small lobster tail on top and disappointingly  the gritty clams. Our waiter traveled with a wing man. At first I thought he was in training, but with such a large party, the two working shoulder to shoulder was perfect. This meal was a taste bud dream and borderline "death row - last meal" worthy. The damn gritty clams kept this place from being 5 star. I almost forgot... The Bombay Blue Sapphire martini, shaken not stirred was James Bond worthy.
LOWDOWN: * Saturday, afternoon. * My 1st Yelp Elite event. FOOD: The Kobe Sliders were delicious. As were the Brussels sprouts. Amazing really. The paella was overcooked. Everything else was not memorable enough to mention. COCKTAILS: Caipirinha YES please! Sangria NO thanks THE PEEPS: I got to meet a couple peeps, thru Dan R. It was a fun little get together. NUTSHELL: I will definitely give this place another go, just to try some more dishes. I love tapas! :)
Been here several times, for Happy Hour as well as for Dinner. Most recently last night. Usually tapas are my pick. And lately, I've been going all vegetarian, thanks Lenten Fridays. But it is a blessing in disguise because man, oh man, I get to discover things I would never dream of putting together. Apricots soaked in wine and sprinkled with chili flakes? That comes with the cheese plate. And they'll give you extra bread and fruit if you like. The sangria, tasty but not too strong. I've had both the red and the white. See the Lenten theme here? I know some of the reviewers didn't like the croquettes, but hello ... they're served with a smoked mozzarrella fondue?! Considering the last croquettes I had at another tapas restaurant that looked like fried pieces of poo, these were heavenly. And we ordered those again. Seared bay scallops with the grilled corn, and crab cakes rounded out that particular ordering. Add the churros with chocolate sauce for dessert, and that concludes a meal that had more calories in it than the last four days combined. I'll find a reason to go here. Often. I'll make them up. Happy Lenten Friday!
Food = Pretty good but can be hit or miss on some dishes Ambiance = Beautiful, inviting, trendy, and upscale Service = Mostly attentive & on time...sometimes can be slow if they're busy Good place for drinks and dessert too!  Great place for date night!
So I picked this place to meet a old friend and catch up and everyone on yelp was raving about the peach sangria.  So cool right,  we got there and got seated right away, i did make a reservation but you never know. So right away, I ordered a pitcher of the sangria, it was a warm summer day and just seemed so perfect right??? But no.... why oh why do you use canned peaches!!! Come on!! I mean seriously??? Fine whatever... The short rib tacos lacked in any flavor, the tuna tartar was decent  and we got a fish dish to split and the fish was overcooked..... Bummmer. So one redeeming thing..... The amazing churro dessert.  Heck even my friend even took out her camera phone to take a picture of it.  I haven't gone back since but that's something I would definitely get next time.
Been here before for happy hour and really enjoyed it (4 stars for happy hour.) For dinner, it's only getting 3 stars. We ordered... -Some cocktail that had jalapeno, tequila, pineapple all in it which was GREAT. -Seared bay scallops with grilled corn: turned out to be baby scallops. Well seasoned and the corn was sweet and tasty. -Warmed herbed goat cheese: My favorite dish of the evening probably. We asked for some extra bread just so we could finish it all up because it was SO tasty. -Yucca fries: Not memorable, bland. -Wild Mushroom Paella: Tasty. Lots of veggies and the onions were cooked very very well. Large portion. -Chicken chipotle sopes: chipotle sauce wasn't impressive -Paella croquetas: Good portion size but not seasoned very well. Sauce was good though. -Churro w/ chocolate: Churros were warm and chewy with a nice crispy outside. Chocolate sauce was veyr ordinary. Nothing made me really excited to return to Joya. I did like a few of the dishes so I'd come back for happy hour, but not for a full dinner of tapas. Service was very good though and prices were reasonable.
My bf and I came here for lunch today. I had the Ajillo Marinated Chicken Sandwich w/ sweet potato fries and greens. The sandwich was delicious! Lots of good flavor. The fries were also tasty too-I was craving more! Service here was also friendly and attentive. I also loved the atmosphere here, there is a small lounge area also and a huge wine wall as soon as you walk in. A good place for an intimate dinner date! There were definitely some yummy tapa dishes featured on their menu so I would love to return again to try more.
Great atmosphere with better than average food.  The tuna appetizer was OK as well as the scallops ceviche (A bit too much filler).  The steak was enjoyable but nothing special.
One day my Mom and I were strolling down University Ave and saw Joya....which was perfect becuase we were searching for a cute spot for our dinner date. This place is sheek and yummy! Our server was very down to earth and attentive. We ordered the ceviche and scallops tapas which were amazing! too bad we didnt have room for dessert. It just gives me another reason to go back :)
Went here with my girls on a Wednesday night.  Pretty busy for a school night. We ordered a few tapas (ceviche platter, short rib tacos, prawn gambas & ended with the churros with hot chocolate dipping sauce) We had a few white & red sangrias too. (they were ok) Over-all, I'd rate it with a 4 since the service is quite nice. (or maybe my best friend was just flirting way too much with our bartender since he keeps coming to our table & asking us what else we needed. Too funny.) Love the ambiance (especially if it's nice out, you can sit outside & watch people), like the staff, food is decent. I'd come back again & again.
Amazing service and good food. Typically PA pretentious, but I guess that comes with the terriory. Pricy, but I'd recommend giving it a try.
Negative  stars - worst Hostess on Friday 05/04/12  - forgot to call me for three hours after I gave her my name - after asking her multiple times and waiting for 1.5 hours I went to another place to eat! Avoid this place if you want to be treated as a human being!
I came here for a work event for lunch with a small group of my coworkers. We made reservations and they sat us in the small room off to the side. It was very nicely decorated, but we still felt like part of the restaurant and not too secluded. First thing was the drinks. We ordered the cherry drop martini and white sangria. Both were delicious. The fruit in the sangria was to die for. We then proceeded to order pretty much everything on the menu - empanadas, pork tacos, mac and cheese, mini burgers, croquettes, cheese platter, meat platter, and chicken skewers. All of it was delicious. The mini burgers and mac and cheese were soooo good. We ended up ordering more of the burgers, since everyone ate those right up. After that we ordered the fried oreos, pineapple cake, and churros for dessert. The oreos were to die for...sinfully delicious. We had told the waiter that we needed to be out of the restaurant by 2:45 since we had more planned for the day and he kept us on track and was very helpful. I totally want to come here for dinner with my friends and hubby...they would love it!
Just got back from a Yelp event here and had a fabulous time!  The tapas and drinks were amazing and I LOVED the sliders and paella.  The staff was great and were even friendly when cleaning up our spilled drink.  The atmosphere was great and the restaurant was really warm and inviting. And (and this is how I have to judge everything after having been pregnant) the restroom was spotless!  This is always a good sign!  Now I HAVE to go back and try all the tapas that I didn't get to try tonight.  YUM.  There are lots of great restaurants in Palo Alto and this is one you should check out!
Jay--I can personally say that this is a great place to take a very special someone on a first date. As we approached the busy doors we were immediately acknowledge and greeted with a friendly smile. The host at the door informed and set the right expectations of the wait time. As we waited they sat us down on the bar/lounge side of the restaurant. The red sangria was absolutely refreshing, i could honestly taste every single fruit that was in the drink. The food was as great as the service. Love---opposite from my boyfriend- im gonna make this short and sweet....this place worked great as our 1st date. everyone knows on their 1st date you dont want to stuff your face so it was perfect because they had appetizers that were delicious along with drinks that were tasteful.
Overall a contemporary tapas place and has a nice feel to it. It's also  Michellen Recommended!! http://www.joyarestauran... This is my second time going to Joya after the yelp event where I first encoutered Joya's paellas, gazpaccio and a few other tapas  that were all PRO^2 Bono. The layout is also very polished and nice. As you walk in, I fell in love with the wine cellar that jumps out at you. On the left side of the restaurant are couches for lounging, on the right is the table seating area and in the middle back is the kitchen. The wallls compact and open so we have the best indoor, fresh aired and shaded seating. Tapas and dishes we ordered were: 1. Guacamole and New World Chips - Loved it! They used taro chips, plantain chips, sweet potato and other chips with guac that had a little bit of salt. Bono!! 2. Sauteed Gambas - Mmm! This is pork chorizo marinated prawns with a hint of citrus. PHENOMENAL!! 3. Latin Tapas Sampler - Consists of a variety of things like a seared scallops and corn, brochuto and other ham, muscles (?), goat cheese filled bell peppers and a spiniach samosa-like deep fried dish. Nice but a little too flavorful for my taste. 4. Chipotle Chicken Sopes - Two pulled chicken with tomato sauce crema on top of a small tortia. Looks like two soft shell tacos with a mountain of chicken goodness. :) 5 White Peach Sangria - It went well with our dishes and the nice weather at the time. But my friends had better in SF. I wish they had more dishes that were simple (yet sophisticatedly) seasoned and was not so drenched with cheese or some of marinade.
Their hostesses dress like hoochies. Or at least they did on this particular night. Little off-putting but I guess they figure by putting scantily clad pretty girls out front that more people would eat there. Fairly crowded but not too bad of a wait, ended up with a table outside. Service was ok, waitress was pleasant enough and got our drinks pretty quickly (very good mojitos) but didn't offer a ton of guidance on the menu in terms of how much to order, how much came on a plate, things like that. Went with the yucca fries, goat cheese and tomato sauce, chicken sopes and croquetas w/smoked melted mozarella. Overall, everything was pretty good, standouts were the goat cheese and the croquetas (boy do I love cheese). I was very excited about dessert because I spied pineapple butter cake on the menu and hot damn did it sound good. I ordered it and then about 5 minutes later the waitress came out to say they were OUT of it! Boo! Got the ice cream cookie sliders instead and they were good but I couldn't help but be severely disappointed about the pineapple butter cake. I don't know if I'd go back. It just wasn't *that* good to entice a return trip, especially at their price point. I think it would be much more fun and a much better value going with a group.
We came on a warm summer night. Cooled off after shopping with peach and berry sangrias. Lots of great things to choose from on the menu. We sampled different tapas, a salad, and a fish skewer. Everything we ordered was quite flavorful. Service was outstanding on a Friday night at 8pm. The place was full but we didn't have to wait. Save room for dessert! The bon-bons are tops!
I heart Joya. It's an upscale tapas restaurant with white tablecloths and modern decor. The atmosphere is upbeat and the bar is a hip place to have a classy drink in high heels. My husband and I had a late Saturday night dinner there recently and ordered just about everything on the menu. Nothing disappointed. Tapas: * Joya Salad - hearty greens, Jordan said "I can feel my body rebuilding as I eat!" *Tequila basil infused melons with crispy serrano ham - holeee amazing! This combo was crunchy and refreshing with a spicy bite to it that will make your forehead sweat. * Ahi tartar was fresh and full of flavor. * Ceviche rock shrimp - tasty enough to finish, but the shrimp and fish were rubbery and the flavor too sweet. * Goat cheese with fire roasted tomato sauce and crackers - who can say no to goat cheese! * Croquetas - little mash potato balls with sun dried tomatoes and a crunchy breadcrumb case with melty mozzarella dipping sauce. If there were a little ground beef in the center, this would've been perfect. * Short rib taco - the corn tortillas were very thick and hearty, the meat was tender, and the horseradish gave it a nice kick for the finish. Tasty hearty little bites! Drinks: * Paloma - margarita drink with grapefruit juice, yumm. *White peach sangria - really didn't like this stuff, and I can get most anything down. It tasted like bad, flat white wine with a bunch of fruit in the glass. Waitress was great, without asking she replaced my white-wine sangria no charge after she saw I wasn't enjoying it. Love good service!!
WATCH OUT!!! A pitcher of Caipirinha is $55!! YIKES!!! I wish our waiter had told us the price before we got excited and got a pomegranate flavored one. I guess we did get 6 drinks out of it, but shouldn't it be cheaper when you buy a pitcher? He warned us it would take awhile for the bartenders to make the pitcher since everything is done by hand. After our first set of tapas came out, we were still waiting on our drink. We started munching on the sauteed gambas (shrimp and pork chorizo) and  mussels with chorizo. The shrimp and mussels were overcooked, a little tough. Also, the mussels were not plump. Then came our caipirinha, but it wasn't pomegranate flavored. I'm guessing he was a manager. He took away our pitcher and cups to make another one. So while we waited we had the yuca fries and braised short rib tacos. I'm a sucker for fries and these yuca fries were pretty good. But then I got them at the SF food festival for $3 and they were delicious too. I don't really remember much about the tacos. The pitcher finally came back, but it didn't taste like pomegranate. The one thing that could've saved the night was the argentinean-style hanger steak (grilled 10 ounce hanger steak, yucca fries, peruvian green aji). I was really excited to try this, but the aji sauce didn't compliment the steak and the steak was a little chewy even though I got it medium rare.
We went yesterday (6/18/2011) for lunch and had an amazing time.  Great wine, great service and great food.  The weather didn't hurt our rating today, but It was truly a 4 1/2 star experience for us.  Enjoyed the outdoor patio. Scallops - Amazing Croquetas - Amazing Kobe sliders - Great, have had better Tuna Nicoise - Ok, would not recommend
This place was great.  Went there on a business dinner and found it to be quite lively and energetic.  The wine list was a bit thin, but the phenonimal food and great service made up for it...
3.5 Stars is indeed right on the spot (current average of stars).  I've walked by Joya many, many times and each time it is packed, bustling and so when I went to book a table the day before and got a 7:30 slot I was fairly surprised.  The restaurant has a great ambiance; music in the background, dim lighting, nice light fixtures and on a warm summer night in palo alto, they have the doors/windows open which lets a slight breeze in. The small plates/tapas were better than the entrees.  We had a romaine salad, mussels, ceviche, guacamole and chips, calamari and tacos.  These were all tasty with good flavor and generous size portions.  The paella (mushroom one) and the hanger steak was very average. I would come back for the tapas and the sangria which they offer white and red.
Delicious food and sangria. Would have given all 5 stars but once a waiter strongly disliked the fact that my party was staying for just drinks and apps as it turned into prime dinner hour and we were holding up the table. He scoffed and continually asked us if we were done yet. RUDE. I think that this waiter has been explained in previous posts, but besides him, LOVE the food and atmosphere. Getting dressed up for dinner should be mandatory these days!
Excellent tapas! A great selection, all quite tasty. I went there for lunch with a group of friends and had a great lunch experience. We grazed on Tapas, family style and had a lot of fun.  The Kobe beef sliders were fantastic, the braised short rib tacos were excellent, as were the empanadas. Had a great seat near a window, hard to beat! I'd definitely go back!
The only reason this place gets two stars is because the manager was nice. Listen, if I wanted to go someplace that tasted like my food had just come out of a microwave, I would stay in and eat a hot pocket. We had to send back two dishes for being cold. Lukewarm on the outside, cold (one very much so--icy?) on the inside. When they refired our items, they had a miscommunication. We got our dish, but then it came out again. We explained to the gentleman that we had already received it, so he cursed, turned around, and a few second later he slammed the plate down so hard in the pass we heard (and saw) it at our table. Nice. And our waiter? I think we had one. He stopped by once or twice at the beginning then disappeared. The next time we saw him he dropped the dessert menus off at our table. I guess we saw him once more after that, when fifteen minutes later we went up to the front desk to pay our bill, after having given up on him (though we tried to signal to him several times for his attention). He saw us get up to leave and followed us to the front, so he could be there when we asked the manager for the bill. Food: The white sangria tastes (and looks like): 7-up, canned peaches, a splash of wine. Wow. Very high class. The short rib tacos tasted really watery, but since they were one of the dishes that were sent back for being way too cold, maybe they just didn't microwave them long enough? All in all...sorry, food (and service) fail. Sorry, but I don't think I will be back to try again.
Had a very nice dinner last week. 4 tapas dishes for 2 of us was perfect and very good. The waiter was very helpful and attentive. The place was busy, but not overly so and not that loud -- easy to have a conversation. Nice, dressy, adult clientele. We had a 7pm reservation that we arrived on time for, and were seated immediately. I've read some reviews stating that the hostesses were "rude", but they were very polite to us as well as fairly easy on the eyes.
Joya is a nice  place to enjoy lunch on a sunny Sunday afternoon. Enjoy the weather and sit inside on the edge where you're basically outside (it beats sitting outside and dealing with pedestrian passerbys eyeing your food). I ordered the tapas sampler and the chopped romaine salad. The sampler included Ceviche, sausage, Serrano ham, olives, an empanada, bread, stuffed bell pepper, and mussels. I couldn't eat the sausage because it was blood sausage and my religious beliefs restrict me from eating blood but the server was really nice and offered me chorizo instead. I wasn't too impressed with any of the dishes in this sampler. The chopped romaine salad was tasty. It had corn, onions, cheese, and Serrano ham. It was heavily dressed in a cilantro lime dressing (I love dressing so I was happy about the heavy  amounts of it). The white peach sangria is amazing! Especially for someone who doesn't enjoy drinks this was really refreshing. I loved eating the fruit when I was finished with it. Unfortunately the mango margarita wasn't as memorable. I'd go back again more for the atmosphere than the food. It's a cool area and would be enjoyable when with a group of friends.
Joya on a warm sunny day really makes you appreciate life.  They open their front door so that the dining room meets the street and you can enjoy your meal in the warm of fresh air but in an air conditioned environment. It almost felt like I was dining in a beach city. The food was pretty good, nothing to rave about but the menu did seem to have a variety of creative selections.  I had the Peach Salad which was pretty good. I would love to come back to try their paellas but couldn't get myself to order it this time since the weather was so nice.  Paella feels more like comfort food to me.
Came in, yet again, for a quick feast of hanger steak and red wine. The steak was delicious as always, came out fast, malbec was tasty and red. Nothing to complain about!
Tasty foods and drinks.  Would love to go back.  But the scantily clad waitresses in the lounge areas need to dress more tastefully.  I did not intend on meeting up with family at a place suggestive of strip.
My FAVORITE place on University Ave for one reason CEVICHE!!!! Get it. Got it? GOLD! Haven't had a bad dish yet, and I'm pretty sure I wont. Also, the service is amazing. Never an empty glass, always knowledgeable, and super friendly. You wont be disappointed ;)
I'd really like to love Joya, but I just don't. My experiences at Joya are consistently...mediocre. I love the atmosphere. The decor is warm and dark, and I feel like it would be a great place to sit for a glass of wine if it weren't so busy. Of course, it's always so busy, and the tables are so close together you feel like you're sitting on top of the next group. The menu has a number of interesting things on it, but nothing I'm crazy to try or eat on a regular basis. The last time I was there, we split a number of tapas, including: - Mini kobe burgers. Good, but not exceptional, and I'm a burger lover. - Calamari. Very good. It's a twist on the traditional calamari -  it comes with jalapenos - but I would definitely recommend it. - Halibut ceviche. Again, good, but not exceptional. It was oddly chewy, and there weren't nearly enough chips provided with it. - New World chips and guacamole. Yet again, good, but not memorable. - Croquetas. Yummy, but couldn't taste the butternut squash advertised. They just tasted like normal potato croquettes. - Cheese plate. I didn't love it, but everyone else at the table certainly devoured it. This could also be because I'm partial to bries and goat cheeses more than bleu and hard cheeses. We also tried the sangria, which wasn't nearly as good as that I've had at a number of nearby places (Reposado, Cascal). Basically, everything was fine, but nothing was great (including the service). That being said, I will admit that the bill was rather surprisingly low for 8 people (but that could also be because two of the people only split one tapa order between them).
This is right on University so parking is tricky. If you get lucky there is 2 hour parking on the street. Tapas is always so fun because you get to try so many dishes and just share everything with the people you're with.  This was perfect for a group of 4 of us. Beware Tapas is small appetizers so you get 3-5 pieces of everything so among 4 of us we had to order about 5 different dishes. OMG the White Peach Sangria is to die for you.  I've never seen it anywhere else.  They have the orange peaches from the can but its still yummy. We got the pitcher so everyone enjoyed it. Some of the things we ordered: - Yummy potato type fries - crab cakes- amazing - croquette- potato fried ball of goodness - scallop with corn- delicious Dessert - Huckleberry- crispy with berry inside with ice cream - Warm chocolate with thyme ice cream- yum I really enjoyed it and it seems to have a great wine list. Would love to try a Spanish wine next time but not sure if I would get to because I love the Sangria so much!
After tasting several great tapas restaurants in Chicago, I am eager to see what the tapas scene is like around San Francisco.  Joya is my second stop in the search for tapas restaurant in the Bay Area.  Love the modern decor and ambience.  You really get the outdoor feel when they open up the floor to ceiling sliding windows. The watermelon red snapper ceviche was light and refreshing, but it was missing something.  Maybe a little sweetness to bring it home.  The Kobe beef mini burgers were juicy, but the flavor could be better.  The braised short rib tacos were as good as any place I had before.  No complain there.  Overall, Joya has solid food and great atmosphere.  Definitely worth a return trip.
The food and drinks were medium tasty, the host was nice, and the ambience in the lounge was fun. However, the prices are just too high for what you get. $12 for a drink? Nonono. The bathroom had an eerie and overbearing red light. Very scary. I might go back for a special occasion, but otherwise, I'll pass.
They simply can't cook. The salad was stale, the fish was done on a hot plate. For the price and the hype, it simply was very poor and tacky. The service was equally disappointing. This place will soon shut down. If it's tapas and good food you are looking for, go to Cascal in Mountain View.
This place has some delicioso treats for your tastebuds!  I was in Barcelona the same time last year, and it was fun to revisit tapas after such a long time!  If you're looking for trendy, chic and good food, Joya is your place. Joya is a real jewel in that it has quite a large selection of vegetarian tapas.  We ended up ordering the mozarella and white corn empanadas, potato croquettes, brussel sprouts, guac and chips, and my friend ordered the chicken skewers.  All were amazing (my friend told me the latter was also awesome). We had some awesome service - a really nice lady who suggested vegetarian options for me, and kept checking in to see how I liked everything.  Overall, a great place if you're looking for a trendy yet chill ambience, as well as some good and filling tapas :)  Make reservations (my friend did the honors, and advises to do so, as he had been before) and peep the place out!
I passed by before this place and always wanted to eat there. Its a nice looking restaurant and trendy. On the weekends during the summer alot of peeps here just mingling at the bar or people watching but good luck finding a seat. It was nice to go to dinner last night, was not busy at all. Then with the holidays pending and the rain storm it was just perfect. Alex and I have not been out for a nice meal for awhile so this was a treat. The tapas and drinks was good. I wish in some ways we didn't order the entrees, not saying they are bad but the tapas outshine them. Due to the storm they could not get certain fish on there menus but they substituted So for the Halibut they had Sea bass for the Wahu they had Mahi Mahi. So that was good. So this what we had: Croquettes - Cuz I was in a fried mood. It was perfect and the fondue cheese sauce was great Mango Chili Red Snapper ceviche - Was very good, full of flavor. Besides the lime juice they added the zest which made it more lime flavor. Short Rib Tacos - Our waitress suggestion we try it. I think why not but maybe last night it was off. I honestly had better. It was on a the bland side and was lacking salt or more lime. It needed something. Roasted Beet Carpaccio - This was really good. The beets was sweet with the saltiness of the cheese was very good and the smoothness of the avocado and the greens was just yummy. Tamarind Glazed Grilled Mahi Mahi - This dish was very Asian to me. It was on the sweeter side with the glazed but the coconut rice went well with it. Fish was perfectly cooked. Sea bass with Spanish White Bean and Bilbao Chorizo - This fish was perfectly cooked. This dish was alright to me but Alex loved it more than the Mahi Mahi. While I think I liked the Mahi Mahi better. Overall dinner was great. Drinks was not bad here. I had the White Peach Sangria. Alex had a Q-Tini and of course Scotch. Our waitress Heather checked up on us and overall a wonderful experience. I would come back but probably would like to try out more tapas than the entrees. I think the tapas taste better than the entrees for flavor.
Joya is a restaurant in transition.  The food is first rate; unfortuantely their wait staff is not.  I visited for the 2nd time in 2 months and was very disappointed that the service had not improved.  It's always very busy in the restaurant and it's difficult to get reservations "on the day of", but they really need to look at how their waiters deal with customers
One day I was strolling along the streets of Palo Alto and suddenly got a hankering for ceviche.  I popped into Joya and had some of the worst ceviche of my life.  I hadn't been back since, until last night.  Last night there was a funky little private party for the holidays that I was lucky enough to attend and Joya turned around my opinion of their joint. First, let me compliment the wait staff on the excellent service.  Our side of the bar was packed with people, yet my drink never went empty, my dirty plates were consistently cleared and never once did I want for anything.  The food was a huge step up too.  Spicy guacamole with fresh chips, tri-tip skewers that were tender, juicy and had this green sauce that was lip licking.  Yucca fries, olives, some sort of other funky dip for chips, spicy squash, melons with pork.  Yum, yum, yum!  With a good Malbec on the side, this night made me a believer in Joya.  I might even give the ceviche another try.  Naw!  Why chance ruining a good thing?
I met my gal pal here for dinner so we could girl talk and catch up with what was going on with our lives. The portions were really small for the prices. We ordered: Croquetas - flavorful, felt slightly greasy and needed to be drained more after the bath in the deep fryer Pork Empanadas - delicious! loved the special green sauce! Kobe Sliders - interesting use of fusion, not sure if I was a fan... Mushroom Paella - would like to see more mushrooms instead of side ingredient filler Would I go back again? not sure... I love eating tapas and having a nice variety of food but with wine, it turned out to be pretty pricey for two!
The review on food alone would've been 4 stars but I deducted a star because it was overpriced.  I enjoyed the decor and ambiance and also liked the presentation of the dishes.  Do try their tapas as they were the highlights of our meal.  I especially enjoyed the kobe beef mini-burgers (though it was not as tender the second time), braised short rib tacos, and the paella clasica.  My friends also enjoyed the ceviche and the seared bay scallops with grilled corn.  I would definitely come back and try more tapas.
Hmmmm.  Don't bring a boring dinner date here because then you'll have pretty "meh" food AND a boring date.  Fortunately for me, only the dish was slightly boring. For some reason, I felt our paella was on the pan for a little longer than it should've been.  It was kind of dry, no? Of course you wouldn't know.  But it was slightly dry. The white peach sangria was fantastic though.  Four sips in and I was three sheets to the wind.  No joke, for real.
Absolutely fantastic drinks, and the open windowed layout of the building lets you enjoy your food and company in a nearly-outdoors, yet still intimate setting. But my god, the price they charge in return! :s The tapas we ordered were delicious, though a tad underseasoned. The accompanying cocktails were top notch --- will come back frequently for a dark and stormy. The entrees we had, some fish I was not familiar with and a jerk chicken, were reasonably good, though not stellar. The jerk chicken in particular was a very... odd... flavor. Net/net, Joya charges a lot for just-above average entrees, but makes it up with ambiance, booze.
Do Get: -White peach sangria (honestly...amazing) -Kobe beef sliders -Braised short rib tacos Everything else was delicious too. We went during the day so the price wouldn't break the bank! Super delicious and our server was great! (And good looking! Don't tell my husband!). Joya was awesome and a great ambiance. Nice to eat a meal outside again!
This past weekend I went to the Palo Alto Art Festival and instead of partaking in the fair food, our party of 4 decided to sit down and eat and we chose Joya because it looked appealing from the outside.  It was a quick wait and we decided to sample a few dishes and share instead of each getting our own.  We ordered: -Pork Empanadas (A little Bland) -Kobe Sliders (cooked just right) -Chorizo Corndogs (Awesome, especially with the Cilantro sauce that came with it) -Cuban Sandwich(Easy to split into 4, pretty good) -Chopped Romaine Salad(pretty good) -Platanos Fritos(Amazing, came with chipotle sauce and cotijo cheese) The waitress was extremely helpful and attentive, bring out our food in courses(Tapas first, then sandwich/salad, then platanos for "dessert").  The table was a bit small so I was worried about all the plates fitting, but they had an ingenious tiered tapas tray that made it so there was more than enough room.  She even offered to bring us new plates after each course. 5 for service.  4 for food. 4 for price.
I was taking the train up to a Giants game with 2 gf's and decided to stop in P.A. cause smart me thought the game was earlier in the day(started @6) so we rolled into Joya @1pm & to say the least had tons of time to burn & chilled at the bar here....it was fantastic...the glass front window/doors were wide open & the breeze was rolling in & the best Sangria was in no shortage & the atmosphere here is stellar. I've been at night too with the same great experience..its a MUST try in P.A. Pros: *Yummy fresh fruit sangria-red or white *mouth watering delicious food! *very chic & modern decor *lighting was suburb *glass windows in front open up completely to let in air during the day *at night the bar side turns loungey *good service *fresh restrooms *prime location Cons: N/A
Having lived in Palo Alto for a few years, I've eaten basically everywhere on University Ave several times over.  Joya has consistently been my favorite place to eat alone, or to bring out of town guests. The food is high quality all around, but I personally recommend avoiding the entrees and sticking to the tapas menu.  The tapas is where Joya really shines.  It goes without saying the Kobe Beef Mini-burgers are a must on every visit.  From there, I like spiral out, trying other random plates.  They change the menu around, but just enough to keep it fresh.  The Pork Tacos are spicy yet approachable.  The Crab Cakes are sublime, but pricey at 2 for $14.  The Chicken Sopes are my personal favorite, and they're enough to be a meal for one person.  Anything with sausage is to be tried. Joya also excels at desserts.  The strawberries and custard dessert is my favorite.  The Churros are the best I've ever had with a house-made chocolate sauce that isn't overly-sweet.  And the deep fried Oreos are just ridiculous, but worth a try if you've never had such a thing. I don't mind paying a premium for the food, but the bar can get expensive quickly, so don't order tequilla or whiskey.  But their Sangria (both red and white) is pretty awesome and they have a great by-the-glass wine menu.  I would like to see more beer options on tap. The hostesses here are always stunning and beautiful, and the waiters are hit-and-miss.  The building is a really nice and comfortable modern design, which appeals to my aesthetic.  I enjoy eating at the bar and outside.  They usually have music on Sundays, which can be a little loud, but I do enjoy a good Spanish guitar player.  The bathrooms are equally modern and clean.  This is an Approved Pooping Location. Joya is solid.  Go try it.  Order lots of little things and dessert, and avoid the big things.  Also, I recommend the David Bruce Petite Syrah--it goes well with almost everything (except fish) on the menu.
Great New World influenced tapas for lunch!  Truffled deviled eggs, guacamole, calamari, gambas, scallops, Mac n cheese, Brussels sprouts--we shared a good deal.  Vegetarians beware there was lots of hidden/unlisted meat. Red sangria and fruit flavored monitors were a hit.
Came here for a Yelp event. I love the sangria drinks - those are yummy. Not so much the virgin guava mojito though which was a little too sweet for my taste. I enjoyed the sliders/mini kobe beef burgers - they had a lot of flavor to them. The paella was alright, a little too salty for my taste. I didn't really like the croquettes either; they were a little dry and lacked any real distinct flavor. The churros are delicious especially since they're fresh made! I loved the chocolate sauce that came with it. Overall great atomosphere, and great drinks. Food is either a hit or miss.
Loved this place. We went on a Saturday evening and had to wait a bit for a table. The ambiance was beautiful with long curtains and delightful lighting. The lounge looked very inviting and seems like a party was on. We decided to start of with some pineapple sangria, which was a good twist but light on the wine part. For dinner we had a few small plates: calamari, chicken skewers, fired plantain, sauteed gambas, chicken sopes and two big entrees of salmon and jerk chicken. The food was very well prepared and excellently served. It was more than enough for 3 people and there were a lot of leftovers. We had no room for desserts. Overall a great place to go with friends and dine over some awesomely prepared spanish/ latin american food.
Dined here for lunch. We decided on an array of tapas with a pitcher of White Sangria. We ordered: Roasted Beet Carpacio salad Tequila Basil infused Melons Empanadas Seared Bay Scallops with Grilled Corn (my fav!) Sauteed Brussels Sprouts with brown butter Sauteed Gambas (prawns) Seared Spanish Sausages Warmed Herbed Goat Cheese Croquettes We enjoyed all but the last two. Next time, we'll try dinner.
I didn't really have anything bad to say about this place, but it just didn't wow me. It was a beautiful day so the outdoor seating was nice but feel a bit crammed. Since it was a linner (or whatever you call it between dinner and lunch) so we didn't sample very many things. Had the calamari, guacamole and a ceviche. Calamari was standard and the seasoning and cilantro aioli didn't have what it takes to reach the next level. I appreciate using different root vegetable chips for the guaca & chip, but it was overpriced. I definitely enjoyed the scallop and blood orange ceviche the most, nice acidity and fresh tasting. At then end of the meal, it was pleasant but didn't give me, even slightly, a dopamine high. The price made it not the greatest value. The ambience was lovely but rather typical of U Ave, lacking some character. 3.5 stars
**CATERING REVIEW*** I absolutely love working with Fabrice, the executive chef and his assistant (sous chef?) Anne.  I have had bad experiences working with other people at Joya and now only go directly to the source, which has never been short of perfectly pleasant.  Especially with Fabrice's accent.  I'm a sucker for accents... Over the past year, we have catered several meals for 20-60+ people and have never had a disappointment with the quality nor the service (again, strictly from Fabrice and Anne). They have also offered to cater other genres (French, Italian, etc) with proper lead time, all of those menus look nomtastic!
Delicious food Amazing sangria's. I didn't even think I liked Sangria's until I tried theirs. Pricey, Pricey.
"Trendy, chic decor. Delectable menu. Impressive wine list," wrote Stephanie C. from Santa Barbara.  I doubt I could improve on that synopsis, I'll just add some background and experiences from a few lunches so far. Joya (which like "pho" or "Xanh" is a non-English-phonetic word inviting mispronunciation) opened three years ago.  It bears some relationships (and therefore comparison) to Cascal in Mountain View..  Not only do both restaurants feature a loosely Tapas format, but I'm told at Joya that Joya was modeled after the successful Cascal (which opened 2003) and has had informal personnel overlap, such as sharing the same musicians for live entertainment.  (As a point of record, the Peninsula's major authentic Tapas restaurant for decades, open longer than Joya and Cascal combined -- its origins were even in Spain -- is Iberia in Menlo Park, formerly in Portola Valley.) Although we're more experienced with Cascal, friends and I definitely prefer Joya (of the two) for food.  Joya's light breezy open ambience isn't bad either.  (Cascal has excellent _outdoor_ seating for the days and hours where that works, but its high-ceilinged interior and went in for heavy dark decoration.)  My Joya dining experience has been a few meals sharing a range of small plates (in the Tapas tradition) covering as much as possible of the menu.  Joya's seafood dishes in Martini glasses were especially fresh, interesting, and memorable.  The most dramatic food comparison with Cascal has been the empanadas: light and and savory at Joya, lead-heavy at Cascal with thick dense fatty crusts.  (I've heard comments even from Cascal personnel in past years who found its versions of some small plates relatively heavy.)  However that's not Cascal's whole menu, and Cascal has its share of unique and interesting small plates and specials -- I just seem to remember more of them at Joya, even after fewer visits.
Definitely one of the better Tapa's bars I've been too on this side of the Bay.  Hanging out at the bar area prior to your dinner reservations is definitely something I recommend doing, heck, even after is fun. Service is great, prompt and knowledgeable of the menu.   I've tried pretty much everything on the menu here, all of which were delicious!
I've heard great reviews about this place and it pushed a gift from my work to finally make a reservation... There was so much to order and I must say my ambitious stomach wanted almost everything on the menu! We started off with a pitcher of sangria - they had an option of adding a shot of tequila, vodka, or whiskey or the cappahrina.  First round of the sangria was okay - I kind of realized why there's a suggested "added" shot option.  Our second pitcher we added 2 shots of the cappahrina and must say that made the sangria much more of a drink that was well needed to start our weekend off right... As far as what to eat we decided to order the following: Yucca Fries Sweet Potato Fries Chicken Sopas Dungeness Crab Cakes Calamari Two main dishes: Braised Pork with Brussels Sprouts, cubes of bacon and mash potato Seafood Paella for Two The tapas dishes were so good but I have to say my favorite pick was the Dungeness Crab Cakes which we ordered two between our party of 4. We shared the two main dishes - and were surprised that the Braised Pork was enough to feed all four of us leaving us with some to take home.  Their Seafood Paella another one of my favorite spanish dishes is pretty amazing. By the time we got done with the above tapas plus main courses we had no room for dessert. When we head back which we plan to real soon- we'll definitely order the Dungeness Crab Cakes and the Seafood Paella again and the coffee rubbed kobe main entree that I had my eye on...
Setting and ambiance = 5 stars. Food = 3 stars (nothing special except the guac and the gazpacho, but the prices are ridiculous for what you get). Drinks = 4 stars. Nice selection and creativity. Prices = 2 stars. Bang for buck is terrible. Lunch menu = 3 stars. The power lunch is not well thought out and the fish tacos are pretty lame. Overall, a great place for a date or a night out, not great for lunch. In the middle for me, so 3 stars.
We stopped in on a weekend night without reservations and were seated in around twenty minutes.  The atmosphere was very pleasing and the wait staff and hostess were all very friendly.  My wife and I started off with sangria (white peach and red pineapple) and they had very nice flvaors.  We had several tapas and we shared an entree. We had enough food left over for another meal, but we wanted to try different items.  The braised short rib tacos and the chipotle chicken tostadas had very good seasonings. We also had the chorizo corn dogs and yucca fries which were a good take on fast food. Our entree was a bacon-wrapped pork tenderloind that came with pureed sweet potatoes and brussel sprouts.  It was all delicious.  We ended the meal with deep fried oreo cookies with mint ice cream.  What an enjoyable dining experience.
I ate here for lunch today and felt compelled to write a review because of my experience. I was hosting a business meeting today at the restaurant, and it was an overall positive experience. The decor was nice, although some of the spacial choices were questionable (the tables were so close to the couches that I had to sit sideways to avoid banging my shins). Once we were seated, I had to applaud their attention to detail, and their service, both impeccable. All three of us ordered the Power Lunch special for $16. We all ordered the Joya salad, and different entrees. The salad arrived, and let me just say, there was a lot of greenery. This salad is like a forest. I dined upon it like a rabbit greedily enjoying the texture of the fresh vegetables and the delicious vinaigrette. Let me just say, there was a lot of foliage on this plate, so much so that neither of my colleagues were able to finish it. The main course I ordered was an Arepa (a cornmeal tortilla, pulled meat, and another tortilla, kind of like a taco but with pancakes instead of shells). I got two of these tiny things, and while they packed a lot of flavor, I found the portions to be ridiculous. It was almost like they gave you a ton of salad to substitute for the lack of a real entree. It would've been a small entree, but *wow;' way too small. It was good, but not mindblowing, and over far too soon for my taste. Great restaurants don't necessarily provide you with great food, but they always provide a great experience. The food at Joya was 4/5, the service was 5/5, but the portions were 3/5 and that's being generous. I don't think I've ever broken a meal into categories before, but it felt like the service staff were executing at a higher level than the culinary staff; which isn't a bad thing, but it does make it more difficult to provide a world-class experience. Overall, I enjoyed my time at the restaurant, but I would caution against ordering the power lunch. Their Tapas, or their formal entrees appear to be the route to go in the future. TL;DR: Overpriced due to portion size (not quality), great ambiance, and amazing service. Would eat here again, but would not order the Power Lunch special.
Their tapas worth 4 stars but the paella I had curve it down to 3. We had crab cakes, mini kobe beef burgers, and tuna tartare for the tapas. All are yummy and surprised us. Esp the mini burgers and tuna tartare!! Their paella is pretty salty for us. It's not overall salty, i guess the salt was put unevenly. You can taste one spoon paelle with normal taste, while the next spoon with salty taste LOL The service is pretty extreme too. Some waiters are pretty friendly and one dun. I order a sweeten ice tea and was given a unsweeten one. And the server turned around 2 seconds after he asked us how's food, so if you don't expect to listen, y would you ask?! when we told him the paella is just ok maybe too salty for us. He seems like unhappy and said their paella is classic and that's the taste should be. What the.......
Went there for a business lunch so I didn't have any drinks but the food and the service were impeccable. With the open window it could get a little chilly if the weather outside changes. Overall I would definitely go back.
I have been here two times in the past month for work dinners. I ordered the sole entree both times and BOTH times it wasn't cooked and I had to send it back! First time is forgiveable. Two times in a row, gross. I won't be picking this restaurant again.
Lots of variety with the Tapas selections. Some are better than others. Sangria was decent.
Here's what you want to know: $15 dollar cork fee for the first 2 bottles.  Any bottle after that is $30. Here's what you need to know: I ordered, and NO not on my own. My Krazy Persian Princess, her +1 and my cube were with me) *papas bravas, crazy potatoes $4  eh...worth $2bucks in my opinion. *croquetas with jalapeno fondue $6.50  yumm, and the butternut squash was a perfect add. *sampling of three ceviches $21 I only liked 1 and I couldn't tell you which one it was. *steamed mussels with chorizo...EEK. $9 I didn't dare touch the pork, but they were SooooOOO Meaty The posole was ordered and presented beautifully. My +1 advised it  was great and flavorful. After reading Sugar B's review about these freaking churros and having my caramel churro at X-mas in the park, the clear choice for dessert was the churro and the ice cream trio.  Both were $8 a plate. They were good, but not outstanding.  The gimmick being that they are served with delicious choco sauce.  Definitely a step above x-mas in the park, but not by much. Tragically, the silent killer of the night was a treat not sold at the restaurant, but brought to me by my pal.  She had made these dope PB & choco cookies that were so AMAZING. I dipped them in the sauce and I had sugar magic.  It was  a wonderful combination. The girl can sure make a mean PB & choco cookie-which is my FAVE :) The simple truth: AWESOME JOINT, AWESOME SERVICE. TRY VARIOUS THINGS AND YES, GET DESSERT.
I am in love with Joya. AGAIN! Ordered the following and verdict: (1) Coconut rock shrimp and corvina - this is one of the best ceviches ever! The coconut and lime juices are divine on the shrimp! Yumster! ($9.50) (2) Kobe Burger - Hmm, I can do without the burgers since it was cooked too well done for me. Next time I will order med-rare. But it's still good. ($11) (3) Tortilla short ribs - Daniela and I loooooooved this tapa. Holy smokes it's good. The tortillas are out of this world. Wow. The meat is flavorful, juicy, and not over powerful. Just awesome. ($9.50) (4) Churros - Melts in your mouth good. Need I say more? ($8) Of course I ordered a mango margarita ($10). I love this place, looking forward to coming out here again on a Saturday with a hot date.
When the menu has more alcoholic choices than food, you know I am interested. Impressive modern... Read more 
Although Joya didn't meet my expectation, to be fair, this place'd deserve a 3.5-star rating. Quality and taste of food is so-so. Service is a okay. The serving of  tapas is more than adequate. Thumbs up for its decoration and ambience, especially for the waiting lounge that you can order drinks and tapas and lay back and relax. I do like their ceviche, although it was made a bit sour. Charcuterie assortment and warm winter squash salad were okay. Pan fried halibut was a little disappointing because it was over cooked and dried. Even though a broth was served with this dish, it just didn't  make it up for me. Mushrooms al ajillo had only garlic flavor and quite blend. I wasn't really digging the sweet corn empanadas (maybe I was expecting too much). My recommendation is to carefully consider your order 'cause it can either be hit or miss.
Double date with two of our favorite people...Joya had been on the short list for weeks. We finally tried it over the holidays. The food was good but I expected way more for the price. In the ceviche trio...only the coconut was my favorite, so yummy...yet a little too much coconut milk going on there. Did you guys know that coconut milk is a diaharetic??? Speaking of ceviche, WHAT is up with the jalapeno cucumber ceviche...WHERE was the fish in that thing? All my mouth tasted was green fire. The empanadas were pretty tasty yet small, and the mussels were way too large and far too fishy for me to enjoy in any way. The croquetas were a big win...I def could have downed about 5 more of those cheesy mini darlings all by my lonesome. The crowning glory of the evening, the churros con chocolate. Now this SOUNDS good in principle and yes, the chocolate sauce was amazing, but the churros had hardly any flavor...I would take the little trolley stand churro in ESJ anytime over these little homemade sticks. How do you take fried dough, sugar and cinnamon and make it fairly tasteless??? BUT we still ate them all....and then licked the chocolate bowl clean, so go figure. Cheap corkage fee, strong peachy sangrias loaded with liquor and fruit, amazingly friendly and unsnooty waitress assistance. Bonus on wonderful presentation and a swank atmosphere. Food was about 3.5 stars, so it must have been the wonderful company and the warmth of the sangria that made it a great evening.
Now that I'm finally writing Yelp reviews instead of just browsing them, I have got to write about my terrible experience at Joya. I came to the restaurant last July on a recommendation from a colleague.  I scheduled a lunch meeting there for four people - big mistake.  The four seater tables were way small and really uncomfortable.  We struggled to find room to have any papers or notepads out, even before the food arrived. I recall that we started with the sliders that everyone raved about on Yelp.  I didn't think they were anything special.  And it was kind of awkward how the order had only three portions.  I feel like most people go to eat in parties of two or four?  Or maybe I'm just trying to find other ways to slam Joya before I get to the worst part. Their lunch menu is quite limited in terms of reasonably priced non tapas.  Tapas is probably not a good choice for a business meeting, in case you're thinking about it.  You'll constantly run into those moments where everyone thinks, "who's going to take the last piece?"  I think we all anticipated that so we opted for entrees.  I was feeling adventurous and got some sort of tuna salad.  And it was awful from the very first bite.  It tasted like tuna from a pouch tossed in some oil, celery, and other chopped veggies.  I probably should have stopped after the first bite to send it back.  But I stuck with it because I was in a meeting and didn't want to seem demanding or rude.  Well.  A few more bites in and I discovered a hair.  And not just ANY hair, but a particularly CURLY piece of hair.  As if the salad wasn't bad enough on its own! I immediately got the attention of a waiter but did it discreetly because again, I was in a meeting.  I simply pointed to the hair in the bowl and the server looked stunned.  He whisked it away without saying a word and got the attention of the chef on duty.  Several more cooks/servers congregated around the bowl and sort of glanced at me, and then they dispersed.  It was what happened and didn't happen next that really turned me off about the restaurant.  About 10 minutes later, the waiter came out with the same salad.  He never asked me if I wanted something else, the chef never came to apologize, nothing.  It could have been the SAME EXACT salad for all I know.  Of course I was just completely disgusted by that point and didn't touch the salad. This incident is particularly disturbing because it wasn't a hair from the top of someone's head that just accidentally fell into the salad.  Someone in that kitchen neglected to obey some very basic health and safety rules and the restaurant was unwilling to acknowledge that.  You come to expect this kind of behavior from a hole in the wall Asian place but not from a trendy restaurant on University Avenue where you're paying good money. There are other restaurants that are more worthy of your patronage!
4 stars for the lounge -- I'll be frequenting this bar! 3 stars for the restaurant -- It all depends on how hungry I am after the drinks. The lounge is nice and trendy, and I could see it inviting huge crowds on weekends. The restaurant is more reserved and elegant, and it's definitely a solid date spot. Food was tasty, but nothing that exciting or exceptional. The snapper ceviche was fresh, and of the four entrees (entradas) we had, though I tried to like my fish, I thought the jerk-marinated chicken was the most savory. Pork chops and steak both seemed okay. Good portions, and they did a nice job with the presentation. In short...we liked our dishes, but the fact that I can't really remember exactly how we enjoyed them (except for maybe the icecream!) is a sign that I probably wasn't all that impressed with the food... However, our waitress managed to impress us with her memory - she got all of our orders right without writing anything down. I've seen many servers do this at various restaurants, but more often than not, they get at least one thing wrong!
Happened to be in Palo Alto last night celebrating my friends birthday and we decided to head here after leaving Tamarine. Immediately we met two chefs.  The Executive Chef, Fabrice and Chef Jim from Evvia.  We had a great conversation with both of them.  Chef Fabrice even sent out desserts with candles for me friend.  The ambience here is fun, open and exciting.  The staff was very receptive and helpful.  The desserts were fabulous. We will definitely go back great place.
Since this place opened, I've been wanting to try it. I've been intrigued by the ambiance: the dark lighting, trendy interior and good looking people inside. The restaurant is situated right next to La Strada and from the street view, you're unable to see the name of either restaurant, but if you crane you're neck upwards, then you'll see their names. I accidentally went to La Strada first and I guess this happens a lot because when they didn't have my reservation, the guy said "you must be at our other restaurant, Joya" and he personally walked me next door and held the door open for me to enter Joya. The interior is uber trendy and very SF. I'm not quite sure that PA is ready for such a restaurant, but Palo Altoans must be because the place was packed. I especially liked the wall dividers, but what's with the cloud motifs? I didn't feel that it fit in with the ambiance. Lighting, like all trendy restaurants, was "mood lighting" and there were candles on each table and occasional chandeliers sprinkled throughout the ceiling. Okay, now to the food. This is what we ordered: -Kobe beef mini burgers ($11): DELISH! The beef was juicy and tender and loved the chipotle mayo. A definite recommendation! -Braised short rib tacos ($9.50): short ribs were also very tender and juicy and had a nice punch of flavor. I liked the tortilla that it was on...I think it was corn? -Grilled Walu w/saffron vinaigrete ($21): Walu is a butterfish. It was okay, nothing too special. -Roasted butternut squash & wild almond short cake ($9): came with pumpkin ice cream but to be honest, it really had no taste. The almond short cake was delish and the cubes of butternut squash didn't really hold its taste here. The whole dish reminded me of Thanksgiving. I felt the food was okay. I definitely agree with Season F. in that it can be "hit or miss" so Yelpers, definitely read the dishes that people recommend so that you'll get a fine dining experience! Service was great, waters were refilled multiple times and the  staff formally addressed you before taking you're place, "Miss, may I take your plate?" But I can see how the ambiance trumps the food. I'd definitely come back, if not for the food then to grab a few drinks after work or to meet up with some friends.
My review is very limited since I didn't have the chance to catch dinner here!  But i am glad that I passed by for desserts and drinks afterwards! The beautiful Stephanie provided excellent service of course!  I highly recommend her if you guys want top notch service when you decide to check this place out!  Who wouldn't want a pretty lady to serve and chit chat with you?!? I tried the Red Wine Sangria and i loved it! Served in a glass wine with fresh fruits.. I actually picked out the fruits in the end to eat them.. It is one of the best places to get sangria.. I damn right agree!! At other places, the fruits are chopped up in cubes, not giving the drink enough flavor.  I also got the chance to sip some of the white peach sangria and i for sure like the red one better!  hands down! Now for desserts.. we got to try the small plate churros.. it made me miss how much i used to eat these at Great America.. but hand size churros for desserts.. you get about 5 to 6 of them.. just enough and right portion to enjoy another taste of another dessert if you are sharing with another individual.  Lastly the chocolate souffle... the melted chocolate is to die for... when i took the first bite.. the chocolate melted out like lava.. warm... gooey.. thick.. chocolate.. so good with the side of ice cream.. you got to ALWAYS have the A LA MODE when it comes to super chocolatey desserts.. its the perfect combination! Great atmosphere! Loved the Lounge! Loved the colors and lighting!  Chic and classy!  I definitely will be coming back!
My friend who lives down the street has been eyeballing this place for a while. When we found out when they were unveiling we decided to hit up opening night. As we talk to the hostesses they tell us they're 5-10min behind and that we should feel free to have drinks at the bar. As we make our way to the bar, who do I see? Why SV community manager Connie C.! Now it's her job to find the new hip and hot spots. Me on the other hand, I just like to get my eat on and my drink on. Is Joya (pronounced hoy-ah) a new hip and happening spot? It certainly has the makings of it. Owned by the La Strada team right next door, they totally renovated what was the old US Bank building into a beautiful space. The restaurant occupies a corner spot of the building which has been transformed into a  an area that opens up patio style to the street. The lounge area has some  nice plush couch seating with the bar being open and approachable from both the lounge side and dining room. Lots of dark wood, glass, and mirrors are prevalent throughout, appointed in a very modern interior design. The only aesthetic that I didn't really care for were the large curtains that seemed like over sized shower curtains. Otherwise the space  looks nice. As we perused the menu, it's broken up into a bumber of tapas and then a handful of entrees. Since we were opting variety, we went all tapas. I think we covered 3/4 of the tapas. -Piquillo peppers stuffed with bleu cheese -Charcuterie and cheese platter -Trio of ceviches -Assortment of sausages -Roasted whole prawns -Ahi Tartare over Avocado We thought everything was quite tasty with the Peppers being the weakest, as the bleu was too strong for the Piquillos. The sausage asortment and two of the three ceviches stood out, especially the coconut rock shrimp/bass one. We also had the house made ice creams and a strawberry/cream style dessert which were also quite good. Solid across the board and I'll be back to try the entrees. Service was very friendly, from the bartenders to our server Natalie, who was awesome and quite attractive (as were most of the female servers; lots of eye candy). Even though we were seated fifteen minutes late from our reservations, we were done with dinner in about an hour and fifteen, so the kitchen really kicked some ass. The patrons are mostly your typical high maintenance types (this is Palo Alto you know). This however isn't a deterrent for me;  I'll return and try more of the food and possibly hang at the lounge for drinks. Great debut and hopefully they can manage the initial "new hot restaurant" rush. 4.5 stars.
Yuck.  Yes, the decor is nice and both the exterior and the interior look appealing, but the attraction stops there.  Food was downright BAD to the point that we sent several dishes back.  The seafood tasted old and many of the mussels we were served were closed.   Service was spotty. This place will only get my business again if it is for drinks...and even then I am not so sure.
I went for my 4th time last night and the 4 stars were well-deserved! The previous times I've been there, my friends didn't care for the tall, dark-haired gentleman that was managing the hostesses. Next time, we'll get his name. I didn't personally interact with him but I guess he was discourteous and unmannerly towards my friends. Minus 1 star! We didn't see this inhospitable host last night. Maybe that's why it was a 4-star experience this time? Initially, we put our names down for a table but as we waited in the lounge area, we decided that it was more comfortable and entertaining to eat there. Good decision. My GF and I each started-off with a glass of the peach sangria and even though I've had this thirst-quencher before, the glass they serve them in still looked as huge as the very first time I saw it. TIP: order the single glass servings versus the pitcher because supposedly the pitcher serves four but 3 of my GFs and I proved that theory wrong. After you finish your huge glass of sangria, they give you a little fork to savor the soaked fruit pieces. Mmmmm! For our meal, we decided to split the ahi tuna tartare, braised short rib tacos, and the kobe beef mini-burgers. The tacos and mini-burgers come in three's, but our server offered to make them four each so that we could split them evenly. How sweet of her! Sounds like a lot of food for two girls but we have big appetites! We cleaned off every plate and our server, Stephanie (who is gorgeous!), was impressed. She mentioned that she was surprised we finished everything but sadly, we didn't leave room for desert. The tuna tartare was small but yummy! The braised short rib tacos were almost too spicey for me (can't really do spicey anymore) but they tasted too good to go to waste. The kobe beef mini-bugers were my faaaaavorite! I highly recommend them! I really like the lounge area of Joya, and the general tone and mise en scene of the restaurant as a whole. My GFs and I meet for Happy Hours and dinners in PA quite a bit and I think I will recommend Joya more often from now on.
We decided to go to Palo Alto after a long work day.  A colleague called ahead of time and put down our name.  They said it would be a 30-minute wait.  We arrived.  It was busy, very busy.  They told us it would be 30 minutes. We went to the bar.  It was crowded.  We waited and got a place to sit and ordered a bottle of wine from the barely clad waitress.   She got the full attention of the men I was with who told me she was easy on the eyes.   I felt uncomfortable when she tried to open a bottle of wine and pour while bending down.   Her outfit did nothing for me and actually I found it inappropriate and I am no prude. The time went by and we started to feel a need to eat.   We asked our waitress how long it would take for our table since 30 minutes had come and gone a long time ago.  She came back with the menu and said it would be another 15 minutes.  We ordered some tapas.  They were decent.  Then, they came to tell us the table was ready.  We had to take our glasses and wine.  When we got to the front, they said "oh they are bussing your table."  One of my colleagues was in from London and was exhausted; he came in that day and for him it had been a very long day. They made us wait at the entrance.   When someone complained, the hostess gave us unbelievable attitude.  It really turned me off this place because all she had to do was say she was sorry.  There was absolutely no reason for her to be on the attack.   I was so disappointed by how she behaved.  It was unnecessary. We were finally seated, while still carrying our own wine, which was ridiculous.  By the way, they make you close out the bill in the bar and you can't transfer it to your table so maybe they think that you have to carry your own?  I have no idea.  It was odd. We sat down and waited.  When the waiter showed up, he said that he heard we had issues and said here is a complimentary tapa.  Whatever.  I wanted to focus on the people I was with and not on the drama of the restaurant. My friends enjoyed the cheviche and calamari.  I found the tuna tartare nice.   These are definitely not Spanish tapas.  We had a beautiful bottle of Malbec. The Executive Chef came out to find out what happened, which was a nice touch.   I would have preferred to get the table in 30 minutes and not have to tell you about all this drama. The hostess and her attitude made me give this a 2-star review because all I remember was the bad taste she left in our mouths for absolutely no reason.
4.5 stars. I took my fiance here for his birthday over the weekend. We chose to do a variety of tapas and ordered a pitcher of the red sangria. The food was amazing. We ordered 5 tapas, including the kobe burgers and the guacamole. SO GOOD. 5 might have been 1 too many for us, but it didn't matter. The sangria was also pretty good. Not the absolute best I've ever had, but really good nonetheless. We had the churros for dessert and it was heaven in my mouth. So soft, light and fluffy! They were out of the dessert wine we ordered so they brought us a different one on the house. Sounds like a 5 star review right? The only downside to this place was the service. It started out really well and quickly went downhill. Our server seemingly forgot about us, and we sat at our table with empty dinner plates and empty sangria glasses for about 20 minutes while he took orders at other tables. All in all, I'd go back there again!
4 stars for the divine combination: Drinks & Dessert. Came by here with a friend, but the kitchen was closed by 11, so they seated us at the bar/lounge area.  The space is dimly lit with a sleek vibe, loud music, and lounge seating for close canoodling or small groups.  Our bar was in the center of the restaurant, where we had Anthony as our bartender. He suggested that we skip the Sangria pitcher and opt instead for the single glass, which gives you more of the pour for your dollar.  Sure enough, our large wine glass was filled to the BRIM with yummy red pineapple sangria. Made with Lambrusco wine, so it's got more zest and sparkle than a usual heavy red.  It's not strong, but it's tasty and refreshing!  We also tried another friend's white peach sangria, made with Sauvignon Blanc, which was delightfully light and sweet. We complemented our drinks with a warm chocolate cake paired with thyme flavored ice cream - oozy, and oh-so-delish.  I'd love to come back to check out the rest of the menu, especially their varied mojitos.  Not sure about the food yet, but I think the bar is a great place in downtown Palo Alto to chill and quench that evening thirst & sweet tooth.
Great Tapas. Great sangria (both white and red). Great service.
*** Easter Sunday 4/12 *** I thought I'd take my family (Jackie & Rylan) out for a nice Sunday Brunch. Considering I've NEVER had brunch before, where the heck do you go? With a late start to the day (due to Easter Mass) we headed into downtown Palo Alto. We easily found free ample parking in one of the side street garages. And after loading up the stroller, with followed the live smooth jazz music coming from the open air restaurant, JOYA. Being that it was a Holiday, it was one of the only places open. The place looked good from the menu and their vibe. The food, service, and fresh Sangria was terrific. Not only is this a modern & hip restaurant/bar...it even has a lounge! I can only imagine the chill peeps hanging out at night in my old stomping grounds of PA! (+) New surroundings, LIVE music, great for groups or intimate meals, yummy menu & full bar... (-) Dirty mirrors, stained glasses, staff talking & drinking in clicks... PS The mistisa bartender was pretty ;-) Future UYE - definitely!!!
There are only two reasons why this place earned two stars instead of one, and neither of them had anything to do with the food. #1- The water service was out of this world. It was amazing. I took a sip of my water and within seconds, there was someone there to fill it back up to the top. When my friend took a sip of his water, bam, within seconds someone else was there to fill his water glass. He even mentioned he didn't like the temperature of the water, so the "water specialist?", speedily brought out a water with ice within seconds. Like I said, it was like nothing I have ever seen before. There were about 8 "water boys?" to every two servers... #2- ALL of the hostesses look like they just stepped off the runway, the cocktail waitresses were some of the most beautiful, exotic looking women... I have ever seen in my life! Went to gaze at their beauty, jaw dropped, in a trance...etc etc...One of them half-french, half Vietnamese... OMG....Drop Dead gorgeous! The food was disgusting. I'm just not really a big fan of Tripe...(intestines of various animals...), nor beef, pork or shellfish. I even tried the stuffed dates, ugh, we had to send them back. This place is served "family style", so we ordered a lot of tapas and shared them...Our server was so hard to find...and most of the food we ordered went to someone else's table, but eventually we got everything we ordered. Not sure I would go back for dinner. I would consider going back for a drink served by one of the cocktail waitresses...
friends and i were visiting for  a big reunion at the farm!  after spending who knows about half an hour looking for parking on a friday night then walking up and down the avenue, we came across this place.  i personally wanted sushi, but they wanted to try this spot b/c it was hopping. now, i didn't even know what kind of food they served when we sat down.  but the place looked nice.  sleek, clean, elegant - lots of dark woods with crisp white tablecloths.  very contemporary modern feel. i had the salmon with greens, at $22.  it seemed to have a very lightly honey coated glaze and the skin crackled perfectly and deliciously.  whoever cooked this knew what they were doing.  i could have eaten a second portion it was so good. i also had some fruity pomegranate vodka something (lemon) drink at $12.  it was definitely tasty BUT not at all strong.  ;-( overall though truly delicious.  service was nice and efficient.  food was really good.  yum i want some more just thinking about it.....!
Aesthetically, I liked it.  The layout with the bar down the middle splitting up the lounge and the restaurant, the high ceilings and windows, celing fans and the intricate dividers breaking up the space.  The mix they were playing that night was good too, not all Gypsy Kings, but a little too loud so I had some trouble hearing when someone spoke to me. The food was ok.  I agree with other reviewers that the portions for most of the tapas were small for the price and pretty much forgettable  The entrees were pretty hearty though so I would pass on the tapas and just get one of the big plates if you're hungry.  The Argentinan steak was tender and perfectly cooked, with a nice chimichurri sauce. Surprisingly for me, the best part of the meal was dessert.  The strawberry creme was fantastic.  Light, creamy, not too sweet with perfectly ripe strawberries.  The churros were nice too, moist and not crunchy like at fairs and great with the chocolate dipping sauce. I don't know that a pretty place with good dessert would be enough to draw me back though. It was all a dream.... (Thanks, J, can't get that out of my head now.)
Va-va-va-voom! Joya (or Hoy-ya, as I was told it's pronounced) has one of the sexiest restaurant bars/lounges I've seen in a while. If Joya were a sexy actor, it would be Antonio Banderas pre-Melanie Griffith: suave, dark, and handsome. But I digress. My companion and I made a dinner of a few tapas: gambas with chorizo, Ahi tuna tartare with taro chips, and braised short rib tacos with horseradish cream. The shrimp was garlicky, and the spicy sausage really added to the flavor, making me want to sop up the buttery sauce with whatever was available. The tuna tartare was a cool, soothing counterpoint to the bold flavors of the gambas. Yet the short rib tacos, which I'd most looked forward to trying, were not as flavorful as I'd anticipated. In fact, they brought the meal down a notch. However, Joya quickly redeemed itself with the caramelized pineapple butter cake. After having a pineapple pie in Cabo last year, I'd been craving the sensuously tropical flavor of caramelized pineapple. Thankfully, Joya's version was virtually the same but didn't require international travel. I'll mostly go back for this dessert but also look forward to trying more tapas and the sangria I keep hearing about.
Joya is a great tapas fusion restaurant in downtown Palo Alto. It is a great place for a date. The atmosphere is lounge-y and very modern and classy. I came here with my family over the holidays and we wanted to eat tapas family style, so we each ordered 2 or 3 tapas and shared them. This was a great way to survey a large selection of dishes. The best were: ceviche (w/ seabass), chipotle chicken tostadas, paella croquettes, kobe beef sliders, and the yucca fries. I would definitely recommend ordering those. Everything was delicious with the exception of charcurterie assortment, I think you could skip on that. Now on to drinks: 3 words WHITE PEACH SANGRIA. This is the most delicious drink I have ever tasted in my life. The infusion of peach into the white wine was the perfect combination. We also had the Red Wine pineapple sangria and the mojito, which were both also awesome; however they did not top the white peach sangria. The service was great and attentive. I will definitely be back here! I would definitely recommend making a reservation if you'd like to have dinner here. It's a very popular spot.
Downtown Palo Alto is one of my favorite spots in the Bay Area. University Avenue is full of great places to eat. I had passed by Joya a number of times and had always wanted to dine there. Reservations were fairly easy to get and a great idea as the restaurant can get crowded. We were seated promptly upon arrival. The decor is quite neat, very inviting and has quite the appeal to it. Waiters are dressed in crisp black. The dinner was my re-introduction to wine after not having indulged in any for quite some time. We got a glass of the buena vista, carneros 2005 Merlot as a safe choice and a glass of the layer cake, mendoza 2007, argentina to be a little more adventurous. Both glasses were excellent and perfect for pairing with the tapas. The waiter recommended two per person so we ordered 4 tapas. First were the spinach and cheese empanadas. The outside was crisp with warm delightful filling inside, quite pleasing to the taste buds. Our second tapa was the Ahi Tuna Tartare. The tartare was very fresh, and excellently presented. It tasted even better than it looked. The third tapa was the sizzling camarones al ajillo. The shrimp was great, a little confusing initially as the shells were there for presentation, kind of like when they leave a fish's head on the plate. The last entree was mini kobe beef burgers, delicious. The meat was just perfect. We did not order dessert at the restaurant. No complaints here at all, great food,, kudos to great wine picking. I was really impressed, will have to return here.
Came here on a Monday to celebrate a friend's birthday. Friend made a reservation over the phone because OpenTable said they were booked for the night. Got a reservation for 6:30. I enjoyed the decor and the ambiance of this place. The large wooden door at the front and the wall of wine in the entry feels classy but relaxed. We were dressed down and no one cared. We were seated right when we arrived a little before 6:30, even though our full party wasn't present (that was nice!).We took our time walking through the menu, they have small plates to share as well as entrees. Overall menu is kind of small, but covers a lot of different tastes. Wine and drinks selection is HUGE! Highly recommend getting a bunch of small plates to share, but beware they can add up if you get too many.... We enjoyed: *Chips and Guac (Simple dip served with fancy chips-- taro, sweet potato etc!) *Warm herbed goat cheese (served in a marinara sauce with a side of crostinis, not bad but you have to like goat cheese) ---TIP: they will bring you extra crostinis/chips if you run low! *Tacos (decent but not a stand out) *Kobe beef sliders (MMmm.. crowd pleaser) *Original Paella (expensive, but huge and FULL of seafood!) The server was friendly and accommodating~ maybe a little imperceptive because we had a surprise guest coming and she kept asking when the other member would arrive despite our attempts to signal her off the topic... haha oh well. Dinner was good but the company was better. Still, a lovely evening and a great restaurant, I'd come back again for a special occasion.
I honestly don't know why this place has so many bad reviews.  I've been here twice (once with my girlfriend, and once with a group of 9) and both times it's been great! First lets talk about the food, the dishes range from average to awesome, I'll list my 5 favorites below: Patatas Bravas - Seasoned crispy potatoes with a garlic aioli and my baseline for a good tapas place.  Joya's version was very flavorful, I wish they were a bit spicier but they're still great.  $4 for a decent size portion. Short Rib Tacos - Excellent dish, and my favorite on their menu.  I love short ribs, and these have been consistently good.  Melt in your mouth meat, a great sauce, with some nice thick tortillas (possibly homemade?). Calamari - Above average in taste and my recommendation if you're hungry, it seems to be their largest tapas.  Not too oily / greasy like calamari can tend to be. Cheese Plate - Normally I save my cheese plates for wine bars when I feel like looking all hoity toity.  But this is a good one, $12 gets you lots of cheese and some sweet accompaniments like a truffle honey sauce which is amazing. Ceviche - Surprisingly big portion, but then again for $21 for a sampling of 3 it ought to be.  This comes with generous servings of snapper, calamari, and rock shrimp. To drink, you must get a pitcher of the delicious white peach sangria.  Have them throw in a few shots of Rum for a non girly version. :)  I like the taste the rum adds and it's too weak with just the wine IMO. Being downtown Palo Alto, you'd expect the service to be somewhere between apathetic and incompetent.  But that wasn't the case, both waiters we've had have been excellent.  In particular, the server we had for the party of 9 was very professional, made great recommendations, and was good at checking up on us to see if we needed anything.  This was despite the fact that the restaurant was fairly busy. As a bonus on our second visit, there was some live flamenco that was decent and not too loud.  A nice addition to the already stylish and relaxed atmosphere.
3.5 stars. My fiance & I had dinner here tonight.  I love Latin American and Spanish food and had been wanting to come here for a long time, so I was really looking forward to it, despite mixed reviews about the food on Yelp.   Overall, we felt like the food (except for dessert) didn't live up to our expectations, but the service was great.   It's also pretty pricy, although tapas/small plates always tends to be. They recommend 2-3 tapas per person, and tapas average around $10, so it adds up quickly.   We wanted to leave room for dessert and weren't starving, so we shared 4 tapas for the 2 of us: --guacamole with "new world" chips ($7.50): guacamole was only ok (too cilantro-y for me) but the chips (including plantain and sweet potato) were fantastic. --bay scallops with grilled corn ($11.50): this was the dish I was looking forward to the most and it was a big letdown.   It said something about truffle oil on the menu but there wasn't much flavor to me, other than salt. --empanadas ($9): The menu said choice of 2 mushroom or 2 pork, but they let us have one of each.   I liked the mushroom empanada.  It had a very flavorful cheese & the pastry was delish.  My fiance ate the pork one and didn't really like it.   He had some of my mushroom one and said the mushroom was better. --paella croquetas ($9): Interesting and pretty tasty.  I've had croquettes before, but never ones with paella, which are similar to, but not as good as, arancini.   Very greasy, definitely not a healthy dish, but this was probably my favorite of all 4 things we ordered. Pretty much everything came with sauces, all of which were served on the side, which I appreciate since I'm not a big sauce person. We (read: I) had the warmed chocolate cake ($9) for dessert, which was outstanding and very lava-y. Nothing except the chocolate cake blew me away, but nothing was bad.   We both felt portions were pretty small for the prices when they brought the dishes out, but ended up full after only 2 tapas each (plus dessert).    It's definitely a very scene-y/lounge-y atmosphere but I didn't feel like they where snobby at all.   In fact, the service was great.   We were kind of ambiguous when we ordered so we tried to flag our waitress down to clarify.  A manager noticed us trying to get her attention and came over to our table.   After we explained he went to correct the problem and reported back to us that our waitress had understood us all along...so great service from everyone on that count. It was better than a 3-star "only ok" place, but I'm in no hurry to go back at these prices and that's my 4-star barometer, so 3 stars for now (until Yelp starts allowing half stars).
Let me start with service, as I see many complaints about it on here.  I've been to Joya twice now and I've never gotten anything but exemplary service.  Plates are cleared moments after they become empty.  Wait staff appears as soon as I have the thought to look up for them.  Water glasses never even near empty.  The sommelier even came by to ask us what we thought of our bottle of wine as it was one he had recently added to the menu.  In fact, in my experience, this place has been an object lesson in what good service should be and I've always been here on busy weekend nights. The food is likewise excellent.  The short rib tacos are juicy and flavorful and probably my favorite item on the menu.  The tuna tartar showed my man Jeremy G. just how good a tuna tartar can be.  Plus the cheese plate, empanadas, charcuterie plate, and crab cakes are all divine.  And then there's the desserts.  If you love dessert, you will LOVE Joya.  I highly recommend the churros with warm chocolate dipping sauce and the strawberries madrilene.  The two are a wonderful contrast with the warm, rich, sugary churros and the lighter, tangier, brighter, fresher strawberries. On my last visit here, I brought my dad who is a food and wine aficionado.  Even he agreed that the service and food were top notch.  I'll definitely be back!
Great place for any meal.  Make sure you have reservations otherwise you could be waiting a while for a table.  We've always ordered tapas style to get more variety of food.  My fave is the ceviche sampler.  A meal in itself.  Three diffrent flavors of ceviche with variety of chips.  The sliders are tasty and perfectly cooked.  The empanadas and yucca fries are yum!  Great ambiance.  Dont forget to order a pitcher of sangria! Michelin rated to boot!!
My personal rating system tells me that Joya is worth 3 stars, but apparently I'm too kind: "Meh.  I've experience better" is Yelp's two star description and that's really how I felt. The drinks were good and the atmosphere is stylish and cool.  It is the kind of atmosphere, in fact, that makes everyone more attractive than they really are.  But it also made the food look better than it really tasted.  My salmon was bland.  So were a few of the tapas. Service was unremarkable either way, but the table for four was too small, so it seemed like we were constantly shifting plates around to make the waiter's life easier. Really, Joya is all about surface, not substance.
July 26, 2009 - Palo Alto Bar Crawl details (on Twitter under #pabcrawl) Stop 10 - http://twitpic.com/bsk1o - Joya (Caipirinhia) Joya was stop #10 on the incredible Saw Palmetto crawling bear.. oh wait, *slaps self and splashes cold water on face* - Stop 10 on the Palo Alto bar crawl! It was one of the few places still open (we had just left a place across the street that wouldn't serve us since they said last call was over - liars!!).  There was some kind of live music playing but our singular focus was on the bar - interesting design and materials for the bar.  Must go back for a closer look.  I ordered a Caipirinhia since I really needed the sugar to keep my energy level up LOL.  It was quite good but I've definitely had better.  I noticed the bartender putting little conical paper caps on the bottles in the bar.  I asked why and was told that was to keep the bugs out. Euuuwwwwwwwwwww!  ANd then, Cooooool - drunk bugs partying on the bar after lights out - awesome!!!! We knew the night was drawing close to a finish as we solemnly drank our drinks and contemplated the impending end of our noble quest.  The Fellowship had suffered terrible losses - we lost Tracy and Andre to geekdom, we lost Dennis to practicality.  Now, it was just the three of us standing (which is actually a stretch since I don't think either of us could have stood still for long).  The fate of the world was in our hands!  We had to get to our final destination and steal the gorilla's nuts in order to declare the quest successful! Errrm, that sounded rather gross - read on to find out how it ended :) ~ 3 stars - mainly because everything was rushed and blurry and the bartenders were too busy shutting down to stand and flirt with us.  WOuld have given it two stars but drunk bugs always score an extra star from me.  Always. # 121
I really like the atmosphere of Joya. Large windows, bright and airy. High ceilings. For appetizers, I had the ahi tuna tartare and mexican empanadas. The tartare was just OK...I've had better. I enjoyed the mexican empanadas  which came with a really tasty sweet sauce. The Lamb Noisette Skewer was the star of the night. Fantastic presentation, succulent lamb, flavorful rice and grilled peppers. I will have to come back again for the paella!
Went there with a big group of friends during the Palo Alto Arts Festival weekend. We were seated in the external, "almost-patio" area, then we happened to have more friends coming in and despite the crowded restaurant they kindly managed to put us on a bigger although more isolated area in the far back. The tapas and the sandwiches were very good. The paella was good but don't come here for it. :-) I had a white wine sangria and a caipirinha, and they were both great. Just loved the ambiance and kind of laid back vibe. Come here with friends for good drinks and tapas and forget about time and formality. Ah, I almost forgot: yup, it is pricey - as pricey as any other restaurant in U ave. So again, have some drinks, enjoy and forget about the bill.
I have had several great meals at Joya in Palo Alto.   The atmosphere at the restaurant is open, modern, clean, and the food is varied, creative and always tasty.  I highly recommend people try their yummy appetizers.  So glad this classy restaurant is in the area.
This review is only for the lounge area. This type of place reminds me of any restaurant trying to be fancy: pretty decor, lackluster food (at least the food that was available at the time) It's a good place to meet friends for a drink but please don't order the food. Since churros dipped in chocolate was the only thing available so late at night, I had to order it because I was starving. Even with my really low expectations, I was pretty disgusted by how bland it tasted. It was literally, eating a churro with chocolate syrup all over it. Gross and heavy. I blame the waitress who shoved her big boobs distracted all of us while she told us it was "super good" Don't lie, just tell me it's ok. I prefer honesty than false advertisement because sooner or later, I'm gonna end up trying it anyway. However, because I do like the decor and the dinner menu looks promising, I do wanna give this place a try again. However, I will never let myself get distracted by big boobs when starving. Bad.
I was a little unsure of this place at first, not being a huge Tapas fan. It is decorated superbly. Very comfortable seating and chairs. Very classy looking. The staff are very attentive and knowledgeable. The food was high quality and DELICIOUS! Spanish and Latin American cuisine with flavors to die for! From spicy to mild, the menu had a great selection. Also, try the sangria! I love this area and has a lot of great places to eat. This is one of them! Great place for friends and large groups.
This place is uber awesome to bring a bunch of foodie friends.  The chef, Fabrice, is awesome, but he'd be awesomer if he returned my emails so I could interview him for a http://www.tastytwosome.... adventure. :( AAAAANYWAYS. the food is good because you can share tapas (they have this rich guacamole with root chips that are made in-house. They also have a nice little tapas sampler that's making me hungry- by just writing about it! Every month they do a themed latin country.  I visited Cuba.  Oh, and the servers?  If you get a good one (they are all cute), he's make love to your ears with his descriptions.  Just ask. Tell him you need it.  Tell him you need him to make love to your ears with his descriptively seductive words. :)  happy eats. :)
Joya has been busier than just about every other restaurant downtown, and now I know why. Food, wine, and ambiance are all spot on. I walked around the inside before it filled up and the decor is quite impressive, though hard for me to describe. The partial room dividers are fabulous, the lighting is good, the materials inviting, though I still find the white melamine bar odd. Both the chairs and the banquettes are too low for the tables. I asked the server if other people had mentioned this; her answer: "Oh yeah." The Spanish guitar music was satisfying and not obtrusive. I got a chance to look at the wine list in detail. You will find a large fraction of bottles selling for $28 or $32, including a 2004 Rioja Crianza. By and large the list is extremely well chosen, and the selection by the glass is pretty good. I've written before that the wine comes only from California, Spain, Chile, and Argentina (wait, there might be one New Zealand Sauvignon Blanc). A lot of the glasses sell for only $7 or $8, including the aforementioned Rioja. I was there for lunch so I did not imbibe. The food was heavenly. My companion had the posole soup, with pork, lime, cilantro, radish, onion, and cabbage; he pronounced it outstanding, better than he has found elsewhere. I enjoyed two tapas, the boquerones and queso fresco crostini, and the croquetas made with potatoes, pasilla peppers, and corn and served with a jalapeno fondue; for all of $6.50 each they made a nice lunch. The boquerones were three small fish (marinated like ceviche rather than cooked) on crostini with tomatoes and a chevre-like queso fresco, all on a bed of arugula. For dessert I had a heavenly meringue-surrounded fruit sorbet all topped with tequila flambe. My friend had something akin to a raspberry-strawberry parfait, and parfait it was. Service was friendly and mostly attentive. It was fun to be there.
Joya is nestled right smack dab on University Avenue in Palo Alto. Great location especially since most of their patrons will be attracted to the very modernized and urban decor which greets you at first sight. Walt and I ate here for lunch this afternoon and we dined semi-alfresco with its opened large windows so we were drawn to its space and furniture. This type of restaurant reminds me of being in NY or somewhere metropolitan; did not expect such an attractive and airy space especially in downtown Palo Alto. Toto, we are not in Kansas anymore. So let's get down to the food. Walt and I shared two tapas: camarones and the ahi tuna tatare. Great portions and excellent. Very tasty, indeed. Although I wished they had served the ahi tuna tatare with a slice of lime to add some acidity to the dish. But fair enough, it was fine without it. The camarones (shrimp) in a clay dish was nice. It had alot of garlic and spring onion flavors. We shared Paella and this fell short of my expectation. It was quite bland and I'm sorry to say this but the Paella was dull. The restaurant claims to have Basque/Spanish influences in their food so granted, I was a bit skeptical when I saw their Paella. There weren't enough seafood to expedite this dish. It lacked peas, chorizo, scallops, clams and squid/calamari rings. I should know. I'm a cook. Instead it had their usual fare of shrimps, mussels and chicken, oh, and red and green peppers to add some color to the dish. The rice was cooked perfectly, though. I wished it was more flavorful. Our server was gracious and friendly. I can tell they were busy when the late lunch crowd arrived. We were seated by 11:15am. Despite the semi-alfresco dining experience, there were alot of flies. Huge flies buzzing above our plates. A huge annoyance. But that's expected. So for those of you who don't like flies as a part of your meal's "entertainment," don't sit near the open area. Saw Walt smack his lunch cloth napkin across the table to whack this fly. Such a pinoy moment. HAHAHA I would come back here again and maybe try sitting at the bar with a friend or two. I'll probably try their white peach sangria or a mojito and share tapas. Thanks Walt for another great lunch. Always good times, friend!
Very tasty! PROS + Service: friendly/attentive and brought a candle out for my birthday + Papas bravas, chicken sopes, sauteed gambas + White Sangria + Ambience, great lighting, awesome, open decor CONS -  pricey as most of Palo Alto is, but it's the best tapas in South Bay so far -  calamari: way too salty! All in all I would go back for a special occasion but would probably opt for Cha Cha Cha Cuba in San Mateo for a more casual event with less expensive tapas. :) I would say I prefer Joya over Cascals.
Went there for happy hour with the hubby and our friends.  Great place in downtown for PA for happy hour. The food selection was very good (obviously since we ordered quite a bit for the four of us).  We ordered the empanadas, kobe sliders, calamari, fries & ceviche (again, no complaints with any of the mentioned dishes). Our waitress was attentive and seemed to be keenly aware when our drinks were running low (if ordering the white sangria, opt for the pitcher, because you will drink a LOT of it). The only down side...we spent over $200 on tapas and drinks and walked away still hungry (ok, not necessarily Joya's fault since it is known for its small dishes).
I'm quite sad, I had visited this place first in 2008 and thought it was quite good. Things have changed. It was really a painful experience this time around! I will not be going back, and really regret the expensive dinner we had there. The food was appalling: - the portions are just ridiculously large, and being European, this annoys me a lot ;))) - the fries had clearly been re-fried and re-heated several times, and were almost cold and not nice obviously - the mix of flavours were just wrong, and quite bland The restaurant atmosphere & decor are really nice however, and the bar is definitively a cool place to chill and have a good cocktail. The music is energizing, and I like the couches setup. But it's cramped with people waiting to go to the restaurant, making the whole experience a little weird. But because of the bar, I'll give it a second star. Last thing. Might seem strange. But here you go. I also didn't like how the waitresses were dressed. A little too short and not very classy. When you are having a romantic date with your girl friend, it creates a little uneasiness.
The owners of La Strada had mentioned they were opening a new Spanish tapas location (the night we were searching for oysters) and after reading Connie C's great review, I was excited the place had finally open. Swank and beautiful, Joya is a wonderful addition to downtown Palo Alto.  The open-air design of the restaurant, along with first class additions of an impressive wine rack and bar area, all add to the very high class environment. I tried going on a weekend and every reservation was absolutely booked.  So instead, delaying a date night out a few days, we made a trip here on a Thursday. The crowds were no less impressive on a Thursday night, with many people dressing up in classy attire.  With the weather hovering at 100 degrees, Joya didn't have any problems with my black shorts and Adidas tennis shoes though. With such a great atmosphere, I definitely had a positive experience at Joya.  The food, while good, had it's share of hits and misses.  Prices are on the higher end, but with tapas are more about smaller portion sizes rather than extravagant prices.  If you realize this, you should be able to order both a satisfactory amount and try several items. Hits: Cervice sampler ($21) - I loved the size and variety of the cerviche.  While some have complained about the excess lettuce, I found a generous amount of cerviche.  Each cerviche tasted distinctly different too: Tiger prawns, gulf shrimp + bass, and snapper.  An easy hit. Sweet corn croquetes - I've heard they've run out of this dish a few times (eg: growing pains), but it's easy to see why.  Nice, crunchy exterior with a very delicious filling of sweet corn and potatoes.  The accompanying sauce is a decadent and slightly spicy addition to the dish. Cheese and Charcuterie ($12.50) - a wonderful platter of both cheese, bread, and high end meat cuts (prosciutto, salami, ham).   I suspect this item may reflect their La Strada origin, but it was great. Churros - served with a decadent dark chocolate, the churros were the highlight of the meal.  I love churros, but I'm more acquainted with them at the local tacqueria or the SF Zoo.  I suspected Joya would serve a similar version, perhaps pre-fried and simply sliced up.  I was wrong.  Crispy and freshly fried on the outside, the churros were wonderfully warm and soft on the inside.  The sugar and cinnamon amounts were perfect.  And the melted chocolate was the final perfect touch to this dessert. Misses: Oysters - I had no problem with the quality other than they didn't taste like they had been bathed in sea water.  Nonetheless, three minuscule oysters for $8.50 is pricey, no matter how badly I want this item on the menu.  The owner has stated they will correct the menu to reflect that only three oysters are served.  Hopefully, they will have future options for half dozen and one dozen oysters. Papas brava - while tasty, it's $4 for potato home fries dabbled with a touch of mayonnaise.  While there's a fancy description and slightly superior spices, realize what you are getting before you order. Pork Empanada - another traditional tacqueria item, the empanadas were nowhere as successful as the churros.  They were warm and the meat inside was forgettable.  I didn't taste any distinct high quality meat with cuban chili spices. Pineapple and Peach Sangria - a passable sangria with large pieces of fruit specific to type.  It was decent sized, but flavor-wise is a poor comparison to the best sangria I've had (Mabel Y's version). Joya is still relatively new to the restaurant scene and I'm sure they're experiencing some growing pains (ie: running out of dishes, not serving the tortilla soup they have on the menu).  Thus far though, with a gorgeous interior and great service, they're off to a solid start.  It'll be interesting to see how they compete on a long term basis and when the crowds and empty spaces of their nearby competitors even out.  I personally look forward to returning and trying some of their larger plates as well as the tapas I wasn't able to try this time around.  (BTW we ordered 3 tapas/person, but were very hungry) Joya is proud to accept American Express and all major credit cards.
First of all I contacted the GM to make a group reservation for 15 people. He emailed back, then disappeared.  I phoned him 2 times on his cell phone with NO response.  I finally spoke to the hostess and she was willing to take my reservation. Food was good, not great.  Since we had a large group, i ordered everything prior to everyone arriving so that the guests wouldn't have to think about what to eat.  Easier that way for this group.  The food portions are small, we had to order more of each dish i pre-ordered.  May not go back again with a large group, due to the problems I encountered getting the restaurant to take the reservation. Ample parking in the public parking garage behind the restaurant.  A definite plus.  Great selection of liquor at the bar.  Service was good, but not great or outstanding.
Stopped by for a drink and couple of small plates after an early movie in Palo Alto.  The space is cool, inviting and interesting.  Sat at the bar.  Friendly service.  Was able to sip on some wine before deciding what to order (nice touch).  The wine list is adequate - though not super interesting or unique.  Will try the cocktails next time. Food was very yummy - ahi tuna tartare served on quacamole with vegetable chips; and croquetas with jalapeno fondue dipping sauce.  Can't comment on the large plates or what dinner is like.  But we will come back to try it.
OVERALL:3.4   FOOD:3   SERVICE:4   AMBIANCE:4.5   VALUE:2 Bringing sexy back: sexy lounge, sexy bar, sexy staff, sexy lighting, sexy booths, sexy clientele. Too bad the food/drinks are more like Khloe Kardashian than Kim: not bad, but forgettable and expensive. Ingredients are fresh, but flavors & textures all seemed to be missing something (ahi tartare needed more lime; tacos needed more heat, sangria needed more punch). Fancy mediocre food is still mediocre, no matter how swanky the packaging...you just pay extra for the packaging. Oh, but it's so hard to say no to something so pretty...I'd totally come back for drinks in the lounge area ;)
This place is still definitely a chill spot.  The sangria and the atmosphere at night are the saving graces of this spot, but it gets packed if you're only going there for a drink with some friends.  A little bit pricey, so it depends on how you feel.  If you do order food, don't worry it WILL be good - but again what are you willing to spend. I wish i had more seating INSIDE. They have some nice outdoor seating, but unless its a sunny Sunday I don't really prefer it.
I'd give it 3.5 stars. I have eaten an early dinner and a lunch here, and I have also had drinks... Read more 
The red pineapple sangria here is top notch.  3 stars alone for that.  Better than even Cascal, my go-to tapas place.  Tip from our unnamed server:  order by the glass ($8) not by the pitcher ($24).  Pitcher has 2X the sangria but 3X the price. *update:  According to the manager, the pitcher actually serves 4 people, so I don't know.  Either way, the sangria is delicious! Food here was disappointing and overpriced, however.  Croquetas and ahi tuna tartare were only things that stood out.  The decor is very nice, especially if you're lucky enough to get the semi-private room in the back (we were!)
A group of friends and I came here for my birthday last week and there wasn't one dish that we tried that was bad!  Everything was delicious... the Argentinean hanger steak with chimichurri sauce was amazing... tender and juicy.  The paella was delicious - tons of seafood and chicken in it!  Some of my friends also had the vegetarian paella and said it was a great veggie dish.  Lastly, the Argentine scallop ceviche was the best thing I've ever tasted. Drinks-wise, the sangria was delicious.  We tried both the white peach sangria and the red pineapple sangria.  I loved the red pineapple... it was refreshing and light.  They had a variety of South American drinks... I also tried the Brazilian caipirinha, and wasn't too impressed... but since it's the first time I've had a caipirinha, I have nothing to compare it to. The service was very good - our waitress was friendly and our food and drinks came pretty quickly.  I can't think of one bad thing about this place and can't wait to come back to try more tapas!
Seduction is the theme, but as a restaurant, Joya is mediocre and overpriced. Sure, the design imbues a sexy ambiance, the cocktail waitresses are stunning, and the music is trendy lounge (but nothing I haven't already heard countless times). Palo Alto certainly needed an intriguing place to meet for drinks and tapas, and Joya satisfies that longing. It's superficial, in the sense that the aesthetics are beguiling, but the substance (food and drinks) fall short of the mark; they mar the decor. The dishes seemed tailored to suit a middlebrow U.S. palate, and did nothing to showcase Spanish or Latin regional cuisine. The menu was passe in every sense, like from an era when tuna tartare became popular in Phoenix. Furthermore, the food was doused in regular table salt. I love salt, but at least give me Real, Sea, or Kosher, as a definite flavor and skill, and not to mask poor cooking. The wines by the glass are vastly overpriced and suffer from woefully small pours (e.g., Juan Gil for $12, when it's available by the bottle for $9.99; Ridge Zin, the best glass pour on the menu, in my opinion, was $12, but the bottle retails for $20). We came to like our server (we sat on the lounge side), and it's true, the busboys (it seems so condescending to use that term, for they were men, but I'm not sure what else to call them) were prompt and courteous. On the other hand, the hostess didn't acknowledge us until she finished a lengthy phone call; a quick acknowledgement of our presence, a mouthing, "I'll be with you as soon as possible" would have placated us, but instead she ignored us for minutes until she was ready, while waitresses stood around. I would go again, but only on an expense account or with diminished expectations. Given the suburbia that is the Peninsula, it is a suitable place to meet friends or colleagues. Improve the food and wine and I'd gladly return.
There's no emoticon for hopping up and down in excitement, but I'm hopping up and down with excitement after having just returned from another lunch at Joya. This place is the real deal. I've had 4 visits now and really, other than the under-seasoned ceviche on Visit One, I've had nothing but great things happen. OK, pay attention now: The braised short rib tacos are TO. DIE. DO NOT LEAVE THE PREMISES WITHOUT HAVING TASTED THEM. The unctuous, tremble-inducing meat loveliness is heaped onto a trio of thick, obviously hand-made small tortillas, each its own tint of tan, red, and green. DO NOT OFFER TO SHARE. MAKE YOUR FRIENDS ORDER THEIR OWN. The calamari (I know, I know, been there, done that) is very nicely done and we always order it. The sangria is delicious, but the buzziness seems to vary a bit from visit to visit....might be a good idea to get to know the bartender ;-) Oh, and as for dessert, Knock knock, who's there? HOT CHURROS WITH A POT OF MELTED SEMISWEET CHOCOLATE. Me happy.
I usually don't review a place after the first visit, but what the hell. I work in Palo Alto and was... Read more 
Joya's glass walled exterior & sleek wine display caught my eye a long time ago, so when we were scanning the Palo Alto strip for a place to chill at after dinner, we decided to give them a shot. I immediately fell hard for their eye-pleasing modern interior and lounge/bar/restaurant set-up, but was just as quickly turned off after getting barked at by one of the cocktail waitresses w/ an "EXCUSE ME!!!". Her delivery more-so translated into "Get the F outta the way!!!". I normally would peace out on a snobby establishment, but since we weren't in the mood to find another spot, we settled on their more relaxed outside seating area since the weather was warm. Our server was friendly, but unfortunately neglecting. Drinks were just so-so. I went w/ the Caipirinha, one of my all-time favorite cocktails, but seeing as how I recently had a Bossa Nova Caipirinha (the master at making stellar Caipirinhas), I couldn't help but compare and this one just didn't stand a chance. It came out looking like a lime martini in a glass w/ only 1 or 2 lime wedges. Weaksauce! Bossa Nova could teach them a thing or 2. As far as the desserts go...I sneaked a taste of the Chilled Berry Soup (blackberry, strawberry & raspberry w/ white chocolate panna cotta) that was ordered, but was not particularly impressed. Although the cuisine, cocktails and service aren't Joya's strengths, it's clear that this place scores well w/ being scene-y. The Stanford college crowd wasn't to be found, but instead the dressed to impress, late 20's, early 30's crowd.
Joya always seems to play host to a full house every weekend I pass by, so one date night I chose to try this place out. It's completely understandable why, despite the price, this place is usually pretty full. The food, the ambiance, and the service is all stellar. The tapas are delicious and there's a wide variety to chose from. It took a while to decide on just three and one full entree. The paella croquetas were delicious little fried rice and cheese balls that came with a perfectly paired dipping sauce. The pork empanadas came wrapped in a slightly crispier, flakier bread than I'm used to, but were great nonetheless. For the entree, we chose the pan-roasted salmon, which while tasty, paled in comparison to the tapas. The white peach sangria deserves 5 stars in and of itself. I tried it after the glowing Yelp reviews and was not disappointed. Slightly sweet like juice, with a mellow wine flavor. It's a must-try if you're visiting Joya. One thing that I really enjoyed about my experience at Joya was the great service. I had to change my reservation at the last minute and didn't encounter any problems doing that when I phoned in. We came on the night of the Big Game and our waiter kept up a friendly dialog with us about the game's progress. He also gave us excellent recommendations for our order and pointed us to their churros with chocolate sauce for desert, which I highly recommend.
I went here for a holiday lunch. The restaurant called the organizer a week before the event to say all 15 people had to pick their meals in advance because they would be experiencing lots of people doing holiday lunches and wanted to be sure our food came out at a reasonable time. 1) They should hire chefs who can bang out lunches in a reasonable amount of time regardless- its not as if we put them over capacity.. hello, there are only so many tables. 2) the apps came out 30 minutes after we arrived, and lunch took another 30-40 minutes. 3) the food was NOT delicious. The sliders were raw in the middle, completely raw: bright red ground beef encased by a thin veil of charred beef, yuck!! In a panic to order (a week in advance, remember) I chose the jerk chicken for my main course. It tasted like bbq chicken- all sweet, no spice at all. Another person at my table had the same complaint. I'm sure it's an entirely different experience for tapas.. I'll never know, because I'll never go back.
Mmm...Joya. We girls had a lovely time at this place and I look forward to coming back and trying more of the menu. The scene: 3 of us celebrating one of our birthdays, what a perfect spot for that. The windows that opened to the sidewalk were open tonight bringing in a lovely Fall wind and feel. The decors is sleek and trendy but not too trendy. Lovely little candles on the table; we had to squint to read the menu. I kinda like that. (But maybe that's cuz I have 20/20?) Service was very efficient and to the point. We started off with the world chips and guacamole (world chips = identical to the mixed bag of Terra brand chips from Trader Joe's--- don't get mad at me, Joya chef). This app was delicious and tasted quite healthy. Our server was flexible with substitutions (I really wanted the sweet potato mash with my Argentine rib-eye versus the fried onions) and the steak came out a perfect and very precise medium-rare. My girls both had the chicken entrada and both raved about it and the yummy Fall veggies that accompanied it. The red sangria was excellent and comes in a beautiful, bold wine glass versus a regular glass- a lovely touch. I will keep Joya on my radar for my next jaunt down 101.
Understand that I am not a tapas fan, the stuff is just oily and somewhat bland. In my travels in Spain, I was not bowled over by the cuisine, I definitely missed herbs and REAL meats, you know, not cured. Joya is GORGEOUS, I felt like I was in a big metro city.  I was definitely transported.  The hostess and female servers are nice eye candy.  Our wait was a mere 10 minutes without reservations.  The lounge was comfortable and the lighting was flattering & sensual.  All of these variables contributed to the total rating. Their pinot noir by the glass is mild & smooth, oh yeah, just $9!!!  We had te Spanish sausage tapas to start with, a nice appetizer to begin the evening.  Lounge total $35 including tax & tip. Salads were not so good-we had the Caesar and the Spanish mixed greens salad.  Just not enough flavor and tang.  If we weren't hungry we honestly would have pushed the plates to the wayside. For the entree, we had the meat paella for two, the al dente rice was seasoned well, with a slight kick, wasn't too moist and the seafood was PERFECTION.  I swear calamari is NEVER that tender.  WOW.  The chicken was moist and mostly of the white variety.  It felt hearty and healthy at the same time. I decided to round the evening with the churros and the strawberry custard.  Churros get a thumbs down for me b/c they had no CINNAMON!!!  The dark chocolate sauce overpowered the churro-which wasn't hard to do, seeing as it had no flavor to begin with.  The strawberry custard was alright, reminded me of whipped cream with fruit mixed in.  I just dug the strawberries out. I should have known to stay away from the desserts, I didn't enjoy them in Spain. Stick with Spanish sausages, wine, paella & you'll have a grand time here!
Finally tried the red pineapple sangria -- yum! It's on the sweeter side, but if you want something more refreshing, the white peach sangria is the way to go. Got the kobe beef sliders, fried calamari, and braised rib tacos again. Also got the vegetarian paella this time around. Bad choice because Jennifer M. & I were way too full after all of the tapas, pitcher of white sangria, and our 2 huge glasses (I love these btw, it's like a big balloon!) of red sangria. We took it to-go and her mom loved it :) Random note: The girls who work on the lounge side are HOT ;)
Gorgeous restaurant! Dim & romantic lighting. Bar, lounge, and restaurant seating. Cozy seating --... Read more 
This was probably one of my most bizarre dining experiences ever.  I'm not really sure where to start, so I guess I'll just recount the night. It was a warm evening and my friend and I were looking for a place to eat dinner either outside or in an open-air setting.  Cruising down University, we noticed Joya and thought we'd give it a try, since their front room is totally open, plus they had sidewalk seating.  We walk up, asking how long the wait is for two, and the hostess tells us it'll be 30-40 minutes.  We leave a name and phone number, and do some window shopping.  While out and about, I remember about the Open Table app I have on my Blackberry, and thought I'd give it a try.  It was 8pm, and what do you know, OT said there was a 8:15 reservation.  Score!  Or so I thought... Upon return to the restaurant, the hostess looks confused to see us again.  I tell her I now I have a reservation, and she tells me that it probably won't help.  (This, by the way, is counter to the message I received when I made the reservation, telling me that parties with reservations will be seated before all others.) In any case, we went to the bar to get a drink while we waited.  Peach Sangria was really good, though did not seem like there was much alcohol in it - this was good for me, as I was driving.  I didn't time it, but I think we probably waited about 25 minutes.  When the seating person came to get us, we closed up our tab and followed her to the table.  Despite telling the hostess we wanted to sit in the open air section, we were brought all the way to the back, pretty much as far back in the restaurant as you can get without being in the bathrooms.  AND we had to squeeze into a booth next to a group of 5 very loud-talking men.  Made for great eavesdropping, but not so great for my friend and I to talk.  At this point though, we just wanted to eat, so we didn't say anything about it. We ordered a selection from the tapas menu, no entrees.  The order in which our four dishes came out was truly bizarre.  First we had the Heirloom Tomatoes, which logically arrived first.  However, they arrived without any of the queso fresco or shaved onions, so we sent it back.  The second time around it looked much better, though we thought it needed some fresh pepper (which was not offered, we had to ask for s&p, and were brought the tiniest little shakers I've ever seen).  Almost done with the tomatoes, I noticed that the sticker was still on one.  Hello?  Did they not wash them?  Gross!  The waiter - who was wonderful despite our comedy of errors - took it off our bill, which was very nice of him. Next out was the Gambas, served in a cast iron pan with chorizo and a delicious tomato-based sauce.  We had some extra bread to soak up the sauce which was delicious.  Not the best gambas I've ever had, but certainly very good! Out next was the Halibut Ceviche, which was good, but in our opinion should have been served after the tomatoes.  A smaller portion than I was expecting though. The last course was the Steamed Spinach, which we joked with our waiter was our dessert.  He was a good sport, and seemed to agree with us that things were a bit bizarre.  Oddly, the spinach was probably our favorite dish of the night.  It had toasted pine nuts, onions and raisins mixed in, and had a great vinegar-y flavor. When our waiter brought the dessert menu, mine had two wine lists, no food.  My friend's was correct, so we could see what the options were.  We were deciding between the Churros or the Flan, but went with the Churros con Chocolate, and they were great.  Very light and airy churros sprinkled with cinnamon sugar, and a thick chocolate sauce to dip them in.  I felt like I was back in Spain eating these! I really want to give this place 2.5 stars, but I can't do that.  I'm going with 2 because I feel like the overall should be lower than three.  Maybe I'm spoiled by the quality of restaurants in San Francisco, but University Ave is not a shabby area, a restaurant of this caliber should not be making such "rookie mistakes" as my friend called them.
This place is fun! I went there on a blind date and the atmosphere (dimly lit interior, over sized couches and segmented rooms) made it a really nice relaxed place to meet. The food although smaller portions (yes, I do understand the concept of Tapas) are a tad bit smaller than normal Tapas serving sizes, but are pretty tasty. The Sangria was unfortunately a bit weak, but if you stick to something like Vino or a Martini you are good to go! Hmmm what can one say about the hoochy outfits of the cocktail waitresses... Well even though our waitress was super sweet and helpful, the getup she was wearing made me feel as though I was in a cheap Vegas club. So with that said, I'm reeeeeeeeeeeeally pulling for some delicious waiters dressed in nothing but boxers or meat hangers for us girls to gawk at next time I go. Notice I said "next time"... Not a total write off. Definitely a fun place to be for the young and groovy! Cheers Aussie
I've been here a few times for drinks. They have a good wine and mixed drinks selection. The atmosphere is also great, especially the pretty hostesses. I almost feel like I'm at a Hooters, hehe. Had dinner only once and the food was pretty good. We had the dried meat plate, the ceviche sampler and a dessert. A great date spot.
The decor of this place was really pleasant and very classy for a spanish tapas restaurant. Service was very good. Staff was very friendly and attentive. Now for the food...get the churros. It literally melted in mouth as soon I took a bite. The ahi tuna tar tar was ok. The kobe beef sliders were good but I'm very particular about the buns. If Joya used hawaiian dinner rolls for the buns the burgers would have been awesome. Buns were somewhat dry and every time a I took a bite I needed to take a sip of water. Jerk chicken entree was ok but a little dry. Pork chop with butternut squash puree was delicious. Tacos were good too. Definitely recommend this place for a nice dinner with a date. Joya has a nice lounge area on the left for those who want to have a drink while waiting for your table or just hanging out.
HMMMMMMM....... one wonders what sort of food some poeple are wanting when going to a place like this..... IF you want a all american 30 punds of pure food don't go for tapas does not matter where you go the dishes are small...... READ UP PEOPLE! If you are a tight wad and dont want to spend much subway has a $5 Footlong go there! Went here last night bit of a spur of the moment kind-a thing... there were two of us and the place was quite full we got seated out front stright away and only took a min or two for waiter to come out. We order about 5 tapas style dishes and some drinks total of bill was about $100 with tip the I have eaten tapas before and didn't really like it BUT here it was more of a gourmet sampler with every dish the quality was great. I am very picky with my food and hate being ripped off or paying too much for something small, BUT here didn't cross my mind. Worth going to don't listen to all the bitching on here they just need to go across the st to the local pizza place and buy a slice more in their league.
I believe this place is so popular for the cocktails. They were yummy. The White Peach Sangria was perfect for outside sitting watching the world go by. The fried calamari was good, the aoli sauce was mayo, yucky. But we will order the calamari again and sub a different dip. The Kobe Mini Burgers were excellent! Service, top notch and fast!
Had dinner at Joya last night with a friend. We'd planned on going to Nola, but changed our minds at the last minute. Driving on University, you get drawn in by Joya's outdoor seating, corner location and trendy decor. My first impression of the restaurant was, just that: trendy. Nice bar, booths, open kitchen. Our server was nice and attentive, but his service waned toward the end of the night. Okay, now comes the food. It's a tapas-style restaurant with Spanish entrees and some Basque dishes as well. I really wished their paella wasn't $42...and they offered a smaller serving. Between the two of us we got the Kobe Beef burgers (3/ $11) and braised short rib soft tacos (3/ $9.50).  Portion-size was good -- I didn't feel like we ordered the meal deal at Burger King or Taco Bell. The burgers came with a thin slice of soria chorizo, chipotle mayo and Oaxacan cheese. My first burger was overdone...which defeats the purpose of eating Kobe. The bread was a bit doughy and thick, and overall, I've had better. Moving to the tacos, the beef was a bit dry. It reminded of asada at Mexican taquerias. Was expecting the supple, moist beef that falls off the bone. It was topped with horseradish cream and a jicama slaw. The jicama added a nice, unexpected crunch. For our entree, we ordered the Walu a la Veracruzana ($25). Grilled walu (butter fish), roma tomatoes, onions, olives, raisins, capers and potatoes. Very disappointed with this dish. First, the cut is very important for walu. It's a fish that can't be cut thin. Unfortunately ours was thin and overcooked. Can't do overdone fish, especially walu. It tastes like rubber folks. And it wasn't seasoned, we had to eat the fish with the capers and olives to get flavor. Joya is a very "Palo Alto" restaurant: expensive, pretty to look at (until something else new opens up), and quasi-"ethnic." Don't expect to get an authentic Spanish/Basque meal at Joya, instead see it as a beginner's guide, a Cliff Notes if you will. You'll get a very brief introduction to the regional cuisine, but you might want to go for the real thing somewhere else.
This place makes you feel hot...not as in taking off your clothes hot...well okay, yes that too. No, this place makes you feel cool, and sexy and important. I might add I'm none of these things, but stepping through the doors of Joya and sitting down in the modern sleek interior you get a feeling of hip and vibrant. The service here is kinda hit or miss...they are super diligent about keeping the table clean, but we found the waitstaff sort of preoccupied on more than one occasion (they forgot to bring out one portion of our meal during one visit). Wine list is extensive. Cocktails are zingy and original. Sangria is pretty good! Food is pretty good, too! I wouldn't say it's the best meal of my life, but it's pretty darn tasty, creative, and certainly worthy of a night out without the kids or with the girls. The empanadas are pretty yummy...I like the cream sauce that comes with the mushroom ones. The kobe mini-burgers my husband talks about for weeks after. They are just the right amount of heaven and the thin slice of chorizo makes them especially delectable. Shortrib tacos are slightly spicy and amazing. The marinated jerk chicken is pretty original. I split that with a Spanish salad on a different occasion, and we both agreed we liked it. Papas Bravas are standard potatoes and aoili, but nice. I love their grilled asparagus. And the last time we were there I had the grilled rib eye with the chimichuri sauce. Woah. Onion rings were amazing, and the steak was done just right. So by all means, if you're looking for a nice night out give this one a try. Don't be expecting the meal of your life, but defiantly worth a go see if only for the cool factor.
I never get tired of walking into Joya's--well, I really had no choice these past few months. I have been three times, two times for dinner and then just a week ago for drinks with friends. Both times for dinner, I ordered 4-5 dishes from the tapas menu. I have to say I found the food lacking flavor and cohesiveness. Some of my least favorite dishes were: 1. Empanadas (spinach and cheese with mango chili sauce): Supposed to be simple, comfort food. The crust was dry and the inside lacked flavor. 2. Kobe Beef Mini Burger: In the past few months, every restaurant I've been to has these on the menu, so it has to be pretty spectacular to be memorable. This one again, lacked in flavor and was oily. Some dishes to consider: 1. The Ahi Tuna tartare with avocado, jicama, lemon, serrano chili essence was one of the more flavorful and fresh dishes. 2. Fried calamari with chile salt and cilantro aioli dipping sauce--Calamari was tender and cooked well and the dipping sauce was a good combo. I would highly recommend Joyas' for drinks and maybe light appetizers, but the food needs improvement. The decor and ambiance of the restaurant is why I keep returning. The staff is friendly and the service is good. On a warm day, it's a great spot to sit outside or indoor by the open windows and watch people as they go by on University Avenue. The design of the restaurant is very chic and modern. As for as drinks go, this is a wonderful place to go and hang out with friends. There is a separate lounge and bar area which is perfect for meeting friends. The white sangria was one of my favorites, The wine list has some good variety and choices from both Spain, latin america and california I'd recommend. A couple of my pics for dinner are the "layer cake" malbec , mendoza 2007 and the buena vista merlot, 2005 from Carneros. Both wonderful. Happy Food Trekking....
It had been sometime since I had walked along University, grabbed a semi late dinner of tapas with a friend here last night. We ordered the cheese plate, wonderful! Accompaning the plate were these amazing cherries that had been marinated in red wine which I would have loved to have scooped over vanilla ice cream!!! We also had the pork empanadas with the habanero dipping sauce (awesome!) and the super amazing heirloom tomato salad with rocket  that was by far my favorite thing we had. Love the fact that they change their menu accordingly to the Latin American country they feature... wonder if they've done Argentina?! Yum Will definitely be back
Nice decor, nice sidewalk dining. Sangria's looked good. Tempranillo was great, Viura (Spanish White) was new and exciting. Croquettes were tasty. Other food wasn't anything to write home about. Desert was pretty good, Aroz con Leche (rice pudding with white wine poached pears) was pretty good. That said, after about an hour I got sick and up came a very expensive dinner (I don't get sick often) and late last night my wife's stomach was upset, with diahrea twice today. We will not be going back. Too bad. Oh well, off to Iberia in Menlo Park, where everything is excellent.
Four of us ate here on a cozy rainy Sunday afternoon. It was a great time to stop in because we got to enjoy the restaurant and still interact without loads of other people and loud noise. I'm sure this place gets really busy on the weekends. Ambience is great. Modern and chic, yet warm at the same time. The food was great. We had the guacamole and homemade chips (tarot root, plantain, yukon gold, purple something or other) and housemade tortillas to start. All were excellent and I think I ate more than my fair share. I had the white corn and smoked mozzarella empanadas and the Cuban sandwich. The empanadas were perfectly cooked and had great flavor. I loved 'em. The Cuban was generous in size and did not disappoint. I liked the dijon mustard along with the ham and the pulled pork. Very well done. I would definitely go back.
Review written by a vegetarian: This restaurant is about a month and a half old...... I was not so impressed by this place... Ambiance -- Nice and sophisticated Food ---Not so nice What we ordered and their ratings peach sangria 3 * avocado and world chips 5 * cheese stuffed red pepper 2 * Veggie paella 2 * The veggie paella was the biggest disappointment and that too it was $30 just for the paella..... Oh.... :-( I am not going back again to Joya....... Joya turned out to be a bit of Annoya.....hehehe LOL!!!!! too heavy on the pocket and quite light on the tummy...and taste buds..... Needs a lot of improvement in the kitchen......
After having wine tasting at B412 with my girl Cindy, we decided to get a small bite at Joya.  This place was packed on a wednesday night.  To avoid the wait we grabbed some seats at the bar.  We had the cheese charcuterie board- was good, but not enough bread & cheese?!  We had the cerviche sampler, not the best we've had they all kind of tasted the same and a bit bland, I think fresca does cerviche better, so far.  I had the peach margarita- was on the weak side & had no salt or lime?! Judging by the entrance/ reception the decor seemed clean and modern, I don't know about the rest of the place it was kind of hard to see, the restaurant is very dimmed.  The ladies bathroom has only 2 bathroom stalls, I dont know why I mentioned that.  Overall 3.5 stars, I would come here with a friend(s) to grab a bite and lounge, but not really a place to bring your family or kids.
My new FAVORITE Tapas restaurant south of SF. Cascal used to be my favorite before I came here. Service was great and liked the ambience a lot too. A good place to take someone if you are trying to impress. The tapas was excellent and my 2 faves were the variety of chips with guac and the sausages. Churo with chocolate sauce was sooooo good that it felt like I was committing a sin!!  Mojitos and Sangra were good. University av is crowded with restaurants but Joya definitely stands out. This is 4.5 star rating but rounded down.
Went there on a whim last night (Friday) after a very tough week at work.  I'm trying to make the switch to vegetarianism (via flex-a-tarianism) and there were great choices! 1st off, EYE CANDY at the hostess stand.  Beautiful women in great dresses, gay, straight I don't care -- these women are nice welcomes to the restaurant.  I waited for my table for a few minutes in their gorgeous, hip lounge/bar which is open-sided across into the restaurant. Good people watching and GREAT ambiance.  I chatted with the bartender and he recommended an Argentinian Malbec and a Spanish red (can't remember exactly which now).  Had a glass of each and they were both good, if a bit pricey.  $12 and $14 respectively. Sat at a nice table, good view of University street and had spinach and cheese empanadas, papas bravas, tortilla espagnola and croquetas.  With more wine.  The empanadas were the standout. My waitress was adorable, knowledgable and cute as a button/friendly.  I sat there for 2 hours and dawdled/drank until the traffic abated and I could scoot North to Napa.  No pressure from the wait staff and in fact, they were all friendly and came by to chat a bit. Will be going back and trying more of the wine suggestions.  Go Go Go!
Here's my breakdown for this place: 5 stars for decor 4 stars for drinks 2 stars for service 1 star for food I went here for dinner with a group of friends which tapas is usually a good option for since it's all sharey - but this def. did not fill me up. Granted I hadn't eaten a lot that day but we got about 6 things between 3 of us and the servings were tiny and just not that delicious. A big thumbs up for the sangria though and the place looks awesome on the inside. All in all, I would come back for drinks but not for dinner.
I've had "The Joya Experience" twice now, and I haven't been disappointed yet. This tapas-style restaurant in the heart of downtown Palo Alto isn't cheap, but you get your money's worth. The first time I ate here was for lunch with my mother and sister, where we shared three or four (I don't remember) dishes that were all delicious.  Wait, I'm sorry. That's wrong. DELICIOUS. There we go. I remember having the Kobe beef mini-burgers and the empanadas (pork filled- I think). I also have no clue what we ordered for dessert, but it was amazing as well. God it sounds like I was drunk by the sound of this review. I surprisingly wasn't- it was just a long time ago! Promise. My most recent visit was with Yelper Emily A. to catch up over a drink and a quick bite to eat. Word to the wise: You can get four Kobe beef mini-burgers to share between two people instead of the usual three. We did just that, while we sipped on our cocktails. I have to say, the bill was quite reasonable- but this was two drinks and one dish. So, weigh your opinion accordingly. Though I know if we had a full meal with another round of drinks, the outcome wouldn't have been too pretty. S'yeah, it's somewhat heavy on the old pocketbook, but for the ambiance, location, and yumminess of the food- Joya deserves five Yelp stars.
Let me recommend the ceviche trio :) The coffee kobe sirloin is decent, although I was hoping for more coffee flavor, which was simply not delivered. The peach sangria hit the spot... excellent taste :) There were a few multi-appetizer plates but they were confusing - too many different appetizers or sort of merging together and getting intermingled - wish they  were served on bigger plates.
Loved it. Very sexy atmosphere. Yum food. Excellent guac croquetta...nice and spicy Steak with chimichurri...wonderful Ahi tuna tartare ....best ever! Very helpful,informed service.
I went there this past weekend with some friends, there were only 4 of us: - We ordered chicken when we sat down and it took them about an hour and three times asking the staff about them to get them to us. - The waitress was pretty incompetent, she spent more time flirting with the men sitting next to us then making sure customers were taken care of. - After we complained and eventually got the 60-minute chicken comped, the manager didn't even come over to apologize. I know it was a Friday night but customer service is customer service. I certainly wouldn't go back.
Coming here for dinner was a bad decision, but it wasn't my call as it was a social function. It was my first time in Palo Alto, and the entire street had an upper class suburban feel. It was a Sunday, and the place was crowded when we arrived. After waiting a while, we were ushered to sit at the bar, which was less than ideal as we didn't plan to order drinks (I know, I know...). /* FOOD */ I ordered the deviled eggs with caviar, while my SO ordered the short rib tacos. Both dishes were okay, and I shouldn't have expected much for dinner entrees given this is a tapas bar. Still, I couldn't help but feel disappointed given the superb ambiance of the venue. /* SERVICE */ Service was forgettable, though it was nice getting a front seat view to the bartending action. I'm being sarcastic. I honestly don't remember anyone serving me. The dishes might as well have floated to me, and invisible hands might have taken care of my empty plates. God knows why I actually tipped. /* VENUE */ If there's one thing aspect this bar deserves full five stars for, it's the atmosphere. The bar brims with a hipster vibe, from its grand towering doors to its lavishly modern decor. There was live music from a guitarist as lively conversations masked the mediocrity of the food and service. /* REVISITABILITY */ This is the perfect place for a first date, if only because the place looks real nice, and that's what first dates are about, right? First impressions, and not much else. I would come back to try their drinks, but fellow Yelpers suggest otherwise. TL;DR - Come here for the ambiance and social scene, nothing more.
This place is for people with no taste buds.  PLAIN AND SIMPLE.  Had the Seabass as well as the prawn tapa.  Nothing had Sabor.  This place is also overpriced.  The place is nice however the food is horrible.  I have yet to try any good restaurants in the Shallow Alto University strip.
I can't believe I didn't know this place was here sooner...! More so, why did I not know about their White Peach Sangria !!! I stumbled upon this trendy restaurant/lounge, searching for a last min. lunch spot. A couple of my favorites on the menu: * (Hello!) The White Peach Sangria ! *Ahi Tuna Tartare *Kobe Beef Mini-Burgers Posh atmosphere, decent Tapas selections (for a spot NOT in the mission), Great tasting food... service was okay. I would pay this spot a second visit.
This place is great! I came with a group of colleagues after work for dinner and drinks and we were all very happy with Joya. I had Gin with Ginger Ale and it was strong, just the way I like it. Another colleague had wine and she really enjoyed it. I had another colleague who ordered three Mojitos. You can say she really enjoyed them! The food was really great. The mini burgers were cooked to perfection. The tuna with guacamole was great. I'm thinking of re-creating that dish myself. The calamari was a great hit with everyone. I just don't really care for calamari though. The majority of us had the hanger steak and we devoured it like beasts. It was REALLY juicy and flavorful. It seems a great spot for happy hour and the ambiance here is top notch. They do have a great selection of wines. Our tab was about $74 per person, but we order a LOT of food and alcohol. This place is definitely a must try!
WOW!  The Yelp community has been brutal on this one!  I came here twice over the past couple of weeks, once with a couple of my girlfriends and once with my husband after I liked the experience so much the first time.  Gypsy Kings?  Seriously people, learn your music.  Perhaps I am bias because I had just gone to the Federico Aubele concert up in the city the night before, and when we walked in they were playing one of his songs.  So *not* Gypsy Kings, although I love them too. I actually thought that the music, that also included Thievery Corporation and few of my other favorite artists, was one of the highlights of the experience.  The wine list has an excellent mix of Spanish and South American selections and the place is decorated beautifully; I really wanted to cozy into the lounge and linger for awhile.  Maybe another night. My girlfriends and I sampled quite a selection of the tapas the first night I tried Joya, all of which were great, except perhaps the camarones al ajillo.  They were served with the heads on, which was fine, I just didn't like the way they were prepared, although my girlfriends did.  Everything we had both times was beautifully presented, and the service was impeccable.  And in case you haven't noticed, it is in Palo Alto, so pricey tapas are just, well, to be expected. So don't be a hater.  Grab your girlfriends or your sig other and head over for a glass of Chilean wine and platos fuertes at this chic new restaurant, and enjoy some fabulous latin lounge music.
5 Stars for atmosphere. 0 Stars for everything else. So, I will be generous and give them 1 star. Sorry Joya, but you are no jewel. You are like a bombshell supermodel that has no content. Seriously though, we really wanted to like this place, it is beautiful and finally a hip joint in the peninsula - but the food was trying to be some kind of modern fusion tapas crap, but it doesn't fly. It was awful. The mussels with sausage were cold and rubbery. The short rib tacos were just OK. The patatas bravas were "de nada" -- who makes boring patatas bravas? The white wine and grape sangria was disappointing -- if you can't pull it off why not stick with the tried and true red-wine type with the apples and oranges? And everyone is right in saying the staff were way more into each other than, um you know, serving the clientele.
Girls night out. Came here this past weekend with my sister after a full 8-6pm day of volunteer work on a Saturday. The ambiance here made you feel very relaxed with comfortable seating and dim lighting and a candle on your table. They also have seating outside on the sidewalk as well, perfect for a warm day. We decided just to have tapas in the evening so, on our menu that day was: -Kobe beef mini burgers -Sauteed Gambas -Scallops - Ceviche Sampler Everything tasted really good and unique, but what I was most impressed with was the ceviche. The sampler consist of 3 small cups of seafood all made in different ways, accompanied by different chips for you to scoop. All three were just so flavorful and unique. I'd have to say that the coconut rock shrimp and bass was my favorite, followed by the mango chili red snapper. The halibut with roasted tomatillos wasn't that impressive to me, but was good nonetheless. The definitely had a wide variety of wine to choose from. However, because of the warm weather, I went ahead and tried a white peach sangria instead. I was skeptical considering the fact that they use sauvignon blanc as the base (which is usually too dry and less fruity for my taste) but was very surprised at how sweet and delicious it taste. I would highly recommend to ladies that like sweet drinks. Another reason they deserve the 4 stars was the service. Our server was fantastic. He was very good about making sure everything is ok, timing the tapas well enough so our small table for two does not get over crowded, our waters were always filled etc.  Ina  nutshell, great service.  I'd definitely come back again. However, if you do plan on visiting, do know that this place is NOT cheap.
Every time I walk in, I feel the warmth of the Joya, the atmosphere, the dark decor but that fades off in no time for me, I do love the long curtains and glass windows. I walk out feeling Meh! each time. I so wish a place like Joya was a YAY! for me. The menu is very interesting and full of choices but nothing great or nothing I'd eat on a regular basis. I liked Mini kobe burgers and Halibut Ceviche. Good, but not exceptional. Calamari is the only thing I remember and do recommend. Mango Chili Red Snapper ceviche - Was good too and full of flavor. They do have a fairly good wine selection. Sangria is good too but I expect more from Joya! I can get such Sangria at Cascal and at Reposado.
Sangria's! Love it!
Ate there during the opening week. Waitress was excellent. Seating was comfortable. Interior was stylish without being overbearing. Food was  good, but nothing amazing. I will definitely return and have the pork empanadas again and try the multitude of seafood dishes. Gazpacho - good Tortilla Soup - great chicken broth base Croquetas - basically fried balls of mashed potatoes, which were good Pork empanadas - excellent -- will have this again Desserts: the strawberry custard-like dessert (crema?) and the churros with hot dipping chocolate were good.
Cute date place. Dark, lounge-like, and great cocktails. The restaurant is dimly lit, very spacious, with ample of seating room. We arrived on a Saturday night without a wait. Seated in a comfy booth table. I started with a white peach sangria. The date had a glass of wine. Tapas style plates. We had the ceviche sampler, the croquetas, and the tuna tar tare. All were great. Not fantastic but pretty damn good. I'd come here again if I was in the neighborhood. But other than that just another latin tapas place.
I took my BF to Joya for his birthday dinner last month.  I was really looking forward to trying their Argentinean steak but we got so full from tapas that neither of us ordered an entree. We arrived 15mins early and were seated right away.  I requested a window table when I made reservations on OpenTable and they had 2 window tables and a booth available for us to choose from.  The weather was perfect and we started the evening off great. We ordered: * guacamole & new world chips - interesting display, the guac was good but the chips were straight out of trader joe's. nothing special. (-1/2 star for this) * steamed black mussels with chorizo - one of my faves! the sauce is different from any steamed mussels dish though the portion is too small (even for tapas). (-1/2 star for this) * seared spanish sausages - nice selection of sausages, a bit powerful in taste so we ordered spanish rice as well. * kobe beef mini-burgers - my fave dish of the evening. the kobe beef was juicy and tender, cooked to perfection! We were getting full at this point and decided not to order any entrees, instead we ordered another tapas dish - sizzling camarones al ajillo.  the shrimp tasted differently from what I expected but very good indeed. We ended the evening with dessert and it was hard to narrow down 1 choice.  We would've ordered 2 but were already quite full so we went with churros with hot chocolate.  the churros melt in your mouth, very soft like Trish's Mini Donuts @ Fisherman's Wharf. it will not disappoint!! I'll definitely return to try their other tapas and hopefully some entrees.  The entire dinner was only ~$80 - the cheapest bday dinner of all time and this included a $15 corkage fee b/c we brought our own bubbly!  I tipped our waitress $20 b/c she was very nice and attentive to us the entire night.  She did not rush us out of the restaurant, like most people tend to do on a busy Friday night, and she even took photos of us.  We were there for over 2 hrs & had a positive experience overall. =)
Hubby gets to eat out quite a bit and came raving about this place. Were planning to host a  Bday party for a friend with a bunch of fellow desis and were worried if we will like the food that would primarily include south american dishes and influence.. However, all our fears were put to rest by the wonderful food we had and our friend was thankful he had a perfect Bday. We ordered only the vegetarian options and the waitress gave us detailed explanations on the menu and was charming in manner! We absolutely loved the ambience :) Loved the experience. Will keep going back whenever we are in palo alto
One night out with girlfriends had me hooked.  I was wary because the place looked so chic and I presumed it to be just another meatmarket restaurant with no real quality food.  I was wrong. The service was exceptional all around and the dishes were fabulous.  We started each with our own drinks then moved onto the fabulous Sangria that was neither watered down or overloaded with syrup but fresh and an abundance of fruit-very tasty. I started with Ahi tuna tartar which was so flavorful and then moved onto the large portion of Cuban braised pork shoulder, the potato so excellent and sweet to accompany the meat that fell softly off the bone. My friend and I are celebrating our birthdays together for the second year at Joya.
Based on the Tar Tar, lounge area service and ambiance...I'd have to give this place four stars.  It's a perfect place to catch a corner of the room, have a seat on the couch, and just talk.  Not too dark - not too bright...just right really. The open glass pains are a nice touch but it does get a bit chilly this time of year.  I definitely like the walls open rather than not; it brings the charm of PA inside - just bring something to cover with...
I've been here a few times.  My first time here, I was on date.  The second time, I was here for a company luncheon. I've tried the following items: Ahi Tuna Tartare, Braised Short Rib Tacos, Caesar Romaine Salad, Ajillo-Marinated Chicken Sandwich, Vegetarian Burger, Mexican Empandas. The Ahi Tuna Tartare has got to be the best thing that I've tried out of all the items listed above.  I can't say that it's the freshest fish however it was tasty and I couldn't get enough of it. The Braised Short Rib Tacos were extremely dry and tough.  It was like dry pulled pork.  I was not a fan.  It laid on a bed of shredded cabbage so the presentation was poor. Cesar Romaine Salad was nothing out of the ordinary.  It was extremely simple --no thrills here. Ajillo-Marinated Chicken Sandwich: the chicken was very dry and I believe that it was chicken breast.  It tasted bland and had no flavor. Vegetarian Burger: the burger patty wasn't bad.  It was good for a vegetarian burger but it was nothing compared to Saturn's in Santa Cruz.  The vegetarian's that I know who ate this were pleased. Mexican Empandas: this was not a crowd-pleaser.  It didn't taste like anything out of the ordinary. The sangria here is truly one of the best that I've ever had!  I've tried both the White Peach Sangria and the Red Pineapple Sangria. The bar/lounge area is very nice and trendy with nice decor.  It has a bit of a tropical bohemian feel to it.  The dining area is quite nice as well.  There are huge windows at Joya which I do like a lot.  During the night, they have nicely lit lights overhead. Overall, I would go back here for the Tuna Tartare and Sangria.  I'll pass on the rest of the food. It's not worth the price honestly.
I've been coming here for awhile as the restaurant is conveniently located on University Ave in downtown Palo Alto and has a trendy and upscale atmosphere.   Over time though, I feel that the place has been going down hill - particularly the service.  During my most recent visit, the hostess was very rude and pretentious - as if she didn't care about whether they lost a customer (they just did). The food in general is decent but somewhat overpriced (drinks are $12, small plates are similarly in the $10-$15 range).  I don't think I will be missing out on too much by not going there anymore...
3.5 Not too shabby. I came here with some family friends for dinner and we shared a bunch of Tapas and good ole Sangria. Sangria - possibly better than Cha Cha Cha... sweeter, loaded with fruit, but the pitcher only serves about 4-5 glasses since it's fruit and ice overload. Really good. I also got a Mango Mojito and it too was good.. but all the cocktails are a bit pricey at $10 a glass. Tapas... Kobe Burgers - delicious. Tender to eat and there was a slice of Chorizo in that little bad boy. They serve them in 3's. Papas Bravas - Upgraded KFC Potato wedges with sour cream in the middle. You get about 8-10 pieces Shrimp Camarones - Nice little spice and kick. The shrimp are way bigger than Chas cajun shrimp... but I love the sauce at Cha's much more. Short Rib Tacos - Nice little kick. Lots of punch. Really good sauce We also shared a Jamaican Jerk entree. The chicken was so tender and the sauce was perfect. For dessert - Churros with Chocolate. DROOL. This was the highlight of the evening. $150 later... my party of six was satisfied. However, I do think it is a tad overpriced for such small portions... But that's how Shallow Alto does it I guess!
I do not understand why this place has somewhat bad reviews. Coming from a latin american background, it is always hard to find a place that has everything. Joya really does an amazing job to bring a unique blend from every country from Mexico to Spain. It showcases the different variety of foods from all of Latin America and Spain. I went here yesterday for lunch. I really loved the concept of having a Latin American and Spanish cuisine concept restaurant.  The ambiance is just great! My fiance and I had the Sangria (amazing!), Calamari, Empanadas, Mediterranean Olives,  Coconut Ceviche, and the Chorizo and Mussels. Everything was made to perfection.
I've been wanting to try Joya for awhile now after finding great reviews on here and always passing by it on University Ave. So, when my best friend from grade school asked me about ideas for places to have our dinner, I suggested Joya. Joya is located at the corner of University Ave & Florence Ave. It's beautiful inside and was pretty busy when I arrived to meet my friend there. I made reservations on http://opentable.com and our table was right near the window. After seeing my friend's sangria sitting on the table, I ordered the White Peach Sangria - which was absolutely delicious. We decided to do tapas for the night - small plates, but gave us a variety to eat from. We decided on Croquetas - fried potatoes balls served with smoked mozzarella sauce, a trio of Ceviche (coconut fish, mango shrimp, & scallops), and crab cakes. We devoured everything and I think the portions was perfect. There were perfect to nibble on as we reminisced :) For dessert, we got the Churros served with a chocolate sauce. YUM! I definitely want to come back here with my honey to enjoy some sangria and more tapas. The service was great and the atmosphere was awesome. What a good find! Cheers!
Decent but over-priced food, God-awful service. My friend and I shared the following: - Mexican empanadas: two spiced pork, green aji sauce $9.5 - Chipotle chicken sopes: two sopes with roasted pulled chicken in chipotle tomato sauce, pimenton crema $9 - Ahi tuna tartare avocado, jicama, lemon, serrano chili essence $13.5 Service was slow so we asked for bread to tied us over. I think they had to run to a store to buy the three, measly slices they dropped off at our table. There was no butter, olive oil or anything to dip the bland bread in so we asked for butter. Never got it so we asked again...and still never got it. This place is all about appearances. The decor is nice and they clearly ask for a full-length photo of everyone who works there but what's the point of hiring forgetful and negligent workers just because they're eye candy? The bathroom also had paper towels all over the floor- a clear indicator that this place overlooks the details.
The best friend, bf and I ventured to PA in search of a new eatery.  We stumbled upon Joya and we were instantly attracted by the decor/look & feel of the restaurant.   It's a cute, small establishment on University with a few tables outside that are great for people-watching. I've been back twice now and so far I've tried: Mini Kobe Beef Burgers Ahi Tuna Tartare Ceviche (all 3) Flamenco Eggs Cuban Sandwich Braised Short Ribs Seared Spanish Sausages Mexican Empanadas Of the eight items I've tried off the menu, there were three items I wouldn't care to eat again - the empanadas, Spanish sausages, and braised short ribs.  Don't get me wrong, they weren't BAD...just not my cup of tea.  The other five items I've tried were deee-lish! Another added bonus is they have the BEST SANGRIA here. They put tons of chopped fruits in their red/white sangria and I looooove it. Good food, great drinks and a nice venue...you just can't go wrong with Joya! =)
This place is top notch! He cuban sandwich is to die for and it was insanely hard to settle on just three of the Tapas (coconut shrimp and bass ceviche, pork empanadas, and melon skewers - fabulous!) All in all I will go back-as much as i can! I recco!
I'm def. a fan.  After reading some of the reviews on  here I felt obligated to write a review.  To quote another yelper its def. the kind of place that you feel sexy in. Love the architects design on the platform seating with the open air windows.  Gives it a very European feel, plus the beautiful dark wood panel walls, black leather seats and sleek lounge area all combine for a great ambiance on a hot summer's night.  I've been here for lunch once with my aunt, apps once in the evening with my husband, and cocktails once with friends.  Food was def. a highlight, loved the cheese plate, ceviche, paprika fries, and yes tapas were a bit pricey, but I haven't been to any tapas place that isn't pricey, so I'm not complaining. 4 stars from me and I'm a fan.  Its become my go-to place when I am entertaining friends from out of town and I don't want to drive all the way up to San Francisco... Cheers.
Trendy, sexy & chic! Joya will definately be THE hot spot on University Avenue. I love the gorgeous urban decor, semi-alfresco dining area and sleek lounge area. I came here last night with a group of 10 and we were impressed. The only glitch was that we weren't seated until 1 hour after reservation time! Yikes - that earns less than 3 star. BUT the manager did allow us to take over the back lounge room and our lovely waitress, Brook, was fabulous and made sure we were well taken care of the rest of the night. (They also comped some appetizer guacomole too - delish!) Drinks were decent, we had martinis and sangria. The tapas menu had a decent selection of dishes. A few of my faves were the mussels (yummy! - I'm still thinking about it today), guacamole, ahi tuna tartare and the cheese & charcuterie platter. I agree with the previous reviews that the paella & papas bravas tasted a little bland. And the ceviche was a little bit too raw for my friend's liking. But we will definately be back! And I'm looking forward to trying the desserts and caiparhinas next time!
Why is this place average a 3-star?? Clearly it deserves much much more. I came here tonight and I have to say that I was thoroughly impressed with the restaurant layout, the attention to detail to furniture, the bar, and of course, the FOOD. First off, the Paella Clasica is a must have. You get ALOT of food for what you are paying (23/person, minimum 2 people), it may seem steep, but it's definitely worth it. I reccomend getting this if you are on a date. It's 46$ for two people without drinks, which is a good price for how much food you get. So tasty and savory. For dessert, make sure you either get the churros or the warm chocolate cake (which is more of a souffle really, than a cake). Each is around 8-9$, but definitely worth the trip to Joya alone. The churros are not your typical mexican churros you find at a fair, or at Costco, but in fact spanish-style churros - more original and crispier, fluffier, and it comes with a great dark chocolate dipping sauce that is very rich. The chocolate cake comes with warm chocolate in the middle with ice cream. I cannot get over at how good these two desserts were. I'd definitely come back, and don't listen to the haters that are giving htis place 3 or less stars.
Ate here early after the restaurant opened, so I didn't want to go right for the one star diss, although it probably deserves it. The restaurant is lovely with a great ambiance,  so that's worth something!  High sexy factor makes you want to love this place. Went for lunch and had three little tapas, each $9 AT LUNCH.  Left hungry and broke.  The croquetas were out by 1230 pm, so we settled for mushroom empanadas, a mixed salad, and coconut shrimp and whatever fish ceviche.  Not that much else appealed.  The empanadas were so bland and greasy, we let the waitress take away what was left, and she had the audacity to charge us although we told her they were not edible.  The salad was literally a single handful of mixed lettuce, with a good dressing.  The "warm cheese" was a bit of melted cheese on toast, w anchovies, unappealing.  The ceviche was the best dish, but tiny, and quite unattractive, the fish and shrimp were rather poorly chopped. We were served a trio of salsas (which tasted ok).  I asked what they went on, since there were no chips or bread, and was told it went on the food.  She then told us it really didn't pair well with what we had.  I am SURE there was supposed to be something like chips, given the relatively huge portion of salsa compared to everything else. From a service perspective, we were irritated by being sat near the busy kitchen service window, when there were many available seats elsewhere.  This seat was horrible because we had literally 12 not-so-busy waitstaff hovering near us.  Obviously our service was terrible, given we were not comped even when we returned a dish. I really doubt I'll give this place another chance, unless I went for the sexy bar.  Sigh, another lousy, trendy Palo Alto restaurant to write off...
First off, Joya (pronounced Hoya), if you're gonna serve Tapas, small portioned appetizers meant to be shared, put the food on small plates because your tables ain't big. It was like a puzzle trying to put all the food on the table. Second, give me a damn flashlight to look at the menu. The small tealight candle won't suffice. That being said, it was an okay to good experience here. We just wanted to hit up DTPA for Red Mango and a little shopping at AA, but were a little hungry so tapas sounded like a good choice. Really beautiful interior with these huge wooden (?) chandeliers in the dining room. The waitress was nice and the bus boys kept the water coming. The sangria here is gooood. Get the red pineapple one. It's definitely a creeper drink; I got a good buzz of it. A $24 pitcher serves 4 generously. Be sure to use the spatula provided to get all that wine soaked fruit. The tapas here are small and slightly overpriced, but it's one of those 'you're paying for the experience' restaurant. We ordered: Guacumole and New World Chips - HAHAH new world chips gimme a damn break, it's those damn exotic chips you find at Trader Joe's or Costco. The guac tasted store bought. Kobe Beef Mini Burgers - Kobe beef is my #1 rich people food. Get these if you come here. Charcuterie and Cheese Plate - the meat was good, but they gave 2 small slices of cheese. There was also this thing that looked like a slice of cheese, but it looked like a slice of lard/fat. I couldn't tell cuz it was hella dark in there, but it was sweet and must've been an equivalent to honeycomb that usually comes with cheese plates. Steamed Black Mussels With Chorizo - Just had one. Can't really comment on it. Seared Spanish Sausages - it tasted like Longanisa (Filipino breakfast sausage) with melted cheese. Dinner was good, but there was this snooty pretentious guy next to us that said to his Botox'ed wife and sons that had girl hair 'I hate when people take pictures at dinner'. What a rude guy, but we laughed loud, yelled dirty words, and snapped pictures like a damn paparazzi. Take that, rude guy.
3.5 stars.  I would definitely eat here again so I'm rounding up.  We went for lunch on a Saturday and shared tapas between 4 people. We started with a pitcher of white sangria, which was light and sweet and quite delicious.  Being a summer fruit drink, I was happy to enjoy the canned peaches and mandarin oranges in it rather than some terrible end of season peaches or other usual white sangria fare.  It was perhaps a bit light on alcohol, but that suited me fine for a lunch drink. We shared the following tapas: Short rib tacos, Gambas (a shrimp dish, don't remember the full name),  stuffed dates, Flamenco eggs, sweet potato fries, and a cheese plate to finish.  The real star if this small selection was the Flamenco Eggs, although it would more correctly be called Flamenco Egg, as there was just one egg.  The single egg was fried sunny side up and set atop a tomato-y roasted eggplant dish, studded with bits of fatty pork and chorizo.  The flavor was rich and light at the same time, and I savored every bite I got. A quick rundown of the other dishes: The short rib tacos were fine to me, the meat was nice and tender, but the flavor wasn't memorable in my book, a little spicy and the horseradish sauce was nice.  The shrimp dish was quite tasty and the shrimp itself was very sweet and fresh-tasting, despite other reviewers complaints of less than fresh seafood.  The stuffed dates were chilled like they just came of the fridge and pretty much just a hunk of blue cheese stuffed in a date - my least favorite item.  The sweet potato fries were great, just what you'd expect. Finally, the cheese plate was another gem, with a nice variety of manchego, blue, and cubes of a fresh soft cheese.  The accompaniments were all nice touches - some small stewed cherries, honey with bits of black truffle, and some peppery syrupy apricots. Another plus is the atmosphere and decor is a nice blend of stylish and comfortable.  Overall, I won't hesitate to come back the next time, but I'm not sure I'll become a regular.
I give this 3.5 stars, and given they are known for their drinks and I didnt have one, maybe this is worthy of a 4. If you are worried about the food being bad, do not be. It's pretty darn good. The prawn based tapas are excellent, and the ceviche is good (but not great). The free range chicken main is of excellent quality but needs work on the flavor a bit. I dont think the food is forgettable per se; I'd call it pretty good, but given the price tag, you may expect more and this food is not going to blow away your expectations. Service is lacking a bit but I call that growing pains for a new place. I cut them some slack here. The ambiance is fantastic though, the best in Palo Alto bar none.
When you name a restaurant after a precious commodity, it's like naming your daughter after a sexy celebrity. You'd better hope she turns out as attractive as the name suggests. Joya, which means "Jewel" in Espanol, is the new pearl in the oyster that is Palo Alto. Located on University Avenue, with open-air seating, Joya is more reminiscent of Ocean Drive in SoBe than a college town in Northern California. It's true urban chic - a people-watching extravaganza that transcends the concept of simply "eating out." Step in among the models posing as hostesses, and you'll really forget you're not in LA or Miami where everyone is trying hard to be discovered. Look around at the people in the lounge - the pretenders, the tech Daddy Warbucks, the gold diggers, the college students. They're all there, mixing it up in a strange brew that would give any mixologist pause. The drinks are sublime, and the food is some of the best Spanish tapas-inspired treats you'll find this side of Barcelona. Don't believe me? I was seated next to a couple coming from the social heights of Madrid. Having just tucked their baby into Stanford, they were sampling some of our local flavor. And wouldn't you know - they declared the food to be among the best Spanish treats they had sampled, ever. From the Kobe Sliders, to the Short Ribs, to the churros for dessert, the culinary hits just keep coming. But don't just come for the food - that would be a shame, like visiting Notre Dame (the one in Paris, silly) just to pray. Stay a while. Drink in the scene and some good Scotch. You can almost hear the shouts and merriment of Las Ramblas just outside. All that's missing is a fine Cigar. And you can blame that one on the People's Republic of California. Salud!
Gist: Nice place to have dinner with friends.  May be a little pricey, but i think food quality is better than what other reviewers make it out to be. We made last minute plans to take a couple of friends here on a Thursday night.  At 7 PM the place was pretty bustling.  I like that vibe.   Our reservations were well acknowledged and we were brought to our table promptly. The white sangria was ok with nice large pieces of oranges and peaches.  But I personally like a little more alcohol in my drink so I felt like it was watered down.  One reviewer mentioned buying by the glass might be more worth it, but we got at least 4 drinks out of our one pitcher so I beg to differ on that note. The four of us shared the ahi tuna tartar, appetizer sampler, rib eye steak, paella, and pork tenderloin.   Ahi tuna was nice, in as much as they succeeded in preparing a normal tartar.  No wow.    Appetizer sampler is good to share with a group of people.  Its made for 2 people with sample empanadas, stuffed peppers, hams, marinated squids.   The paella clasica was suprisingly good and came out quickly (which I cannot say the same for other tapas places).    Good assortment of seafood and chicken, but it would have been a lot better with chorizo or other kind of spicy meat.   I thought their meats (the steak and tenderloin) were really well done.   The meats were cooked just right and both very flavorful.  The steak had was topped with a chimichurri sauce that gave it a kick.    I would definitely recommend these two meat dishes. Service was pretty good, nothing out of the ordinary.   Weird thing though: one of us got a menu with completely different dishes than the rest of us.   Maybe they change their menus often?   Either way, that move is not classy. Anyway, food is actually pretty good, but I prefer my tapas menus to be much larger and with more variety.  Price is definitely a factor.  With the a dish like the tartar at $13.50, or the tenderloin at $18, they make it difficult to add more dishes to the order.
The small portions don't bother me... it iS tapas, anyways... it's what they did with them that was a shame.  Summarily: not much.  For the price I was expecting to be pleased with everything I ordered... high expectations, maybe... but damn, price should reflect Something, right? We ordered the tapas sampler and nothing was memorable. However, my main dish, the jerk marinated chicken was very good.  It's a pretty place and the service was fine - at lunchtime on a weekday it was fairly empty.
Went here with a large group of coworkers and was impressed with their efficient service and excellent tapas and sangria. Here were some of my faves: * Peach sangria * Kobe beef mini burgers * Braised short rib tacos * Papas bravas * Ceviche * Dungeness crab cakes * List goes on... everything here was so good!
My girlfriends and i stumbled into Joya for dinner last week on a random Wednesday night.   I guess we must be out of the recession because people are still dining out on a weekday- and we had to wait 20 minutes for a table!   The restaurant itself is cute, clean and modern with a nice romantic glow to it. We ordered a couple of tapas to share among us.  Everything tasted good but it didn't take my breath away...  We gobbled up: -Cerviche sampler- this came in a sampling of 3 types of cerviche.  Cold diced seafood, one with hints of mango, the other coconut and I can't remember the last one. It was all very fresh and healthy. -Kobe Beef Sliders: yummy!  Very well flavored sliders!  My favorite of the night. -Gambas: prawns with chorizo- this was okay,  it was in more of a tomatoe sauce.  They didn't have the garlic flavored prawns i normally get at all the other tapas places. -Latin Tapas Sampler- combo of ham, cheese, bread, sausages, empanada and olives.  A lil' bit of everything if you can't decide. -Paella Clasica- i call this the spanish fried rice with seafood.  Now this was a serving for two but it was huge!  And it better be huge too since this alone cost $42!  It was enough to feed five girls.  I think maybe two people can finish this only if they don't order anything else.  The paella had a nice flavor to it and they were generous with the seafood here. Since i was driving, i passed on the Sangria but my gf's enjoyed theirs... We also brought in a cake and our waiter was nice enough to cut it without charging us a cake cutting fee\ For tapas, this is a decent place to dine at but i still prefer Picasso's in San Jose.  The tapas just taste better at Picasso's!
Not really sure why this place is in the Michelin guide. It's a nice place with a good atmosphere. However, the food left a lot to be desired. For appetizers we got fried calamari and kobe mini burgers both of which were ok. The batter wasn't very light on the calamari and the burgers were pretty average. We also got their ceviche which wasn't very good either. We got the coffee rubbed sirloin steak skewers which they way overcooked and was pretty dry. We asked for medium and we got really well done. The sauce that came with it was ok. The sea bass we got was probably the best dish and just average considering the price. I would recommend this place for grabbing a drink. They had a brazilian beer there that was similar to Guinness but much lighter. Really tasy. I would not recommend eating dinner here.
I'd like to give the restaurant 1.5 stars but since I can't, I rounded up to a 2. Went to Joya when it first opened about two-three years back (I remember a meat and cheese dish). LOVE it. The service was friendly and though a little pricey  we were very happy with the yumminess. Flash forward a few months and the menu changed. The meat was now separate from the cheese and there was significantly less. If we wanted the same dish we had to pay twice as much. (grumble), Gave this place a couple of more tries. It's what happens when the first impression was so good. Part of the reason, shallowly, was that it lookes like one of those swanky restaurant and bar/lounges with a wall of wines, outdoor seating (with the whole no air conditioning set up even during sweltering heat deals), moody lighting and uniformed staff. Returned for dinner twice. Inedible. Usually, if I didn't pay for the meals, I don't mind it. I did mind because of  how bad the food was. I felt horrible that I asked my dates to take me there.  The presentation was superb, beautiful even but the service had changed. There was one incident where my friend ordered a wine and there was lipstick still on the glass. That would have been fine except the bartender decided she needed to closely examine the glass and the amount of wine consumed right in front of us to make sure we weren't trying to scam the joint out of a measly ten bucks. I never went back after the wine incident. Even if it hadn't happened I was not going to waste money when there was a perfectly good restaurant right next door, down the street, around the corner, up the block. . . Two stars because it use to be a good restaurant and it's pretty to look at. Look elsewhere to fill your bellies with good food and drink.
For Palo Alto, this place is pretty decent.  It's a bit on the pricey side to get your fill, but that is expected in such a swanky looking place.  It's a great location and the interior is pretty unique. As for the food, they run a monthly special featuring a specific country.  This time it was Peru which feature skewered chicken over rice.  Wow, that was an awesome plate of food!  As for the rest of the stuff, it was good although not great.  Some of the menu seemed a bit trendy which might be good if you have picky eaters.  The wine list was varied and surprisingly featured a lot of south american producers. Somebody said Tamarine is better...  Tamarine does have an edge on the food choices/cuisine, but if you are familiar with your asian flavors Tamarine is like yesterdays news.   Palo Alto needed this type of spot (not mediterranean or pub-ish).
The server I had was a blonde female that was extremely artificial with me and my girlfriend.  I was happy that they let us sit outside though seeing that we had our dog with us, but that was about the only satisfying experience at Joya.  We had one of the soups (I forgot the name but it was potato based), fried calamari, and a tuna sashimi/guacamole dish.  The soup was luke warm and bland, the fried calamari pieces were small and primarily were batter and then the sashimi type dish was not "sushi grade" tuna.  The tuna was tough and left a lot to be desired.  I also ordered the Pinapple sangria that didn't have any pineapples.  I would have mentioned something, but I didn't discover that until after my meal.  Anyway, I wouldn't come back here again unless I am walking my dog in Palo Alto again, and that's a big maybe.
LOVED this place!!  I loved the open air dining experience so we got to people watch during dinner ( they also have more intimate private tables in the back. ) We went on a Sunday evening and they had live music, reminded me of  music from 'gypsie kings'. AND now for the best part, the food was amazing! We had some Tapas style plates, the ceviche sampler which had 3 different types of ceviche, chipotle chicken sopes and pulled pork tacos. For dessert, we had the deep fried oreo cookies with mint vanilla ice-cream. It may not sound so divine, but let me tell you it  was roll your eyes back heavenly!!! The portions were generous and everything was brought out in a timely manner so we were able to take our time with each plate. Staff was super friendly and overall service was great. Can't wait to go back again.
We came here for an impromptu date night this past Saturday. Joya is pretty  packed (couldn't get a reservation until 9pm) since it is fairly new. The restaurant layout is wonderful. Very open yet intimate. The lighting was just right. Beautiful furniture. The private dining area looked very cozy. Bar: Peach Sangria was yummmy! Fresh apples, peaches, and mandarin oranges in a huge wine glass. I have found a new love (aside from dirty martinis!). The bar is smaller than I would have thought for a place like this, but service was attentive, prompt, and friendly. Seating is very limited, especially on a busy Saturday night. Restaurant: Our server, Mark, made our dining experience. He knew the dishes well and helped us decide on some of the best. He even chose 2 of the best desserts for us. Yummy! Great personality and very professional. The Ahi Tar Tar was served with crisp taro root chips, the tuna was very fresh and seasoned well, atop fresh guacamole (boyfriend said there was a bit of cheese too? but I didn't taste it). The prime rib was a bit too fatty but still reallllly juicy and full of flavor. I think this is one of their best dishes if you love red meat. The other dishes were chicken, fish, or pork. Red meat I tell you! Choose the red meat. Yummmm. Side of corn was good considering it was just corn. Seasoned well. Must try the camarones next time. Chocolate lava/molten cake. Typical dessert of restaurants. But this one was delectable. Moist cake, rich high quality chocolate, and creamy vanilla gelato. This and the vanilla and strawberry custard thing and the wine put me over the edge. Lush overload. Don't do drugs kids, just overindulge in dessert and wine. Duh. And add some port to it. Nay: The charcuterie cheeseboard. So I just had to get it. Others are right in that it isn't so good. Kinda dry. The blue cheese was what saved it. But hey I still stuffed myself because I can't resist meat and cheese damnit. Oh yea, and the reviews are right. Some of the hostesses look blahh. In need of a clothing makeover blah. You would expect classic chic sophistication (like a little black dress) to match with the rest of the restaurant but no. One of them wore a casual jean skirt. Blah. I expect the hostesses to look hot and dress well damnit. Other than that, I'd definitely come back. Great atmosphere. Good place for a date! Sets the mood for later on . . .
What was here before? I don't even remember, but based on appearance alone, Joya was enticing enough to lure me inside.  Granted, I only ordered a salad and glass of wine - both satisfied the belly.  My date had a sandwich and thought it to be delicious.  I really love the interior of this place.  The bathrooms are pristine.  There is a comfortable lounge area that looks like it'd pair well with a cocktail.  Service was somewhat slow, and I went during lunch when there was only one other dining party in the restaurant.  Our waitress seemed to enjoy chatting it up with another waiter a little too much, as it distracted her from bringing us our food and check in a timely manner. In short, the food didn't blow me away, but the interior was impressive. They have live music night(s) that I'm going to have to check out.
Came here with my family for my parents' wedding anniversary. It was relatively easy to book a table for a Friday night through Open Table. When we got there, there were quite a few empty tables, though to be fair they were all occupied by the time we left. I had to get the white sangria to complement a warm summer's night. It sounds a lot better in theory than it tastes. I appreciated the presentation but felt that it was an uninspired drink. There was little fruit flavor in the wine and the fruits were saturated in alcohol taste. I dunno, I've had better. We wanted a ceviche and our helpful server recommended the halibut. Delicious. I love me some ceviche and this one did not disappoint! The Sauteed Gambas were outstanding. I was surprised at how many prawns we got and how flavorful this was made. There is chorizo involved, which explains a lot. Yum. It has a nice spicy element to it as well. Our last tapa was the Dungeness crab cakes. Overpriced but SO GOOD! I savored each bite I had. Mmm... My brother predictably ordered the Argentinean-style hangar steak that came with yucca fries and Peruvian green aji sauce. The galactical green color is reminiscent to the sauce of Brazil Cafe! The taste I had was delicious. The yucca fries are a little too much in terms of starch, but a cool complement to the steak. The rest of us splurged on a paella, which I unfortunately do NOT recommend. It was, like the white sangria, uninspired. Moreover, it was far too salty. Normally I am quite lenient when it comes to paella as it is usually hearty and decent. I had a hard time liking this one. Sad! This is the main reason for my 3-star review, given that our tapas were very satisfying. If you're going to charge almost $50 for a paella, I expect it to be fantastic. Though we were stuffed, I could not forcing my family to share a churros con chocolate! Our server said it was Argentinian-style churros, which I guess means fatter churros. They are a lot thicker and doughy than Spanish churros. This must be the perfect dessert to share if you're in a group (of 5). The chocolate sauce is not too sweet and a little bitter, a perfect complement to the sweet, fried, hot goodness of the churro. Mmmmm...drooling. Overall Joya is a pleasant experience and good for dates or celebrations. Just don't have super high expectations and you'll be set for a good time. Also don't get the paella!
My friend took me here a few weeks ago for the 1st time. She seemed to really enjoy her 1st visit and wanted to share the "joya". We decided to take a seat in the comfy lounge with pillows & all. We wanted to just have a drink and some tapas. We must have arrived at the right time because we found a perfect spot in the corner. The girls that work here are bit more concerned about how they look than they are about the customer's satisfaction. :-/  We had to practically wave our candle votive in the air to get their attention. Mind you, they were standing directly in front of us at the bar. Luckily, I really really liked my white peach sangria. The tapas plates weren't too shabby-good flavor. Between the 2 of us, we shared 3 plates and we were quite full. Another down side was the poor on my friends wine. It was very sad. :( They could have least poored half a glass - it wasn't even that. Yikes- Not good! I may come back here if I'm in the area. But for now, l'll try the other tapas places.
I remember coming here for the first time 1-2 years ago and it wasn't memorable enough for me to want to come back, but I did decide that I was willing enough to give it another chance. Good thing I did! It's so bad that I want to have Sangria here all the time. A pitcher of the white or red Sangria all to myself with extra shots of rum. Wino! They're pricey, but the place has a nice atmosphere and I love that they have outdoor seating, so we can enjoy dinner with our dog, complete with heating lamps for those chilly days. All the servings are tiny of course, well when I think about eating Cerviche, I think about a plastic tub filled with more than enough, but I also expect it to be eaten with more than 4 chips. Yea, that was weird...serving Cerviche with 4 plantain chips. On the other hand, the Short Rib Tacos were delish and so was the Calamari, but I think everything becomes good once you've had 1-2 cups of sangria. I really love their overpriced Sangria. I also enjoy munching on the Churros with Hot Chocolate dessert, which consists of churros and a cup of melted chocolate to dip them in. The churros are light and fall apart easily, I wish they served half orders of this. I know, I can't make up my mind, either they're too small or too much. Sheesh. They have sexy waiters here too. Woo woo!
Intimate and trendy! Great service and tapa style dishes. The food is tasty! They have a full bar and a great wine list. Ill def stop by again if I'm in the neighborhood.
With a door that resembles a cool wood deck, the gf and I walked into this super modern restaurant that boasts a nouveau Latin cuisine with Tapas. A big fan of tapas we decided to try it out. We quickly ordered a new favorite drink of mine, the 'caiparinha'. One pomegranate and one watermelon. Although they were mad strong the flavoring was disappointing considering the price and use of a common cachaca. I was hoping for a refreshing drink, but it was just ok. If your gonna charge premium prices, you might as well use top shelf liquor. The most impressive dish that stood out was the Black mussels with chorizo and wine sauce. Screaming with spiciness and flavor, we needed all the bread given with the dish to slurp up the yummy sauce. As for the calamari, it was a little over cooked and greasy do to the fact there was no parchment or napkin to soak it up n the platter. I did enjoy the cilantro aioli though. The Short Rib tacos were great, spicy, the braised beef was soft and tender, sitting on top of a homemade taco was a nice effort. Overall, an A for effort but despite the gorgeous decor and pricing, the food good be a lot better.
The food was ok, the service was acceptable. You pay high prices to be among pretty people, just like most of the other establishments along this stretch of university. Any store or restaurant in this location has to gouge you a bit to pay for the cost of rent.
Had dinner at Joya tonight with the wife tonight. Decent food, weak service. 2 weeks ago it was so much better. Took 20 minutes to get a glass of wine poured. Took 10 minutes until the waiter even acknowledged us. Waiter did not even want to recommend any items on the menu. Brussel sprouts were nicely cooked, but could have used more herbs and pepper. Walu entree was very nice. About 10-20 degrees too cool, but moist and well cooked. Braised short ribs tacos were good. Not too fatty. Very flavorful and filling. We also had one of the special tapas. A fancy seafood tomales dish. Quite disappointing. Tomale was wet and flavorless. "Prawns, scallops and mussels were super small and did not have much flavor. Pleace was pretty busy.
Went here hungry for a meal while my friends were mostly there for wine.  I ordered the banana leaf salmon, the cream sauce it was in was very good, the salmon was very tender.  It was good for a wine place I suppose.  The meal selection is limited.  They have a lot of choices for alcoholic beverages as this is a wine place mostly, and lots of appetizers. After dining there, we went to the lounge area.  The music playing there was awesome mostly Thievery corp and dance music so I enjoyed it.  The seating was comfortable.  The deserts there weren't too great, I ordered a strawberry confection that I don't recall the name of but it tasted like whipped cream and strawberries, nothing fancy but cost me $7.  My friends ordered beverages and thought there were EH.  We were there mostly for the environment and it was nice.  The waitresses on that particular day were very beautiful and had very short skirts so if you are a guy i'm sure you will enjoy the environment. The lounge area was dark and had candles on the walls which set a nice dark somber mood of relaxation with some good music.
It's a really chill place to go with the girlfriends to catch up. I am usually not one for ambiance but it's pretty and very soothing. We went on a Sunday when they have live music which is always nice addition. The service was excellent. Our waiter was very accommodating and had good recommendations. Go with more people and so you can try more food. The must haves would be the ceviche (get the sampling), the kobe mini burgers and the scallops. The ceviche is so fresh and light. The combinations of the flavors all work together. The kobe mini burgers were so juicy and flavored nicely. I think the only thing I would do is add a bit of onions but I love onions on everything. The scallops were delicious. I HATE scallops and I usually won't ever touch them with a 10 foot pole but these were amazing. They were cooked really well with the crunchy crust and the middle was so tender. We also got the calamari, mussels, crab cakes, sausages, the hangar steak and the ponzu walu. The rest of the tapas were good but nothing out of this world. I do have to say the breading on the calamari was seasoned well and wasn't too thick or thin. The ponzu walu was really good. The coconut rice with a bite of veggies and the walu is a party in your mouth. The sweetness of the rice balances nicely with the savoriness of the veggies. The walu is so tender and not fishy at all. The steak was cooked perfectly. Overall, the experience was great. There will definitely be a repeat. Thanks JOYA!
Visited a few times now and the tuna tartare and croqueta appetizers are quite good.  (Request the sauce spicy on the croquetas - it's really good.)  Unfortunately, the other things I've tried were nothing special - not bad but not particularly good either. Incidentally, the menu (or the server) should mention that the shrimp apps are whole, not cleaned.  Sorry, some of us woosies can't handle the heads on shrimp staring back while eating.  Not to mention little legs & poop chutes. They had a habanero salmon on the menu when they opened, but I was disappointed to see that it had been removed when I went back to try it. The service has been good, they always accommodate my extra spicy requests. So, now when I come here I cut right to the chase and get the tuna, croquetas and some wine. It is a nice space, attractive decor and good location.  There is potential here.
I have never had an actual dining experience here, I mostly just come for drinks after my shift at another restaurant in town. The bartender, Anthony is always friendly and remembers us. They have the only malbec I have ever liked (layer cake) and the peach sangria is yuuummmyyy!! I did sit on the patio area once, it took the server foreeevveer to get for us. But once we had our pitcher of sangria and the cheese plate life was good. I will however, stick to the bar area from now on.
A Good, fun spot in p.a. I'm sure I would frequent it if I lived down there. They do awesome cocktails (like the joya punch!) and decent, high-priced tapas. I found the flavors to be a little repetitive, although they were tasty - we got the croquettes, patatas bravas, smoked mozzarella & corn empanadas, red snapper & mango ceviche, and the sliders, which I did not taste (they served the exact same dipping sauce with the empanadas and the croquettes, for example). My friend was really set on ordering chorizo, but they don't have just straight up chorizo on the menu - but they made it happen for her....that was cool. Not really an authentic spanish tapas kind of place...more like Americanized Latin American. But I would eat here any time...I like small plates and seafood, and they have plenty of that. Lots of Palo Alto tech scene work dinners were surrounding us on a week night....do make a reservation. Convenient parking in the lime zone Florence lot.
Service: Top notch and helpful. Also, when the wait staff is waiting, it's great to see their attention to detail in polishing glasses and flatware. To the tall guy, you run a tight ship! Setting: Indoor/outdoor seating. Great spot for people watching. Food: Ceviche - tangy and sweet. Croquetas - hot, crispy and tender insaide. Steamed mussels with chorizo - it's nice when they take the time to put a chorizo slice in each mussel. I assume that wasn't by accident. Braised short rib tacos - The filling was tender and well seasoned. The tortilla was somewhat tough. Full bar and super wine list. I'd go back in a flash.
While this place does some of the best calamari I have had, the pricing is too high, and the menu is not exactly "Spanish" like I was hoping. I had the calamari, stuffed pequillo peppers, and croquetas, they were very good. The decor is modern, a bit over the top, but it is trying to compete with the other ridiculously over designed restaurants on University. I would go back, for the tapas. Bring a friend, and you can sample more items. But believe me, the pricing on these items is almost inapprorpiate.
Went there before a Concert Enjoyed some of the Tapas by the Bar, Chorizo and Mussels, Calamari, and the scallops where great, The goat cheese was ok. The best damn sangria I've had in a long time I highly recommend it... Service was great and overall a decent place. and it was Sunday so there was live music that made the atmosphere a bit more pleasant, if you are in the area and just want a small meal and a drink go there..
The design and ambiance of the restaurant was very nice... The food was average, expensive, but average just the same.  All in all we were pretty content with our meal with friends until we were finishing up dessert and signing our bill and the busser started to set the table!!!  We were extremely offended as we were in no way "sitting" on the table.  We had drinks, dinner and dessert and they had the audacity to "shew" us out of the restaurant. We will not be going back to Joya...ever.
HEAVEN absolute heaven. My best friend and I went to Joya for the first time last week and it was more amazing than we expected. The service, the food and the ambiance were all great. We ordered the chefs sampler of tapas and everything was delicious - the meats and sausages especially. We also had the Argentinian hanger steak and the salmon - both perfect. For dessert we decided to go for the sorbet and oh my was it good, very simple but the flavors were what made it so good. We will be going back here again and again and again! Go, go now!
I had a surprisingly good second experience for a Friday dinner at Joya, following a barely mediocre first time over lunch when it first opened. Very cool and hip for downtown PA, and it was pretty full in lounge and dining room by 6pm though we were able to get table for two walking in.  The waiter was very friendly and helpful, though borderline overbearing. His recommendations for the ceviche sampler and tacos were spot on.  The ceviche is heavier than what I have typically had, but still interesting and good.  Papas bravas side have a remoulade sauce instead of the aioli mayo I am used to, but again good. Split a good $40 Syrah (can't remember what), and rounded out to about all in $60 per person.
I came here for dinner with a friend (she was craving tapas) on a weeknight. We ordered a pitcher of the white peach sangria, ahi tuna tartare, chipotle chicken sopes, and ponzu marinated walu to share. When we first walked into the restaurant, we noticed how fancy the decor looked (we joked that it felt as if we were on a date), but the service was wonderful -- absolutely non pretentious. All the dishes we ended up ordering were actually recommendations by our server. Everything was delicious and well presented, but my favorite was probably the walu, as this isn't a fish you normally see on the menu. The walu was very flaky and the ponzu sauce was amazing with it. We were so full that we didn't have room for dessert. I would definitely come back to try some of their other menu items! -L.
Delicious food, great ambiance, fantastic service! I have to say my dinner experience here was better than I expected. It was my first time here and our server had great recommendations. We walked in on a Sunday night and luckily only had to wait for 10 minutes for a table for two. I love that they have outdoor seating and an indoor area that is open (great on a warm summer night). The decor is modern and beautiful AND they have live entertainment during dinner on certain nights. The entrees surprisingly were generously portioned and the food tasted delicious! What we ordered: -Yucca fries w/ chipotle aioli ($5) (made fresh to order. fresh potatotes with a crispy outer layer.) -Jerk-marinated fulton valley chicken ($17) (comes with 2 big pieces of tender and juicy chicken. the sauce was definitely the best part...the pineapple sauce complemented the chicken well. very reasonably priced for a delicious tasting dish with high quality ingredients.) -Cuban braised pork shoulder ($18) (the pork was SO tender and flavorful. the sweet potato puree complemented the pork well. this dish is generously portioned and very reasonably priced also. highly recommend this dish!) We were so full that we didn't save room for dessert. It was definitely a great dining experience and I'll definitely come back to try their other dishes.
DH and I wanted to try something new on University Ave and this seemed like a good choice, especially with the outdoor seating.   There wasn't a large crowd so we got a great seat next to the window with great view for people watching.  However, the experience didn't improve any beyond that. Food -- Mediocre We ordered a latin tapas sampler plate to share and didn't really like it that much.  A few items were already cold when it's suppose to be hot.   the mussels seemed was also dried up from overcooking. DH ordered Cuban sandwich and was not impressed at all, especially compared to the way-more delicious Cuban Sandwich from La Bodeguita del Medio on California Street. Service -- Mediocre Our waiter was not having a good day b/c service was definitely cold.   Maybe we didn't order enough?  Who knows. We probably won't go back.
Ambiance === GREAT Food & Service === Pass It's on University Ave. in Palo Alto, but even considering the location, I feel like I didn't get what I paid for.  The food seemed whipped together and so-so on flavor & content.  The place seemed understaffed, even though the restaurant was about 1/3 full. I'd recommend PASS for a Weekday dinner. (or try your luck) Might try it another time for drinks.
We came here on a Sunday afternoon for lunch.  We were seated right away by the window so that was nice. We ordered a Cuban sandwich and a Walu Fish sandwich.  We liked the Cuban Sandwich (tasty), but the Walu Fish was just OK.  Unfortunately, the fish tasted -- fishy -- you know, like it wasn't "cooked" properly or worse, still raw in a bad way. The dish came with Sweet Potato Fries and that was good.  For dessert, we ordered the Joya Tres Leches Flan and that was delicious. Overall, we would come again for the ambiance and good service.  Just stay away from the Walu Fish sandwich.
I love this place to hang out and just have a few drinks for the night or early evening. The sangria is just FANTASTIC and the food is pretty yummy. Beautiful decor and the atmosphere is very laid back here. Wonderful location in the middle of everything and the waitresses are very attentive.
Bumping Joya up to 4. Joya had become a favorite stop for a warm afternoon cocktail, but we finally sat down for a midday meal this weekend....  The chicken and portabello sandwich was delicious ($11). Great combination of flavors on the sandwich with a delicious foccacia. J had the Pan-Seared Walu sandwich ($11.5); and after asking the server we found out that Walu is a type of butterfish... how can you go wrong there? Although the flavor of the fish was delicious, it was a little overwhelmed by the remoulade and really large bun. But, when you're savoring the sweet potato fries and a glass of sangria, it's hard to complain. Joya still stands as a go-to spot to sip and relax on a sunny afternoon.
I'll have to try it again, but for now, Joya stands at a 3 star rating. If the food could match the... Read more 
The vibe was good and the service was amazing! But the tapas where just okay. I remember the mini burger being my favorite. Good spot for groups and we walked in with a large group were sat almost immediately and the corkage fee was not horrendous.
Come here for ambience, hip factor, and heated outdoor seating.  But i was a bit disappointed with their sangria which was unique and delicious in flavor (grape soda-like) but failed to provide a decent buzz!  And we ordered a pitcher!  Next time i'd just order wine or a cocktail for my daily smile. Food was forgetful but not bad.  We ordered 4 tapas dishes and a pitcher of sangria which came out to $65 which is a decent price for a tapas restaurant and we were full.  The best dish we had was probably the mussels and chorizo.  The mussels were actually cooked perfectly tender and fresh. Service was impeccable.  We were regularly asked how we were doing and if we needed anything. i'd prob come back since i live so close to downtown pa but uggh why does parking have to suck so much?
This is definitely an interesting crowd.  I guess it is the Silicon Valley aspect of if all but you mix in the Stanford college crowd and booze...it can definitely turn into an entertaining night.  I can tell you this is city but with a not city kinda feel.  Trust me, I wore "Pink" sweat and I was told I still had game. Love the intimate seating in the lounge area.  Kinda gives you a social feel without forcing you to interact with others.  But if you get some of the cocktails on their menu, some how it becomes liquid courage.  For me, it doesn't take much since I am always stuck at a computer all day.  Then again, most of the other people in the bar are too so there is much socializing accomplished! So, I guess I should talk about the Tapas since this is Yelp by the way...the drinks are still talking here.  It is Tapas by definition, since they are small plates.  We were a small but hungry few so we tried half of the Tapas menu.  Apparently in the lounge area, you can not order from the dinner menu.  The way that I looked at it, long as I have enough food to balance out the drinks - it was all good. So back to tapas, they were yummy.  I am not a Tapas snob so I can't really honestly give you a comparison to what real Tapas taste like.  All I can say is that they were good.  It is a good list of choicesand was happy with all of that we chose. Now on to the drinks, LOVE the Coconut Mojito.  I know sounds weird at first but if you like coconut - you have to try this.  It isn't too sweet or syrupy, just sweet enough to let the rum sneak up on you 3 drinks in. The service was great, surprising since everyone sneaked in all at the same time.  As busy as it was during the typical dinner hour, the food came out in a paced manner which gave me a chance to enjoy the selections. In a nutshell, good drinks - good food, parking sucks but that is not the fault of Joya.
Love eating out on the University strip and sipping sangria at this newish Spanish spot. Every time I've been here I've managed to sit either outside or right next to the outside windows, which definitely makes the experience more enjoyable. (Location, location, location.) Always been impressed with the small plate tapas that have been on offer, and even when I was only ordering vegetarian option there seemed to be a few things I liked.  Now the mixed drinks/sangria could have something to do with the four star rating, but I remember leaving quite happy and not too disheartened when the bill came around.
